Vol. II.1
THIRD YEAR.
CHAPTER XXXII.
Our dying friends come o'er us, like a cloud,
To damp our brainless ardour, and abate
That glare of life which often blinds the wise.
Our dying friends are pioneers, to smooth
Our rugged paths to death.
The
commencement of our third summer was marked by
an event very sad to our little self-exiled company in the
woodsthe death of Mrs. Glenville.
Were all here said affection prompts and truth warrants,
a volume might be easily written, interesting to most, but
specially to that comparatively small yet most excellent class
known as religious people: for never had such a brighter
ornament or safer pattern. No one, except the inspired
person who first gave the exhortation, could more truly have
said with her
lips
to her friends as she did by her
life
Be
ye followers of me as I am of Christ. But none ever
was so unwilling to appropriate that or similar expressions:
she was too pious, too humble and meek, and childlike ever
to think her lovely temper, resigned spirit, and disinterested
goodness to be, as they were, a bright and burning light.
In early life she was said to be surpassingly beautiful.
But danger and temptation from beauty were soon
prevented
;
in the midst of her bloom her enchanting face was for
ever marred by the fearful traces of the small-pox. Yet
spite of this, and even in advanced life, rare was it to
behold
a countenance more agreeable than hers; in which
was the blended expression of pleasing features,
benevolent
feeling, pure sentiment, and heavenly temper. The
original beauty of the countenance had seemingly been
transferred to the heart; whence it beamed afresh from the
face, refined, chastened, renovated. Her person was tall
and finely proportioned; and so imposing her mien, from a
native dignity of soul, that had her original beauty
remained
,
Mrs. Glenville must have always appeared a Grace.
She was well educated and extensively read in history,
and many other important secular subjects, but her chief
reading had always been that best of booksthe Bible:
indeed, to this, during the last few years of her sorrowful
life, her whole attention was given. She, however, read
now one other booka book we name, although with no
expectation of its obtaining favour in an unreflecting age
Ambrose's looking unto Jesus. And these two books,
in the latter months of her life, owing to the nature of her
disease, she read on her knees! That disease was an
aneurism of the femoral artery, of long continuance, and
towards
the last exceedingly painfuland which, from an
early period of its existence had been pronounced fatal.
Yet all this created in her no alarm, produced not the
slightest
murmur, and abated not her customary cheerfulness and
playful vivacity. Nay, she tried even to comfort and
encourage
our little settlementbeing really more joyous in
anticipation of a removal to the better land, than we could
have been in returning from exile to vast temporal
possessions
and a beauteous earthly home!
Reason was unimpaired till within a very few moments
of death; and we all stood around her bed in the rude
cabin, while she, placing her hands on the heads of her
grandchildren, offered a solemn prayer for their welfare;
and then, with an interrupted voice of the utmost
tenderness
,
she, looking on us for the last, and smiling, saidI
am dyingallpeace! The king of terrors was there
to her an Angel of beautyto us dark and frightful!
and he rudely shook that dear frail tabernacle with a severe,
perhaps a painful convulsion! But that loved heart, after
one throe of agony, was still!a deep sigh breathed from
the quivering lipsand she was
not
, for God had taken
her! A blood ransomed and sanctified spirit was in its
true home!
Two days after we laid her in a lone and forest grave.
And there all were mourners; none walked in that
procession
of the dead but the people of Glenvillebrothers,
sisters
,
children! In that solitary spot we laid her, far away
from consecrated ground and the graves of our fathers!
But what! though night after night around that spot was
heard the melancholy howl of the wild beast!--what!
though the great world knows not, cares not to know of that
leaf-covered grave! The dust that slumbers there shall
live againand die no more! Better far lie in an unknown
grave and rise to the resurrection of the just, than under a
sculptured monument amid the lofty mausoleums of kings,
if one thence must rise to die the endless death!
CHAPTER XXXIII.
Why should a man, whose blood is warm within,
Sit like his grandsire cut in alabaster?
Where should this music be? i' the air, orthe earth?
Important
changes to the Glenville settlement soon
followed
the death of Mrs. Glenville. It was found
necescessary
to connect a store with the tannery; and hence,
after due deliberation, it was decided that Mr. Carlton
should now remove to Woodville and open the store;
the ex-legislator, J. Glenville, to remain and conduct the
leather department with old Dick, and also buy up
produce
for the Orleans market, and all along shore there.
He(not Dick, but Glenville)was now also a candidate
for Prothonotary; although not from elevated and
pure
patriotism, as in his other campaign; the fact is we had
had
honour
enough and
loss
. An eye was now fixed on
the salary; we wished to serve the people, provided like
other great patriots, we could also serve ourselves; bad
men serve
only
themselves, good ones both themselves and
the people.
Uncle John and Aunt Kitty were to stay with Glenville
in the patriarchal cabin; but Miss Emily Glenville was to
go with us to Woodville, where she and Mrs. Carlton
would set up an Institute for Young Ladies!the very first
ever established in the New Purchase.
In due season, and after innumerable dividings and
packings
of goods and chattels, off we set; a good two horse
wagon and its owner and driver, a robust youth of the
timber
world, having been hired to take us and the plunder.
Aunt Kitty insisted on going over to see us safe at our
1*
new home and to help
fix;
and old Dick, poor fellow!
looked so wistfully at me, that I agreed to ride the honest
creature to Woodville, if he would consent to come back
tied to the tail of the wagon; and to that he made no
objection
whatever. And so he went along too.
Nothing important occurred on the journey, only a curious
complimentary mistake of the bustling hostess during the
night we were compelled to pass on the road. This
sagacious
lady, seeing a baby in the party, inferred, in Pillbox's
style, that somebody was married; and as Aunt Kitty
carried
the little crittur, and made an awful deal of fuss,
and Mr. C. used once or twice nursery diminutives, the
landlady concluded that if I was
faddywaddy
, Aunt
Kitty must be
mammywammy
. Hence, about bed time,
she considerately said--I want to 'commodate near about
as well as we can fix it, and so
him
(pointing to Mr.
Carlton
)and
you
ma'am(speaking to Aunt Kitty)kin have
the room up loft thare; and them young folks(Mrs.
Carlon
,
Emily C. and the driver)kin have this room down
here all alone to 'emselves!
Now, reader, had I a very grave and solemn
countenance
in my youth, or was Aunt Kitty then just thirty-five
years and six months my senior, a very pretty, youthful,
looking woman? And what could have deceived our
Hoosierina
?
that when informed of her error, she should have
exclaimed:
Well! now! I never seed the like on it! Why if I
didn't sentimentally allow you was the two old folkses, and
them two likely young gals, your two oldenmost daters
and that leetle crittur, you look'd like you was a nussin
your last and youngenest!
Awh! come now, reader, act fair; for Aunt Kitty was
after all a right down good looking body, and as lively as
a young lady of plus-twenty. And do not fine, handsome
young fellows sometimes marry good looking aged ladies
very rich?
However, spite of this, next day we came safe to
Woodville
.
But now, alas! was to be the parting with old Dick!
True, he let them tie him to the tail of the wagonbut
evidently, he was trotted off contrary to his secret wishes,
and a good deal faster than he was accustomed to go; for
our driver, desirous of reaching the river by night, and
having no return load, drove away at a Jehu gait. I,
standing
at our upper story back window, cried out, as he
wheeled into his retrograde positionGood bye, Dick,
good bye! and, would you have believed it? He cocked
back his ears!rolled up his eyes!and with head and
neck almost horizontal, he made not only desperate efforts
not to trot, but to slip his halter! In vain! The brute
horses in front, were too many for the poor fellow, and away,
away they jerked him; till the party, entering the woods,
turned suddenly into the road to Glenville, and he was
forced round with an ample sweep of his rear quarters;
and the last I ever saw of my poor dear old comrade was
a most indignant flourish of his venerable tail! For, before
my visit to the former home, Dick who would not grind
bark alone, and John could not be constantly with him, was
sold to a neighbouring teamster; and then, in about a year
after, he ended his earthly career as he had begun ita
wheel-horse to a wagoner! Whether from the infirmity
of age, or heart-broken at quitting our family, he dropped
dead, holding back in his place, on the descent of a
precipitous
hill!! * * * * * * Poor Dick!
poor Dick!Don't pshaw at me, reader! I'm
not
crying,
any such thingyes! he's dead now!
I
shall never
see
him
again! and
you
will never
hear
of him. If he has plagued
you some in this work, he will not, like some bipedalic and
quadrupedal heroes in certain other books, plague you all
through!
Behold us, then, one step back towards the worldly
world. And so now we shall have a little backwoods town
life, with an occasional excursion to our country seat at
Glenville, like great shop-keepers of eastern cities.
Our first step at Woodville was to write and fasten up at
the post-office, court-house, jail, doctor's office and other
public places, copies of our prospectus for the Woodville
young ladies' institute. This was necessary for sixteen
reasons; firstly, there was no printing office nearer (then)
than one hundred miles; secondly,Oh! I see you are
satisfiedI'm not going on. Wonderful care, however,
had been used to make our notice a specimen, both of
penmanship
and patriotism; and hence more was accomplished
in our favour than could nave been done by sixteen line
pica and long primer. For instance, heading the foolscap
was a superb American eagle, in red ink flourish, and
holding
in his bill, a ribbon, inscribedYoung Ladies
Institute
.
Then came the mistresses' names in large round
handthen the location in letters, inclining backward, like
old Dick when wheel-horseOh! pardon, he shall
not
hold
back for us againI was off my guard; and then the word
PROPOSE that introduced the page-like matter, in capitals
of german text, with heads and tails curled and crankled
and interlaced, so as nearly to bewilder the reader about
the meaning! And yet, so adroitly was this word contrived,
that if one pertinaciously and judiciously kept on through
all the windings, he would emerge safe enough at the final
flourish of the E; and be not a little triumphant at
twisting
unhurt and unscared through the labyrinth of sich a
most powerful hard and high larn'd hand write!
Leaving this prospectus to produce its own effects, I set
out for Louisville to lay in goods, and also to bring out for
our school-purposes, a piano. Now this was the very first
that was ever heern tell of in the Purchus! and hence
no small sensation was created, even by the bare report
of our intention. Nay, from that moment, till the
instrument
was backed up to our door to be removed from the
wagon, expectation was on tip-toe, and conjecture never
weary. A pianne! what could it be? Was it a sort a
fiddle-likeonly bigger, and with a powerful heap of
wire strings? What makes them call it a forty pianne?
fortyfortyah! yes, that's itit plays forty tunes!
Some at Woodville knew well enough what a piano was,
for there, as elsewhere, in the far west, were oddly
congregated
,
a few intelligent persons from all ends of the
earth: but these did all in their power to mislead
conjecture
,
enjoying their neighbours' mistakes. After a narrow
escape of being backed, wagon and all, into the creek,
already mentioned, as having the
ford
just seven feet deep,
and notwithstanding the roughness, or as my friend, lawyer
Cutswell used to say, the asperities of the road, the
instrument
reached us,
and
in tune,unless our ears were
lower than concert pitch. At all events, we played tunes
on it, and vastly to the amazement and delight of our native
visitors; who, considering the notes of the piano as those
of invitation, came by day or night, not only around the
window
,
but into the entry, and even into the parlour itself, and
in hosts! Nor did such ever dream of being troublesome, as
usually it was a sorter wantin to hear that powerful pianne
tune agin! But often the more curious a sort o' wanted
the lid tuk up like to see the tune a playin, and them little
jumpers (dampers) dance the wires so most mighty darn'd
powerful smart!
All this was, indeed, annoying, yet it was amusing.
Beside
,
we might as well have bolted the store, and left the
Purchase, as to bolt our door, or quit playing: and beyond
the ill-savour of such conduct in a backwood's republic, it
would have been cynical not to afford so many simple
people
a great pleasure at the cost of a little inconvenience
and some rusting of wires from the touches of perspiring
fingers. An incident or two on this head, and our music
may, for the present, be dismissed.
One day, a buxom lass dismounted, and after hanging
her crittur to my rack, walked not, as was usual, into the
store first, but direct into our parlour, where she made
herself
at home, thus:
Well! ma'am, I'm a sort a kim to see that 'are thing
thare(pointing to the piano)Jake says its powerful
mought a body hear it go a leetle ma'am?
Of course, Mrs. Carlton let it go a leetle, and then it
was rapturously encored, rubbed, patted, wondered at,
asked about, &c. for one good solid hour, when our
familiar
made the following speech and retired:
Well!pianne tunes is great! I allow that pianne
maybe prehaps cost near on to about half a quarter section,
(forty acres, valued at fifty dollars.) I wish Jake and me
was rich folks, and I'd make him go half as high as yourn,
however, I plays the fiddle, and could do it right down
smart, only some how or nuther I can't make my fingers
tread the strings jist ezactly right!
A very respectable woman, wife of a wealthy farmer
seven miles from Woodville, having been one day in town
till towards evening, thought she would step over, and for
the first time hear the famous piano; and that, although
she was to ride home by herself, and by a very long and
lonesome road. Our best tunes were accordingly done,
and with flute accompaniments; at which our honest-hearted
neighbour, raising both hands, and with a peculiar nod of
the head and wonderful naivete, exclaimed:
Compton(her husband)Compton said it was better
nor the fiddle!but I'm sentimentally of opinion its as fur
afore a fiddle, as a fiddle's afore a jusarp!!
Illustrious shade of Paganini! what say'st thou to that?
Once, however, a fine, yet unpolished young man came,
but evidently with an impression that some invitation was
necessary, as he rapped at the parlour door, and would not
enter till invited by Mrs. Carlton. She was playing at the
time, and well knowing the cause of the visit, she soon
asked if he was fond of music, to which he answered:
Oh! most powerful fond, ma'am; and as I heern tell
of the pianne, I made a sort a bold to step inand maybe
prehaps you'd play a tune.
Tune after tune was accordingly played; while the
young man, who, abashed at his entrance, remained near
the door, now arose and advancing, as if drawn by some
enchantment, little by little, he stood at the end of the
instrument
,
absorbed in the music, and his eyes fixed with
an intense gaze on the lady's countenanceand at last,
when the music ceased at the conclusion of some piece of
Beethoven's, he heaved a profound sigh, and thus fervently
said:
If I had a puttee wife and such a fixin, I'd never want
nothing no more no how!
Reader! that man had a soul! Sweet sounds and a fair
face(my mother-in-law had been a very beautiful woman,
now touched chords in his heart never before
so
vibrated;
and there came ill-defined but enrapturing visionsso lofty!
so aerial! so unlike his cabin, his sisters, and, perhaps,
his sweetheart! Wo to the fop who then should even have
looked impertinence towards the musician! Ah!
sweetheart
!
for an instant thy image was away! Thy lover had
caught a dim glimpse of a region and atmosphere where a
more refined lady-love only could live!
And so we were now fully under weigh at Woodville,
selling, buying, keeping school, and playing the piano
the last important affair being sadly interrupted by the duties
of house-keeping. Mrs. C. began more clearly to
understand
an elegant phrase, addressed to her at our entrance
into the wooden countrythe working of one's own
ash-hopper
.
A girl was indeed caught, (although the
creatures
were shy as wild turkeys) about once a month; but
the success was only small relief to the mistress. It might
be a kind of relief from rough scrubbing and washing; from
little else, however, as other work must be rectified and
often re-cleaned. Did a girl fancy, too, herself
undervalued
?was
she not asked to the first table with company?
not included in invitations sent us from big bug
families
?not
called Miss Jane or Eliza?she was off in a
moment! Real malice is often mixed with the dudgeons;
dough half kneaded is deserted by the young ladyclothes
abandoned in the first sudsbatter left, and that at the
instant
you invite your company to sit up, and expect the
young woman that goes out to help her neighbours in a
pinch to be coming in with the first plate of flannel cakes!
But if one unfortunately catches a girl who is a mad
devotee
to some false form of the Christian religion, the
employer
will be systematically cheated, under the vile plea
of higher obligations to attend the thousand and one
meetings
got up by self-righteous revival makers. We have by
such been left on a sick-bed, and when it was by some
supposed
we were actually dying!her spiritual advisers held
a fanatical meeting that hour, and off she hurried, though
paid to nurse! Such a thing would not now be thought
worthy record, if we were not too well apprised that even
in here, girls, gals, helps, servants, and apprentices, are but
poorly instructed by some flaming religionists as to the
sacred
duties of their offices; and that some of these helps,
although paid, fed, clothed, and nursed in sickness by the
employers, are, if not expressly taught, yet really
encouraged
,
to slight their workto be impertinentand to pay
no respect to proper family hours at night, or even to the
solemnities of a domestic religion!
Hence a New Purchase is not the most pleasant place in
the world for boarding-school young ladiesor indeed for
any
females
[1]
[1]
Women.
who have not muscles of oak and patience of
an ox. Let then, no fair lady who
can
remain in an old
settlement, venture into a new one from mere poetical
reasons
;
or till she has long and deeply pondered this phrase
and its cognatesto work your own ash-hopper! And
if a
nice
young gentleman engaged to be married to a pretty
delicate lily-flower of loveliness, is meditating to flit to
a bran new settlement, let him know that out there rough
men, with rare exceptions, regard wives as squaws, and as
they often expressed their views to Mr. Carlton, have no
idee of sich weak, feminy, wimmin bodies as warnt brung
up to sling a dinner-potkill a varmintand make leather
brichises!
MORAL.
Better to marry in the Range.
CHAPTER XXXIV.
quodcunque ostendis mihi sic, incredulus odi.
I am slow to believe fish stories.
Our
Board of Trustees, it will be remembered, had been
directed by the Legislature to procure, as the ordinance
called it, Teachers for the commencement of the State
College at Woodville. That business by the Board was
committed to Dr. Sylvan and Robert Carltonthe most
learned gentlemen of the body, and ofthe New Purchase!
Our honourable Board will be more specially introduced
hereafter; at present we shall bring forward certain
rejected
candidates, that like rejected prize essays, they may be
published, and
thus
have their revenge.
Vol. II.2
None can tell us how plenty good things are till he looks
for them; and hence, to the great surprise of the Committee,
there seemed to be a sudden growth and a large crop of
persons
even in and around Woodville, either already qualified
for the Professorships, as we named them in our
publications
,
or who could qualify by the time of election.
As to the chair named also in our publications, one very
worthy and disinterested schoolmaster offered, as a great
collateral inducement for his being elected, to find his own
chair!a vast saving to the State, if the same chair I saw
in Mr. Whackum's school-room. For his chair there was
one with a hickory bottom; and doubtless he would have
filled it, and even lapped over its edges, with equal dignity
in the recitation room of Big College.
The Committee had, at an early day, given an invitation
to the Rev. Charles Clarence, A.M. of New Jersey, and
his answer had been affirmative; yet for political reasons
we had been obliged to invite competitors, or
make
them,
and we found and created a right smart sprinkle.
Hopes of success were built on many thingsfor
instance
,
on poverty, a plea being entered that some thing
ought to be done for the poor fellowon one's having
taught a common school all his born days, who now
deserved
to rise a pegon political, or religious, or fanatical
partizan qualificationsand on pure patriotic principles,
such as a person's having been born in a canebrake and
rocked in a sugar trough. On the other hand, a fat,
dull-headed
,
and modest Englishman asked for a place, because
he had been born in Liverpool! and had seen the world
beyond the woods and waters too! And another fussy,
talkative, pragmatical little gentleman, rested his pretensions
on his ability to draw and paint maps!not projecting them
in round about scientific processes, but in that speedy and
elegant style in which young ladies
copy
maps at first chop
boarding schools! Nay, so transcendant seemed Mr.
Merchator's
claims, when his
show
or
sample
maps were
exhibited
to us, that some in our Board, and nearly every body
out of it, was confident he would do for Professor of
Mathematics
and even Principal.
But of all our unsuccessful candidates, we shall introduce
by name only twoMr. James Jimmey, A.S.S., and Mr.
Solomon Rapid, A. to Z.
Mr. Jimmey, who aspired to the mathematical chair,
was master of a small school of all sexes, near Woodville.
At the first, he was kindly, yet honestly told, his
knowledge
was too limited and inaccurate; yet,
notwithstanding
this, and some almost rude repulses afterwards, he
persisted
in his application and his hopes. To give evidence
of competency, he once told me he was arranging a new
spelling-book, the publication of which would make him
known as a literary man, and be an unspeakable advantage
to the rising generation. And this naturally brought on
the following colloquy about the work:
Ah! indeed! Mr. Jimmey?
Yes, indeed, Mr. Carlton.
On what new principle do you go, sir?
Why, sir, on the principles of nature and common
sense. I allow school-books for schools are all too
powerful
obstruse and hard-like for to be understood without
exemplifying
illustrations.
Yes, but Mr. Jimmey, how is a child's spelling-book to
be made any plainer?
Why, sir, by clear explifications of the words in one
column, by exemplifying illustrations in the other,
I do not understand you, Mr. Jimmey, give me a
specimen
Sir?
An example
To be surehere's a spes-a-example; you see, for
instance, I put in the spelling-column, C-r-e-a-m,
cream
,
and here in the explification column, I put the
exemplifying
illustration
Unctious part of milk!
We had asked, at our first interview, if our candidate
was an algebraist, and his reply was
negative;
but, he
allowed he could qualify by the time of election, as he was
powerful good at figures, and had cyphered clean through
every arithmetic he had ever seen, promiscuous questions
and all! Hence, some weeks after, as I was passing his
door, on my way to a squirrel hunt, with a party of friends,
Mr. Jimmey, hurrying out with a slate in his hand, begged
me to stop a moment, and thus addressed me:
Well, Mr. Carlton, this algebra is a most powerful thing
aint it?
Indeed it is, Mr. Jimmeyhave you been looking into
it?
Looking into it! I have been all through this here fust
part, and by election time, I allow I'll be ready for
examination
.
Indeed!
Yes, sir! but it is such a pretty thing! Only to think
of cyphering by letters! Why, sir, the sums come out, and
bring the answers exactly like figures! Jist stop a minute
look here;
a
stands for 6, and
b
stands for 8, and
c
stands for 4, and
d
stands for figure 10; now if I say
a+bc=d, it is all the same as if I said, 6 is 6 and 8 makes
14, and 4 substracted, leaves 10!! Why, sir, I done a
whole slate full of letters and signs; and afterwards, when
I tried by figures, they every one of them came out right
and brung the answer! I mean to cypher by letters
altogether
.
Mr. Jimmey, my company is nearly out of sightif you
can get along this way through simple and quadratic
equations
by our meeting, your chance will not be so bad
good morning, sir.
But our man of letters quit cyphering the new way,
and returned to plain figures long before reaching
equations
;
and so he could not become our professor. Yet
anxious to do us all the good in his power, after our college
opened, he waited on me, a leading trustee, with a proposal
to board our students, and authorised me to publishas
how Mr. James Jimmey will take strange students (
students
not belonging to Woodville) to board, at one dollar
a week, and find every thing, washing included, and will
black their shoos three times a week to boot, and
give
them their dog-wood and cherry-bitters every morning into
the bargain!!
The most extraordinary candidate, however, was Mr.
Solomon Rapid. He was now somewhat advanced into
the shaving age, and was ready to assume offices the most
opposite in character; although justice compels us to say
Mr. Rapid was as fit for one thing as another. Deeming it
waste of time to prepare for any station till he was certain
of obtaining it, he wisely demanded the place first, and then
set to work to become qualified for its duties, being, I
suspect
the very man, or some relation of his, who is recorded
as not knowing whether he could read Greek, as he had
never tried. And, beside, Mr. Solomon Rapid contended
that all offices, from president down to fence-viewer, were
open to every white American citizen; and that every
republican
had a blood bought right to seek any that struck
his fancy; and if the profits were less, or the duties more
onerous than had been anticipated, that a man ought to
resign
and try another.
Naturally, therefore, Mr. Rapid, thought he would like to
sit in our chair of languages, or have some employment
in the State college; and hence he called for that purpose
on Dr. Sylvan, who, knowing the candidate's character,
maliciously
sent him to me. Accordingly, the young
gentleman
presented himself, and without ceremony, instantly
made known his business thus:
I heerd, sir, you wanted somebody to teach the State
school, and I'm come to let you know I'm willing to take
the place.
Yes, sir, we are going to elect a professor of languages
who is to be the principal, and a professor
Well, I don't care which I take, but I'm willing to be
the principal. I can teach sifring, reading, writing,
jogger-free
,
surveying, grammur, spelling, definitions, parsin
Are you a linguist?
Sir!
You of course understand the dead languages?
Well, can't say I ever seed much of them, though I
have heerd tell of them; but I can soon larn themthey
aint more than a few of them I allow?
Oh! my dear sir, it is not possiblewecan't
Well, I never seed what I couldn't larn about as smart
as any body
Mr. Rapid, I do not mean to question your abilities; but
if you are now wholly unacquainted with the dead
languages
,
it is impossible for you or any other talented man
to learn them under four or five years.
Pshoo! foo! I'll bet I larn one in three weeks! Try
me, sir,let's have the furst one fursthow many are
there?
Mr. Rapid, it is utterly impossible; but if you insist, I
will loan you a Latin book
That's your sorts, let's have it, that's all I want, fair
play.
Accordingly, I handed him a copy of Histori Sacr
with which he soon went away, saying, he didn't allow
it would take long to git through Latin, if 'twas only sich a
thin patch of a book as that.
In a few weeks, to my no small surprise, Mr. Solomon
Rapid again presented himself; and drawing forth the book
began with a triumphant expression of countenance:-
Well, sir, I have done the Latin.
Done the Latin!
Yes, I can read it as fast as English.
Read it as fast as English!!
Yes, as fast as Englishand I didn't find it hard at
all.
May I try you on a page?
Try away, try away; that's what I've come for.
Please read here then, Mr. Rapid; and in order to
give him a fair chance, I pointed to the first lines of the
first chapter, viz; In principio deus creavit caelum et
terram
intra sex dies; primo die fecit lucem, &c.
That, sir? and then he read thus, in prinspo duse
cree-vit kalelum et terrum intra
[2]
[2]
Our yankee linguists will rejoice to know that Mr. Rapid pronounced
the
a
just as flat and calfish as themselves; as they thus have
untu-tored
nature on their side, just as the Egyptian king had the goats and
the babies on his.
sex dyesprimmo dye
fe-fe-sit
looseum, &c.
That will do, Mr. Rapid
Ah! ha! I told you so.
Yes, yesbut translate.
Translate?! (eyebrows elevating.)
Yes, translate, render it.
Render it!! how's that? (forehead more wrinkled.)
Why, yes, render it into Englishgive me the meaning
of it.
Meaning
!! (staring full in my face, his eyes like
saucers
,
and forehead wrinkled with the furrows of eighty)
Meaning
!! I didn't know it
had
any meaning. I thought
it was a DEAD language!!
Well, reader, I am glad you are
not
laughing at Mr.
Rapid
;
for how should any thing
dead
speak out so as to be
understood? And indeed, does not his definition suit the
vexed
feelings of some young gentlemen attempting to read Latin
without any interlinear translation? and who inwardly,
cursing
both book and teacher, blast their souls if they can make
any sense out of it. The ancients
[3]
[3]
Like the Bible, the dead languages are in bad odour in the
Independent
Republican Common Schools, under
Foreign influence
.
may yet speak in their
own languages to a few; but to most who boast the honour
of their acquaintance, they are certainly dead in the sense
of Solomon Rapid.
Our honourable board of trustees at last met; and after
a real attempt by some, and a pretended one by others, to
elect one and another out of the three dozen candidates,
the Reverend Charles Clarence, A.M., was chosen our
principal and professor of languages; and that to the
chagrin
of Mr. Rapid and other disappointed persons, who all
from that moment united in determined and active hostility
towards the college, Mr. Clarence, Dr. Sylvan, Mr.
Carlton
,
and, in short, towards every puss proud aristocrat
big-bug, and darn'd blasted Yankee in the New Purchase.
CHAPTER XXXV.
Dic mihi, si fueris tu leo, qualis eris?
Let me play the lion too; I will roar that I will do any man's
heart good to hear me; I will roar that I will make the duke say,
`Let him roar again, let him roar again.'
Scarcely
had our college excitements subsided, when
we were favoured by a visit from two apostolic new lights.
These
holely
men worked by inspiration, and had from
heaven patent ways of converting folks by wholesaleby
towns, villages, and settlements; although it must be
owned, the converts would not
stay
converted. And yet
these men did verily do wonders at Woodville, as much so
as if by Mesmerism or Mormonism or Catholicism they
had magnetised and stupefied all our moral and spiritual
phrenological developements! If the doctrine be true, as
some religious editors assert, and we suppose on good
authority
,
that the sect which can in the shortest time convert
the most is the favourite with heaven, then our new lights
deserved the appellation they gave themselves
Christ
ians.
Our priests depended on no high larnin,set no
apples
of gold in frames of silver, but despised man-hatch'd
fillosofees; and we may add, even harmless grammar,
being
as they said poor, unlarn'd, ignorant men, and also,
unshaved, uncomb'd, and fearfully dirt-begrimedclose
imitators, as they insisted, of primitive Christianity. All
they did was goin from house to house a eatin and drinkin
sich as was set afore them, bellowing prayers, snivelling
and sobbing, and slobbering over man, woman, and child,
and a begginin and beseechinin on them to come to
meetin. And as meetings were held at every hour of
every day and every night, we lived on the trot in going
to and from thembecoming thus a very
peculiar
, if not a
very good people.
At meeting, our venerable teachers prayed as loud and
pertinaciously as the priests of Baal, aided, however, by
amateurs in the congregations; yet with it all, we never
advanced beyond oh!-ing and ah!-ing. Still, definite
petitions
were often presented, some for onreginerit
world-lins
,
some for hypocrit professors, and many for
folks what believed in John Calvin's religion and hadn't
never been convarted. But as it was of importance to
have certain persons saved, and the divinity of the new
lights might not fully understand who was meant, names
were metioned in prayer, as dear brother Smith, or poor
2*
dear sister Brown, and sometimes titles were added, as
dear Squire Goodman, or dear Major Meanwell.
I never had the pleasure of hearing the bulls of Bashan
roar; yet, having heard our new light preachers, I can now
form a better conjecture as to that peculiar eloquence; at
all events, our two preachers foamed like a modern bull
worried by boys and butchers' dogs, and never gave over
till exhausted. Often what they said was unknown, as
their words seemed to burst asunder as soon as let out
peculiar shells from wonderful mortars! And these two
personages as far excelled poor Philip in noise, grimace,
and incoherence, as he excelled in those qualities, a
delicate
divine of the nineteenth century, who reads a sleepy
second-rate didactic discourse of a warm afternoon in
dog-days
,
in Pompous Square church; and that when the Rev.
Doctor Feminit fears the bronchitis.
And yet by this
simple
machinery, and well worked, in
about two weeks our new lights had converted every man,
woman, and child in Woodville, except Dr. Sylvan, Mr.
Carlton, and some other half dozen hardened sinners that
would stout it out any how! And now, from every house,
alley, grove, orchard, resounded forth curious groans,
outcries
,
yells, and other hell-a-beloo's of
private prayer!
For all this was called private prayer!the Scriptures,
indeed
,
directing otherwise; but Barton Stone, and Campbell
Stone can do much more with people out there than Peter
Stone the apostle; and men naturally love the fanatical
Pharisaism of pseudo-inspired teachers, councils and
conclaves
.
An opinion was held by most of our fanatics, that direct,
earnest, and persevering prayer would result in the
instantaneous
conversion of any one in whose favour it was
made; and of course to the most opposite creeds! This
naturally led to some ridiculous consequences; for it soon
was argued that if an unregenerate man could be got by
any art or contrivance, or coaxing, to pray right earnestly
for himself, and cry out loud and long for mercy, he would
be immediately converted; nay, it was held to be efficacious
if he could be forced by
physical
means to pray! Hence
among other things of the sort, one of our domestic
chaplains
,
a very large and fat man, now stirred up and
enlivened
by this visit of the good men, overtook a neighbour
in the woods going to meeting, and after having in vain
exhorted
the person to fall right down on his knees and cry
for mercy, he suddenly leaped on the incorrigible rascal,
and cast him to the earth; and then getting astride the
humbled sinner, he pressed him with the weight of 225lbs
avoirdupois, till he cried out with sufficient earnestness and
intensity to get religion! Nor did this convert made
by so novel a papistical engine fall away any sooner than
most other converts mechanically forced, although by
different
contrivanceshe hung on some weeks. Besides,
if little children in western New-York were whipped with
a rod into the kingdom of heaven, why should not a stout
sinner, too big for that discipline, be pommelled into the
same kingdom in the New Purchase, by Bishop Paunch?
And would not more persons have been converted to
Oberlinism, Finneyism, or Abolitionism, or Anyism, if, after
the manner with our new lights, folks had more
frequently
been characterized by their entire names and
employments
,
when prayed for? Indeed, one distinguished lawyer
in Western New-York, always ascribed his non-conversion,
after innumerable prayers made for him in public, and even
by name, to the unfortunate omission of his middle name!
Religious reader! do not mistake us; we are laughing
at Satan's delusions! And we lived long enough to find
true what we once heard a very learned, talented and pious
minister of the Gospel say, that all such excitements from
false religions were sure to be followed by infidelity. Our
evangelical churches were for a time deserted; our family
altars
abandoned; our domestic intercourse ruined; the
Sabbath
desecrated; the sacred name profaned, and his attributes
sneered at; and avowed and flaming converts to fanaticism
were, in two or three years after, reeling drunkards,
midnight
gamblers, open and unblushing atheists! Nay,
assembled
in a certain grog-shop(out there appropriately
called a doggery)three years after did some of the
man-made converts form a horrible crew that tied up
against the wall one of their party in a mock crucifixion!
and setting fire to rum poured on the floor, they called it
the blazes of hell!!
But a religious incident reminds me of my friend,
Insidias
Cutswell, Esq. And his history adds to the many
instances of self-education and self-elevation. His career,
it was said by his political enemies, began with his being a
musician to a caravan of travelling animals; but it argues
great intrinsic genius, that a man ever made the attempt to
rise from such a life, and had skill and tact to use
opportunities
,
by thousands in like circumstances suffered to pass
unheeded. Rise, however, Mr. Cutswell did, till in all
that country he stood
intellectually
pre-eminent, and was
justly celebrated for learning, enterprise, skill in his legal
profession, and, as a political leader. Since then he has
stood on elevated pinnacles, both east and west; and had
his
spiritual
man been good as the
intellectual
, there would
he be still standing;and
perhaps
higher. Contrary to
the old saws, virtue is its own reward and honesty is
the best policy moral excellency does not always meet
with earthly rewards; but yet, the retirement of some
talented men, is occasionally owing to moral causes rather
than political ones. And hence, many lamented that this
gentleman had not been as
good
as he was great.
Mr. C. was a good Latin and Greek scholar, and well
acquainted with antiquities and other subjects cognate
with the classics. He was deeply versed in the books of
law, and extensively read in history, political economy,
agriculture, architecture, chemistry, natural philosophy,
and metaphysics; and he was, moreover, an excellent
orator, using in his speeches the best language and with
the just pronunciation.
But,
[4]
[4]
But
, is here an
adversative
conjunction; commonly employed
after high praise of one's friends.
my friend had two venial faults; one in common
with most politicians out (?) there, and one peculiar to
himself
maybe
.
The first of these, was selfishness, and its consequence
moral cowardice. Hence, little reliance could be placed
in Mr. Cutswell by his friendshis enemies had in this
respect the advantage of his friends. And hence, he had
continual resort to log-rolling expedients; to some of
doubtful morality; and to some positively sinful, in order
to acquire or retain political ascendancy. Still, he was the
most sagacious man I ever knew at making political
somersets
;
for he turned
so
adroitly and
so
noiselessly, as to cheat
the eyes of beholders, and make it doubtful often whether
he was on his head or his feet; indeed, he kept such a
continual whirl as to seem always in the same place, and
yet he was always in a different one! Or to change
figures, he never turned with the tide, but watching the
symptoms of ebbs and flows he turned a little
before
the
tide; and thus, he always passed for a meritorious, patriotic,
people-loving leader of the true and honest partyi. e. the
strongest; instead of a tag-rag and bob tailed follower in
search of loaves and fishes. Yea! he so managed that the
world usually said Well, Cutswell's friends have deserted
him, poor fellow!when all the time Mr. Insidias
Cutswell
,
poor
fellow, had deserted them!
The other foible of his was a grand deportment put on
like a cloak when he entered elevated society, but laid
aside in his chambers or among the canaille. Doubtless
this arose from a mistaken notion of what constitutes good
behaviour as he was passing from the grub to the winged
state; and, maybe, to conceal that he had not always soared
but sometimes creeped. For instance, nothing could
transcend
the pomp of his manner and dress on some occasions,
when from home, unless a New Purchase Gobbler in
the gallanting season; and then his style of taking snuff
when in full costume and under the eye of magnates, was
equal to a Lord Chamberlain'sit made you sneeze to
witness it!
First came an attitudeso grand!it looked as if it had
been studied on a cellar door under the windows of a print
shop, from an engraving of Cook, or Kean, or Kemble in
royal robes at the acme of his sublime! Oh! the
magnificence
of that look! And next, the polished box of
fragrant
sternutatory powder (which he took instead of snuff)
would be extracted from the receptacle of an inner vest, a
single finger and thumb being delicately insinuated for that
duty; and the box thus withdrawn with so bewitching a
grace would then be held a moment or two till my lord
had completed some elaborate period, or till his deep
interest
in the absorbing nothings you were uttering should
seem suspended by your own pausing. At that instant, his
eye glancing in playful alternation from his friend's face to
the box, he would perform a scale of rapid taps on the side
of the box with the index finger of the dexter hand to wake
up the sternutatory inmate; after which, modestly
removing
or opening the lid, he would, in the manner of Sacas,
the Persian cup-bearer, first present the delicious aromatic
for your touch, and then with his own finger and thumb a
moment suspended in a pouncing position, he would
suddenly
dart on to the triturated essence and snatch
hurriedly
thence the tiniest portion possible. Arresting now his
hand half way in its upward flight, the pinch downward
yet at the tips of the finger and the thumb, he would for
the last time look with an interesting smile into his friend's
face, and in the midst of that gay sunshine, suddenly
turning
the pinch under his own olfactory organ, he would inhale
the perfume with the most musical sniffle imaginable!
Retrograde motions and curves of becoming solemnity,
amplitude and grace, would close the box and restore it to
the inner vestand so Mr. Cutswell would have snuffed!
Impatient folks may think it takes long to describe a
pinch; but, then, it took still longer to perform one.
Mr. Cutswell, among other matters, was no mean
performer
on the violin; and on one occasion, at a private
concert at my house, forgetting his usual caution, he
entertained
me with an anecdote about his fiddle and his
Bishop. For be it known, that like other politicians, Mr.
C. was a theoretical member of a religious people, who
looked on fiddle-playing as on the sin of witchcraft
although
I do not know whether he had ever received the
rite of confirmation; yet nothing but his high standing
saved him from an excommunication, that out there would
speedily have been visited on a
poor
player. Still his
Bishop was a faithful shepherd's dog, and hesitated not to
growl and bark, if he did to bite; being, also, one who prayed
for
men sometimes by name, and
at
them often by
description
.
And so he contrived once to pray
at
Mr. Cutswell's
fiddling or rather
against
his
fiddle;
and nothing could
ever so belittle that instrument as this preacher's
periphrastic
abuse of that curious compound of catgut, rosin,
and horsehair.
I was present, said Mr. Cutswell, laying down his
fiddle and bow upon our piano,some few evenings
since, after the discharge of my legal duties at the court
house(
attitude commencing for taking snuff
,)present,
Mr. Carlton, in the prayer-room of our chapel, a large
con-course
of members being congregated for the customary
weekly devotions. (
snuff box out
.) Among others in
the apartment, was our venerable Bishop. (
Box tapped
and opened
.) He is a good and worthy man, sir; but
sub ros
not wholly exempt from prejudice. Indeed, as to
music generally, but more especially that of the violin,
(
finger and thumb pouncing
)he entertains the most
erroneous
sentiments;(
pinch going upwards
)and I fear that
he regards both myself and my instrument with feelings of
acerbity. (
Hem!pinch inhaled
.) In the course of his
prayer this evening, he contrived to administer to myself
in particular;(
lid closing
)but also to you, Mr. Carlton
and all other gentlemen that handle the bow,(
box being
returned
)the following very severe and appropriate
admonition
,
and in the exact words I now quote:
`Oh! Lord! oh!I beseech thee to have marsy on
all them there poor sinners what plays on that
instrumint
,
whose sounds is like the dying screech of that there
animal out of whose intrils its strings is made!'
Amen!at a venture! (Pompey or Csar.)
CHAPTER XXXVI.
Forgive my general and exceptless rashness,
Perpctual sober gods! I do proclaim
One honest manmistake me notbut one.
What find I here?
Fair Portia's counterfeit? what demi-god
Hath come so near creation?
This
chapter is devoted to a man;Mr. Vulcanus
Allheart
.
And, although he will rap our knuckles for smiling
at a few smileable things in him, Mr. Allheart will not be
displeased to see that Mr. Carlton, the author, remembers
his friend, as Mr. Carlton the storekeeper and tanner,
always
said he would, when we blew his bellows for him or
fired rifles together.
During a life some what peculiarly chequered, we have both
by land and sea been more or less intimate with excellent
persons in the learned professions, and in the commercial,
agricultural and mechanical classes; but
never
out of the
circle of kinsfolk, including the
agnati
and the
cognati
,
have I ever so esteemed, ay. so loved any one as Vulcanus
Allheart. And who and what was he?
He was by birth a Virginian, by trade a blacksmith, by
nature a gentleman, and by grace a Christian; if more
need be said, he was a genius. Ay! for his sake to this
hour I love the very sight and smell of a blacksmith's shop;
and, many a time in passing one, do I pause and steal a
glance towards the anvil, vainly striving to make some
sooty hammerer there assume the form and look of my lame
friend!for he was lame from a wound in his thigh
received in early life. Oh! how more than willing would
I stand once more and blow his bellows to help him gain
time for an evening's hunt, could I but see anew that
honest charcoal face and that noble soul speaking from
those eyes, as he rested a moment to talk till his iron
arrived
at the proper heat and colour!
But let none suppose Vuleanus Allheart was a common
blacksmith. He was master both of the science and the
art, from the nailing of a horse-shoe up to the making of
an axe; and to do either right, and specially the latter, is
a rare attainment. Not one in a million could make an
axe as Allheart made it; and hence in a wooden country,
where life, civilization, and Christianity itself, are so
dependent
on the axe, my blacksmith was truly a jewel of a
man. His axes, even where silver was hoarded as a
miser's gold, brought, in real cash, one dollar beyond any
patent flashy affairs from New England, done up in pine
boxes and painted half black, while their edge-part was
polished and shiney as a new razorand like that article,
made not to
shave
but to
sell;
and all this his axes
commanded
,
spite of the universal nation, all-powerful and
tricky as it is. No man in the Union could temper steel
as my friend tempered; and workmen from Birmingham
and Sheffield, who sometimes wandered to us from the world
beyond the ocean, were amazed to find a man in the
Purchase
that knew and practised their own secrets.
Necessity led him to attempt one thing and another out
of his line, till, to accommodate neighbours, (and any man
was
his
neighbour) he made sickles, locks and keys,
augurs, adzes, chisels, planes, in short, any thing for
making
which are used iron and steel. His fame consequently
extended gradually over the West two hundred miles at
least in any direction; for from that distance came people
to have well done at Woodville, what otherwise must have
been done, or a sort of done, at Pittsburgh. Nay, liberal
offers were made to Allheart to induce him to remove to
Pittsburgh; but he loved us too much to accept them; and
beside, he was daily becoming richer, having made a very
remarkable discovery, which, however, he used to impart to
others for a considerationviz. he had found out the
curious
art of beating iron into gold. My friend was indeed
the great Lyon of the West.
[5]
[5]
It is hoped all the Lyon's friends of Philadelphia will patronize
this book.
Mr. Allheart's skill was great also in rifle-making, and
also naturally enough in rifle-shooting. I have compared
Pittsburgh and Eastern and Down-eastern rifles with his,
(for the one concealed in my chamber is a present from
Allheart,) but none are so true, and none have sights that will
permit the drawing of a bead so smooth and round. Does
any maker doubt this? Grant me three months to regain
my former skill, and I stake my rifle against all you have
on hand, that she beats the things, one and all, eighty-five
yards off handor (as I shall only give back your articles)
I'll try you for the fun and glory alone! By the way, do
you shoot with both eyes open? If not, let me commend
the practice, both from its superiority and because it may
save you from killing your own wife, as it did Mr. Allheart
once.
He excelled, we have intimated, as a marksman.
Perhaps
in horizontal shooting he could not have a superior;
for in his hands the rifle was motionless as if screwed in
one of his vices; and thence would deliver ball after ball
at fifty, sixty, or seventy yards, into one and the same augur
hole. For him
missing
was even difficult; and all I had
ever heard of splitting bullets on the edge of axe or knife,
hitting tenpenny nails on the head, and so forth, was
accomplished
by Allheart. And his sight had become like
that of the lynx; for at the crack of the gun he would
himself call out where the ball had struck. Nor is all this
so wonderful if we recollect that many years in proving
rifles he practised daily; indeed target-shooting was a
branch of his businessand in it his skill became rare,
ay! even bewitching!
His place for making these daily trials was at first a
large stump some seventy yards distant on the far side of
a hollow, against which stump was fixed his target; and
along that ravine his wife, a pretty young woman, used to
pass and repass to get water from a spring at the lower end.
Her almost miraculous escape in that ravine I shall give in
Mr. Allheart's own words, although his idiom was slightly
inaccurate and provincial.
You say, why can't we shoot across the holler agin that
ole walnut stump yander? I ain't pinted a rifle across thare
for four yearand never intend to no more.
Why so, Vulcanus? I'm sure 'tis a capital place for
our mark.
Well, Mr. Carlton, I'll tell you, and then you wont
wonder. One day, about six months after we was furst
married, I had a powerful big bore
[6]
[6]
A rifle of large calibrefor war and buffalo.
to fix for a feller going
out West; and so I sit down just here(at the shop door)
to take it with a rest agin a clap-board standing before that
stump, and where I always before tried our guns. I sit
down, as I sort a suspicioned the hind sight mought be a
leetle too fur to the right, and I wanted to shoot furst with
allowance, and then plump at the centre without no
allowance
and
then to try two shots afterwards off-hand. Well,
I got all fixed, and was jeest drawing a fine bead, and had
my finger actially forrard of the front triggur(and she
went powerful easy)and was a holdin my breathwhen
something darkened the sight, and my left eye ketch'd a
glimpse of something atween me and the dimindand I
sort a raised up my head soand there was Molly's head
(Mrs. Allheart's)with the bucket in her hand a goin for
water! She pass'd you know in a instant, almost afore I
could throw up the muzzle; but, Mr. Carlton, if I hadn't
a had both eyes open or no presence of mind, she'd a been
killed to a dead certainty! I unsot the triggurs and went
right in; and for more nor two hours my hand trembled
so powerful I couldn't hold a hammer or use a file. And
that's the reason I never fired across to that ole stump
since, and why I never will agin.
But another reason for shooting with both eyes open is,
that a curious experiment in optics cannot conveniently be
made with one eye closedan experiment taught me by
Mr. Allheart. And hence I would now commend both
our book and the experiment to all spectacle-makers and
spectacle-wearersto all ladies and ladies' gentlemen with
quizzing glassesin fact to all persons with two or more
eyes, and all speculative and practical opticians.
EXPERIMENT.
Place over the muzzle of your loaded rifle a piece of
paste-board about four inches square, and so as entirely to
prevent the
right
eye while looking steadily on the bead in
the hind sight from seeing the diamond mark in the target
placed twenty yards from you; then keep the
left
eye fixed
immoveably on the diamond, and stand yourself without
motion
thus for a few seconds; and then will the thick paper
over your muzzle disappear, and you will see or seem to
see the diamond mark with your
right
eye and mixing with
the beadtouch then your forrard trigger and your ball
is in the centre of the target. A dead rest is indispensable
for this experiment. N.B.If this experiment properly
done fails, I will give you a copy of this work; provided, if
I myself can successfully perform it, you will purchase two
copies.
When it is said Mr. Allheart made rifles, be it
understood
as certain rules of grammar, in the widest sense; for
his making was not like a watch-maker's a mere putting
parts and pieces together, but our artist made first all the
separate parts and pieces, and then combined them into a
gun. He made, and often with his own hand, the barrel
the stockthe lockthe bullet moulds, complete; the
brass, gold, or silver mountings; the gravings, the
everything
!
And each and every part and the whole was so well
executed, that one would think all the workmen required
to make a pin had been separately employed upon the rifle!
He even made the steel gouges for stamping names on his
own work, and also for stamping type-founders' matrices;
he made, moreover, tools for boring musical instruments.
And this last reminds me that Allheart was the most
musical blacksmith I ever knewmore so probably than
our learned blacksmiths. Not only could he play the
ordinary
and extraordinary anvil tunes with hammers of all
sizes, making sparks and points, too, of light flash out
much warmer and far more brilliant than ever sprang from
the goat-strings of the Italian Maestro under the
flaggellating
horse-hair, but Allheart played the dulcimer, a
monotone
instrument shaped like an olian harp, and done with
a plectrum on wire strings; and could, beyond all doubt,
have easily played a sackbut, psaltery and cymbals!
He soon became enamoured of the flute; and on my
proposing
to give him lessons, he purchased an instrument
and attended regularly at my house one or more evenings
of every week for two years, till he became as great a
proficient
as his master, and from that to the present time (as
he lately wrote me) he has been the conductor of the
Woodville
Band. Perhaps my friend's musical enthusiasm may
be better understood from the following little incident. His
hands and fingers were nearly as hard as cast-iron; but
this, while no small advantage in fingering the iron strings
of a dulcimer, or in playing on the sonorous anvil, was a
serious disadvantage in flute-playing; for the indurated
points of his fingers stopped the holes like keys with badly
formed metallic plugs, and permitted the air to leak out.
On several occasions I had admired secretly the fresh and
polished look of his finger-points when he came to take
lessons; till once he accidentally, and with the most
delightful
naivete, unfolded the cause in answer to the
following
indirect query:
You are quite late to-night, Allheart?
Yesrutherbut some customers from Kaintuck
stopped
me, and after that I had to stay till
I filed down my
fingers!
My friend was besides all this a painter. And verily,
as to the lettering of signs, the shading, the bronzing, the
peppering and salting, and so forth, I defy any first-rate
glazier any where to beat Allheart; for he yet does signs
for his neighbours, and more from the goodness of his heart
and the love of the arts than for gain. To be sure,
formerly
he would mis-punctuate a little, placing commas for
periods and periods where no diacritical mark was needed
although I do believe he sometimes, like a wag of a
printer, only followed copy. One thing is certain, he never
improperly omitted a capital, though he may have put such
in where it might have been omitted; but then, this only
rendered the name more conspicuous, and the sign itself
altogether more
capital
.
Lettering was not, however, his sole
forte;
he aspired
to pictorial devices, such as vignettes; and at last he
ventured
boldly upon portraits and even full-length figures.
His own portrait was among the very first he took, and that
by means of a mirror; but, whether from modesty or want
of skill, or want of faithfulness in the glass, the likeness
was not very flattering. And yet one thing done by our
New Purchase artist ought (I speak with becoming
deference
)
to be imitated by many eminent eastern
portrait-painters
.
What is that, sir?
Well, I am actuated by the best of motives, gentlemen,
as it was a peculiarity in Mr. Allheart's finish, by which,
however bad the mere painting, the likeness intended could
always be seen at a glance if you knew how to look.
What was it, sir? we are impatient.
Why, he always painted on the frame of the picture
the name of the person to whom the likeness or
portrait
belonged.
[7]
[7]
In this request of ours I am well satisfied hundreds of bashful
folks cordially unite; so that portrait-painters, if they have benevolent
hearts, will adopt this ingenious expedient.
But the chef-d'uvre of Allheart was a full-length figure
of the American Goddess, Liberty, done for the sign of the
new hotelthe Woodville House. He was engaged at
this picture, during the intervals stolen from his smithery,
one whole summer: and many were the wondering
visitors
,
from far and near, that favoured the artist with their
company and remarks. For most matters here done in
private
were with us then done in public,this of course
being conducive to the perfection of the fine arts. And
hence it is not surprising that Allheart, profiting by the
endless remarks and suggestions of our democratical people,
should have embodied all the best sentiment of the purest
republicans in nature, and given to the Purchase the very
beau ideal
of American Liberty.
I shall attempt no elaborate critique, but shall say enough
to help intelligent readers to a fair conception of this piece
The Goddess, like a courageous and independent
divinity
,
stood, Juno fashion, right straight up and down the
canvass, and with immoveable and fearless eyes fronted the
spectator and looked exactly into his face; thus
countenancing
persecuted freemen, to the confusion of all
tyrannical
oppressors! Her face, in size and feature, was a
model for wholesome Dutch milkmaids to copy after; but
the cheeks, instead of blushing, were, I regret to say, only
painted red, like those of an actress too highly rouged.
In the right hand was a flag-staff, less indeed than a
liberty-pole or Jackson-hickory, but considerably larger
every way than a broom-handle; and on its top was hung,
exactly in the centre, a capthus by its perfect balance
and equi-distances of all parts of the rim from the staff,
showing that liberty is justice, and is independent and
impartial
.
The cap had, however, an ominous resemblance
to one of Jack Ketch's; and no doubt foreign despots,
ecclesiastical and secular, will pull said article over
Liberty's
eyes, if they succeed in apprehending and hanging
her.
On the left shoulder squatted a magnificent eagle in all
the plenitude of stiff golden feathers, and in the act of
being-a-going
to drink from a good sized bowl held up by the
left-hand
fingers of the goddess. What was the mixture could
not be seenthe bowl was so highbut most probably it
was a sleeping-potion, as the bird seemed settled for a
night's roost. Nay, this was the sentiment intendedto
mark a time of profound peace, like shutting the gates of
Janus: and hence the eagle held in his claws no arrowy
thunder and lightning, being evidently disposed to let kings
alone to take their naps, if they would let him alone to take
his. The idea was equal in sublimity to Pindar's eagle
snoozing on Jupiter's sceptre at the music of Orpheus;
although my friend's bird was uncommonly big and heavy
but then his goddess was hale and hearty.
The drapery or dress was a neat white muslin slip then
fashionable in Kentucky, which was the Paris whence we
derived fashions; and this simple attire was tied gently
under
the celestial bosom, which was heaved far up towards
the chin, as if the heart was swollen with one endless and
irrepressible emotion, and threatened some day or other to
sunder the tie and burst right out, breast and all, through
the frail barrier of the frock! Yet doubtless the slip was
high in the back, and,
a l Kaintuque
, well secured between
the shoulders, so that if things gave way in the front, there
was still some support from behindbut then it looked
dangerous
.
The frock was, however, undeniably starched and
rather too short(owing maybe to the upward heave of the
bosom, as is the case sometimes with dresses from ill-made
or too much tournure and bustle,)for the article stood
forth, not from the
canvass
but from the
person
, and all smooth
and unwrinkled as if just from under the hot
smoothing-iron
!
And, alas! its great brevity(and the figure up so
Vol. II.3
high too)revealed the sturdy ankles away up till they
began
to turn into limbs!
The feet, unlike Liberty's martyrs in the Revolution, and
to indicate our advance in comfort and security, and perhaps
in compliment to a ladies' shoe-maker just established next
the Woodville House, were covered with a pair of red
morocco slippers; while on the ankles and upwards were
drawn
nice white stockingsso that there was no denudity
of limb, as a lady-reader may have feared, and the
fashionable
frock was not
so
bad after all. Some error, perhaps,
in foreshortening had happened as to the position of the
feet, or rather the red moroccos; for, while the artist
designed
to represent the right foot as stepping from the
other, and the left, as pointing the shoe-toe at the spectator
immediately in front, yet the right shoe was fixed
horizontally
with its heel at a right angle with the other, and that
other, the left hung perpendicularly down as if broken at
the instepa marvellous likeness to the two slippers on
the shoe-maker's own sign, one there with its sole slap
against the board, and the other up and down as if hung
upon a peg.
And oh! how I
do
wish I had not been born before the
era of composition books!or only now could take a few
lessons with the author of one!so as write with all the
modern improvements, like the talented family of the
Tailmaquers
in the leading magazines and other picture books
for grown up children!I should so like to describe the
putting up of our new tavern post, and the first hanging of
the Goddess of Liberty! But that's not for the like of me
I'm no orator as Brutus. How can I paint the
open-mouthed
wonder of that crowd! How make you see the
hunchings!the winks!the nods!the pointings!or
hear the exclamations!the queries!the allowings!
the powerfuls!the uproar? And when lawyer Insidias
Cutswell, candidate for Congress, mounted the hoss block
at the post, and ended his half-hour's speechoh! I never!
EXTRACT.
Beautiful, indeed, fellow-citizens, vibrates
above us in the free air and sunshine of Heaven, that
picture
!
but more beautiful even is our own dear, blood-bought
liberty! Long! long may her
sign
dance and rejoice
there
(pointing up)long, long may her image repose
here(slapping the chest and rather low)and long, long,
long
live our enterprising townsman and fellow-citizen, who,
untaught, has yet so ably embodied all that is substantial
and solid, and upright and unflinching and
stable
in abstract,
glorious, lovely libertyour townsman, Allheart!
But Non possumus omnia must be our moral and
conclusion.
CHAPTER XXXVII.
His tears run down his beard, like winter's drops
From caves of reeds.
Early
this autumn, Aunt Kitty having after
considerable
unfixings got us fixed, returned to Glenville, whither
we all at the same time paid a flying visit. At our arrival,
we found true the report that John was defeated in his
views on the clerkship by a majority against him of eleven;
and that our ex-legislator had now leisure to collect the
debts due Glenville & Co.debts increased by two
political
campaigns into a puttee powerful smart little heap.
This business would have been altogether easy and
pleasant, but for two small obstacles; most of our debtors
who were very willing indeed to pay, had no visible pro
perty; and the rest were even invisible themselves! For,
pleased with the credit system in the Purchase, they had
gone to try it elsewhere, and had become suddenly so
unmindful
of the powerfullest smartest man and darndest
cleverest feller in the county, as to go away without one
tender adieu! The fact is, our
dear
old friends had
absquatulated
,
and gone away off somewhere to give other
candidates
a sort of a lift
.
But important changes almost destructive of Glenville
Settlement
,
were now on the eve of accomplishment. Mr.
Hilsbury had, his health being ruined, resigned his bishopric
with all its emoluments, and was about returning to the far
east; and Uncle Tommy from an irrepressible spirit of
wandering, was just starting to go and build a cabin on Lake
Michigan.
[8]
[8]
If still there, somebody out there can make a book.
And so, we had come in time to bid farewell!
How melancholy the houses already, seemed so soon to
be tenantless, and then so soon to moulder and fall into
ruins;a deserted cabin quickly changes, like a body left
by the vital spark! Ah! how dreary the forest would be
without friends! I had no spirits to hunt; although I
wandered away and sat down on the bank of the creek
opposite
the little islet where the deer lay down to diebut
without my rifleit was to weep! Reader! if you have
a soul you will not laugh at me;and if you have none,
then laugh away, poor creature, why should you not enjoy
yourself your own way?but dear reader with a soul, I
after that went and sat down in the old bark-mill. And
there I recalled the morning we stumbled down the
opposite
cliff into Uncle John's open armsI saw the very spot
where the mother had clasped the daughter to her bosom,
and lifted up her voice and weptand the sad spot too
where that mother now rested in the lonely grave! I
remembered
the fresh revival of early dreams and visions
realized in the novelty of a wild forest life!ay! I
recalled
the oddity of my laboursand even that poor mute, but
not wholly irrational companion!and when I felt in my
soul that changes had come and were yet coming, and that
I never, no,
never
, could be in these woods as I had been
I even wept there, too, reader!not loud indeed, but
bitterly
!
In a few days we took a mournful farewell of the two
families going from Glenville; and with no expectation of
ever meeting again in this life. True, some of these
persons
,
wanderers like ourselves, we did meet for a brief
space in other parts of the United States again; but others
we have never seen since the morning of our separation.
And at this hour we know not where Uncle Tommy lives
or if dead, where his grave is! In this work, however,
there will be no further mention of these two families.
During the past summer Uncle John had been appointed
a lay delegate from the Welden Diocese to attend an
ecclesiastical
convention about to meet early this fall at
Vincennes
;
and he now, before our return to Woodville,
obtained
my promise to accompany him. Accordingly, a few
days after our return, he, and with him Bishop Shrub,
called
on me, and we three set out for the Convention, or as
all such gatherings are there calledthe Big Meeting.
The weather was luxurious, and the ride across the
small prairies was to me, who now for the first time saw
these natural meadows, indescribably bewitching; indeed,
this first glimpse of the prairie world was like beholding an
enchanted country! The enchanted land in that most
transcendently enchanting book, the Pilgrim's Progress,
came so naturally to one's mind, that surely Bunyan must
have imagined a world like this meadowy land of wild and
fragrant scents wafted by balmy airs from countless myriads
of blossoms and flowers! Nothing is like the mellow
light, as the sun sinks down far away behind the cloudless
line of blended earth and skyas if there one could, at a
step, pass from the plane of this lower world through the
hazy concave into the world of the ransomed! The
bosoms of these grassy lakes undulate at the slightest
breeze, and are sprinkled with picturesque islets of timber,
on which the trees are fancifully and regularly disposed,
suggesting an arrangement by the taste of an unrecorded
people of bygone centuries for pleasure and religion. The
whole brought back delusive dreamswe felt the strange
and half-celestial thrill of a fairy scene!
But pass we to a more earthly one. Eight miles from
Vincennes we stopped at a friend's house to shave and
preach; for among western folks a bishop is supposed to
be made for preaching and we use him accordinglyand
not infrequently we use him entirely up. The preaching was
in due season easily performed, but the shaving, ah! there's
thescrape! Bishop Shrub was fortunately shaved close
enough to last to Vincennes; not so Uncle John and
myself
.
And when the old gentleman examined his
saddle-bags
,
alas! alas! by an unaccountable negligence our razors
and concomitants had been left at Woodville! But this
forgetfulness was promptly supplied, I may add, and
punished
also by our host; for he offered his own razora
curious cutting tool in a wooden handle nearly as large and
quite as rough as a corn-cob! The bone handle, or
make-believe-turtle
one, had, in the course of ages, been worn
away by the handling of grandsires and grandsons; and so
had the edge itself by the ferocious stubble on the chins
of woodsmen! Or perhaps it had been tritered away on a
grindstonethe thing so much resembled a farmer's knife
done up for hog-killing!
Now Uncle John's countenance (?) was tender asa
lamb's. Hence his razors were always in prime order;
and when he and I shaved with his articles in company, he
always insisted on thefirst shave. But to-day, the
excellent
old gentleman most condescendingly gave me the
precedence, internally resolving to watch my performance
and success, and then to shave or not accordingly. Well,
duly appreciating this unusual condescension, and thinking
it a pity Uncle John should enter Vincennes with such a
crop as his chin now held, we also secretly purposedviz.
to go through the whole affair without one audible or
visible
sign of torture! For certain was it, that if Mr. Carlton
whose face was just as lamb-like as Mr. Seymour's, shaved
without wincing, certain was it, Uncle John, long before
my complete abrasion, would be so in the suds that, for
consistency's sake, he must go through the whole scrape
before he would get out it.
Hence I strapped the oyster-knife, first on the instep of
my boot, making there, however, an ominous scratch or
two; then on the cover of a leaven-bit Testament done up
in freckled leather; and finally, although very lightly, on
the palm of my hand
secundum artem:
after which I made a
feint at a hair, and then laid down the tormentor with so
complacent compression of my lips as to say, that
notwithstanding
looks, the razor after all was jeest the very
thing! Next, with a small bundle of swine's bristles tied
in the middle with a waxed thread, I applied, out of a
broken blue tea-cup, as much brown soap lather to my face
as would stick; and then with a genuine far-east barber's
flourish, touched the vile old briar-hook to my cheek,
boldly andlightly as possible.
Reader! I did not swear in those days, but I could not
avoid saying mentallyO-o-oh! go-o-od! gramine!!
and thinking of Job and the barrel of ale. Some profane
wretches would have cursed right out as horribly as Pope
Pius or Innocent, the
vice
-god damning and blackguarding
a Calvinistic heretic; and for which malignancy the said
Pope deserves to be scraped over his whole divine carcass
twice a-day with the above razor, and without the
alleviation
of the brown soap. Happily for the success of my
benevolent statagem I kept in; for at the moment I caught a
glimpse of uncle John's face peeping over my shoulder into
the tiny bit of looking-glass, and with his spectacles on!
But if he did detect the involuntary
tear
in my eye, and take
the alarm, he became instantly calm again by seeing the
smile
on my lip! Blood he discerned not; the tool was
guiltless of all cutting, and brought away no beard save
what it pulled out by the roots. Hence uncle John was
most essentially bamboozled; and long before my beard
was all plucked up, he had laid aside his coat and cravat,
and according to custom and to soften his beard, he was
lathering away with the hog bristles and brown soap.
Had the old gentleman taken a peep now, he must have
smelled the rat; for, spite of pain and tears, my laugh was
too broad for mere delectability from a good shavethere
was mischief and, I fear, some hypocrisy in the scarcely
suppressed chuckle. However, being done, or scraped, I
put down the eradicator with the air of one willing to shave
all day with such a razor; upon which Uncle John
advanced
and took up the thing, manifesting, indeed, a little
suspicion on glancing at its edge, and yet with very
commendable
confidence too; and then after the usual
strappings
and flourishings, he seized his nose with the left
hand, and with the right laid the scraper sideways on a
cheek, and essayed a rapid and oblique sweep towards his
ear.
Ah! me!if I live a thousand more years, I shall ever
be haunted by the dear old gentleman's look! Such a
compound
of surprise, and vexation, and pain, and fun, and
humour! Such a Carltonyourascalyou!if I don't
never mind! expression as met my view while I
peeped
over his shoulder into the fragment of glass against the
wall! And then as he espied me therein grinning, when
he turned, and with eyes swimming in tears, uttered in a
whisper, and between a cry and a laugh, his favourite
expression
of benevolence and amazementOh!cry!
out!
Yes! yes! if one could have cried out, or even laughed
out! But there was our host and all his family; and the
father kept on at very judicious intervals with praise of
that razor, thus:Powerful razor that, Mr. Carlton!
Grandaddy used to say he'd shaved with it when he was
young, Mr. Seymour! and his face was near on about as
saft as yourn I allow. However its getting oldish now,
and don't cut near as sharpish as it once didallow it
wants grinding: still I wouldn't give it for are another two
I ever seen.
Could one dare venture to complain about such a razor?
against which no dog had even wagged a tongue or a tail
for a hundred years! So we cried in and laughed in then
but when we got out of sight and hearing in the prairie!
Nobody, I fear, would have conjectured we were going to
the big meeting. Poor dear, old Uncle John! I am
laughing
even now at thy beloved face in that most furious lather
of brown soap! and with that grand swathe cut through
towards
thy ear by that venerable briar-hook!ay! and at
that concentration of kindness, surprise, and joke-taking
embodied inOh! cry out!
But, la! me! Mr. Carlton, where's the moral of this
story?
My dear madam, some stories have no moral; but the
design is to warn you never to travel in new settlements if
your face is tender without your own shaving apparatus.
For shame!ladies never shave.
Oh! my!the sentence is carelessly constructed; but
none can say where beards may not grow next. Certainly
3*
they are now found, if not on girls' chins, yet on very
girlish
faces. And agriculture of all kinds is now better
understood
,
and the most unpromising soils produce the most
astonishing crops: and besides, we are evidently in the
Hairy Age, and tobacco is puffed and spurted from hairy
lips like black mud from a quagmire
Sir! this is offensive!
Very; therefore let us quit it.
CHAPTER XXXVIII.
When holy and devout religious men
Are at their
beads
, 'tis hard to draw them thence.
Love and meckness, lord,
Become a churchman better than ambition.
On
reaching Vincennes our party, as others, were
quartered
upon the citizens; and such kindness as belongs
preeminently
to the West and South was bestowed upon us
during the week of the convocation.
Vincennes has been the scene of many meetings, civil,
political, ecclesiastical, and military; to say nothing about
Frenchified-Indian-councils and Indianised-French-dances,
and other odd things produced by this amalgamation of the
red and white savages. But now it was the theatre of
two remarkable exhibitions,the gathering of a Protestant
council, and the erection of a Papistical cathedral!strange
meeting of light and darkness. And both professed to be
for the propagation of the religion of Jesus Christ.
Now, whether the simple shining of truth in the reading
and preaching of a vernacular Bible, and in the good lives
and examples of puritanic Christians, and without aid from
the civil arm, and without a base indulgence of men's evil
passions and propensities, shall be more potent than a
tradition
,
dark, bewildering, and uncertain, delivered by
doctors
and professors of the faggot and the thumb-screw,
admits
a question; but, judging from the success that has
always attended the affectionate embraces of the old woman
with the scarlet mantle, and especially when seated amid
the wimples and crisping-pins, the roasters, and boilers,
and toasters of the Inquisition,from the efficacy of sweet
doses and sugared cups and intoxicating bowls of
indulgences
granted to the saints and holy ones, it is more than
likely that the great crowd of such as love darkness and
the wages of unrighteousness, and prefer the pleasures
of sin for a season, will(and are not such the
)
will become militant, and on earth triumphant members of
the Holy (?) Catholic (??) Church (???)
In vain, while looking at the sacred walls of the
cathedral
rising brick by brick, did I severely chide my antagonist
feelings as heretical pravity; in vain recall the oft-repeated
remark, that we were in the nineteenth century, the age
of courtesy, and charity, and light, and wisdom, and oh!
of ever so many first chop good things beside; in vain
remember
that human nature had been gradually refining ever
since the days of Judas Iscariot, till it was now ten per
cent. per annum better and more spiritual and
heavenly-minded
;
yea, poor sinner that I was, in vain I said this is
the march of mind, and that I was, poor sneaking doubter,
in danger of falling into the rear of my age! Nothing
would dobut my historic readings kept intruding in the
most impertinent and unbecoming manner; and I was
abominably
harassed with the fables of the Vaudoisand
Huguenotsand Jeromeand Hussand St.
Bartholomew's
,
and Irish, and other massacres, and all such
ridiculous
things! Nay, I was plunged most unreasonably
into nasty dungeons, and saw racks, and halters, and
augurs
,and,
silly creature, I imagined an
auto da fe!
and
heard shouts and groans! and smelled incense, faggots and
gunpowder! and even
Te Deums
for the death of ungodly
heretics wickedly killed by the
state
, contrary to the
entreaties
of the Holy Church! Alas! reprobate that I was,
for reading books proscribed by that Church!and all those
books got up by folks worthy of no creditenemies of the
Church and of the Pope,and who would wickedly tell
when they were tortured, and refused to be damned for
ever by escaping from prison, gibbets and stakes!
And then I said, Oh! you unreasonable man, has not
the Holy Catholic Church long since given up her bloody
persecuting principles, and resolved
never
to do so again,
if we will only take on her yokeuntil she gets the power?
Alas! I thought of political mottos used as
ornaments
[9]
[9]
Ornamentssince most such papers watch only their
Protestant
friends who do not
need
it.
to
secular newspapers, such as Power steals from the many
to the few; and of that narrow, bigotted puritanical
sentiment
,
The heart is deceitful above all things and
desperately
wicked; and so I turned to contemplate
THE PROTESTANT CONVOCATION.
And I could not but feel grateful to the rightful Head of the
spiritual Church, that here was a little band hated of Rome
and Oxford. For with the men of this conference the true
light had travelled thus far westward, and we hoped it
might shine out far and wide over the noble plains, and
dispel the gloom of the grand forestssince the march of
the mind is only an evil without the march of the Bible.
This Protestant assembly was a gathering of delegates
principally from the land of Hoosiers and Suckers; but
with a smart sprinkling of Corn-crackers, and a small chance
of Pukes from beyond the father of floods, and even one or
two from the Buckeye country. These were not all
eminent
for learning, and polish, and dress, wearing neither
gowns nor cocked-hats; although some there were worthy
seats in the most august assemblies any where, and
however
distinguished for wit, learning, and goodness. Most
of them, indeed, carried to excess a somewhat false and
dangerous maxim: better wear out than rust out,since
it is better to do neither. And worn truly were they, both
in apparel and body, as they entered the town on jaded
horses, after many days of hard and dangerous travelling
away from their cabin-homes, left far behind in dim woods
beyond rivers, hills and prairies.
And what came they together for? Mainly, I believe,
to preach, to pray, to tell about their successes and
disappointments
and encouragementstheir hopes, and fears,
and sorrowsto rectify past errors, and form better plans
of doing good for the futureto see, and encourage, and
strengthen one another. Business, in the
semi-politico-ecclesiastical
sense, they did littlefor of that was but little to do.
And there were few causes of heart burning and jealousy.
No richly endowed professorships, no
a l mode
congregations
were found in all their vast extent of diocesses
no world's treasures or places to tempt to divide, to sour!
Truly it was a House of Bishops, if not of
Lords:
if by
a bishop is meant one that has the care of many
congregations
,
an enormous parish, abundant religious labours, and a
salary of one or two hundred dollars above nothing. In
the midst of so fraternal and cheerful a band of misters and
brothers, I was constantly reminded of an old saying;
Behold
!
how these Christians love one another! What could
exceed their cordial and reciprocal greetings at each arrival?
What their courtesy in debate? What the deep interest in
each other's welfare?the lively emotions excited by their
religious narratives and anecdotes? And then their tender
farewells! To many the separation was final as to this
lifebut why should that make us sad? They who find
heaven begun on earth, meet beyond the grave, and there
find heaven consummated!
Brother Shrub and myself were entertained, during the
convention week, at the house of a medical gentleman,
eminent in his profession, but addicted, it was said, to
profanity
in ordinary conversation. Without a premonition, no
suspicion of so blameworthy a practice could have arisen in
our minds; for no real Christian ever showed guests greater
courtesy, or seemed so far from profaneness than our
gentlemanly
host. He did not even annoy us with lady-like
mincings, putting forth the buddings of profanity in la!
me!good gracious! and the like.
But on Sabbath night, our conversation taking a religious
turn, the subject of profane swearing was incidentally
named, when I could not resist the temptation of drawing
a bow at a venture; and so I said:
Doctor, we leave you to-morrow; and be assured we
are very grateful to Mrs. D. and yourself; but may I say
dear sir, we have been disappointed here?
Disappointed!
Yes, sir, but most agreeably
In what, Mr. Carlton?
Will you pardon me, if I say we were misinformed,
and may I name it?
Certainly, sir, say what you wish.
Well, my dear sir, we were told that Doctor D. was not
guarded in his languagebut surely you are
misrepresented
Sir, interrupted he, I
do
honour you for candour; yet,
sir, I regret to say, you have not been misinformed. I do,
and, perhaps, habitually use profane language; but, sir, can
you think I would swear before religious people, and one of
them a clergyman?
Tears stood in my eyes (the frank-heartedness of a
gentleman always starts them) as I took his hand, and
replied
:
My dear sir, you amaze us! Can it be that Doctor D.,
so courteous and so intelligent a man, has greater reverence
for
us
than for the venerable
God!
Gentlemen, replied the Doctor, and with a tremulous
voice, I never did before see the utter folly of profane
swearing. I will abandon it for ever.
Reader, are you profane? Imitate the manly recantation
of my estimable friend, Doctor D.
To
Swear
is neither
brave, polite
, nor
wise:
You would
not
swear upon the bed of death
Reflectyour Maker
now
could stop your breath!
During the week, in company with some clergymen, we
visited the grave of a young man, who, unavoidably
exposed
to a fatal illness in discharging his missionary duties,
had died at Vincennes in early manhood, and far away
from his widow-mother's home. Deep solemnity was in
the little company of his classmates as they stood gazing
where rested the remains of the youthful hero! Dear
young man, his warfare was soon endedand there he lay
among the silent ones in the scented meadow-land of the
far west! He heard not the voice of the wind, whether it
breathed rich with the fragrance of wild sweets, or roared
around in the awful tones of the hurricane, sweeping over
the vastness of the measureless plains! Nor heard he the
sighs of his comradesnor saw their sudden tears wiped
away with the stealthy motion of a rapid hand!
To him that visit was vain; not so to us, for we departed,
resolved ourselves to be ready for an early death. And
since then several of that little company of mourners in a
strange land have themselves, and before the meridian of
life, gone down to the sides of the pit!
Are you ready, my reader?
Time is a price to buy eternity!
CHAPTER XXXIX.
Tree! why hast thou doffed thy mantle of green
For the gorgeous garb of an Indian queen?
With the umbered brown and the crimson stain
And the yellow fringe on its 'broidered train?
And the autumn gale through its branches sighed
Of a long arrear, for the transient pride.
Sigourney
.
Uncle
John and I, being now very near Illinois, where
resided a distant relative of ours, determined to pay him a
visit. This person was much like uncle Tommy in his
leather-stocking propensities, but in no other respects;
except
that he was, at first, a squatter, and had escaped on
some occasions, being scalped by the Indians. Once, too,
he escaped an ambuscade as he descended the Ohio
river with several other young men in a boat. Incautiously
approaching too near the bank, our relative was saved from
death by being in the act of bending to his oar at the flash
of the Indian rifles; for their balls, barely passing over his
back, struck the breast of a comrade, who fell dead at his
side. But, before the enemy could reload, the boat was
rowed beyond their reach. And so our friend lived, and
ever since had kept on growing till he now had become a
venerable and patriarchal Sucker, counting some sixty-five
concentric circles in his earthly vegetation.
Our way led through successive and beautiful little
prairies
,
separated by rich bottom lands of heavy timber and
other interposing woody districtsthe trees being all
magnificently
glorious in the autumnal colours of their dense
foliage. No artificial dyes rival the scarlet, the crimson,
the orange, the brown, of the sylvan dressesgiant robes
and scarfs, hung with indescribable grandeur and grace,
over the rough arms and rude trunks of the forest!
And voices enough of bird, and beast, and insect, and
reptile, rose at our approach from the bosom of the wavy
grass, to break the solitude of the treeless plains; but, on
entering a district of wood, the uproar of tones, voices,
shrieks, hisses, barkings, and a hundred other nameless
cries, was deafening! It was bewildering! How like the
enchanted hills and groves of the Arabian Tales! Indeed,
had a penalty awaited our looking around, we should have
become stone, or stump, or paroquet, or squirrel, a thousand
times over and over, much to our surprise and mortification!
The bewildering tumult assailing him, on entering the
solemn
dark of primitive oriental forests, must have suggested
to the Magician of the Thousand and One Nights, some
of the charms and witcheries and incantations that entranced
our first years of boyhood and dreams! To the elfish notes
of four-footed and creeping goblins and winged and gay
sprites, were added the rustle of fresh fallen leaves, the
crackling of brush-wood, the rattling of branch and bush,
the strange creaking of great trees, rubbing in amity their
arms and boughs, and the wailing and moaning of fitful
winds; and this formed our sinless Babel.
Under the most favourable arrangement of lungs, and
larynx and ears, conversation is a labour in such groves
and meadows; but, ah! my dear friend, if one's comrade
is deaf! or still worse if he is a modest man of the
muttery
and whispery genus! and hearing uncommonly
sharp himself, takes for granted you hear ditto! True, if
you like to do talking, and the other hearing, that is the
very thing; but alas! our escort in this episodial trip,
who was a Mr. Mealymouth, was even more desirous of
talking than hearing! And what made it more awful, it
was not possible to answer him in the Amen-at-a-venture
mode; for most of Mr. Mealymouth's queries, which were
numerous as a pedlar's from the land of guesses, admitted not
the mere answer
yes
or
no
, but demanded explanatory replies
like those of Professor Didactic. He asked to find out what
you
knew
, and not to be
answered
.
Uncle John quickly contrived to shuffle out of this scrape,
and with a most unchristian design to take revenge for the
razor affair; but then he ought not to have paid back with
so terrible an interest. Nay, he lagged just in our rear,
every now and then switching my creature, till the huzzy
(a lady horse)feared to quit the side of the escort's horse
(a horse-horse)and so kept on even a head with him,
pace for pace, trot for trot, shuffle for shuffle; her eyes
strained backward, her ears pointed and tremulous, and
her heels in the panlo-ante-future tense of
being-nearly-about-a-going-to-kick
;while
I, completely snared and
in-for-it, could be seen, all eye and ear, with my neck
away out forward to catch the sense of Mr. Mealymouth
muttering and whispering some half-articulate question
direct or indirect, thus:
WellCarltpowerfuldon'tallow?
Si-i-i-r? at the top of my voice to provoke him to a
higher pitch.
Most powerful good meetreckondont?
Oh! yes, rather lean, however,it wasn't stall fed
think it was?(I thought he alluded to the beefsteak at
breakfast.)
Meetinmeetinconvochard heerinallow?
The leaves rattle sooh! yes, noble set of good men.
Mr. CarltonallowMr. Seymourain't he?
Yes!no! And turning round I bellowed out;
Hullow! Uncle John, ride up, Mr. Mealymouth wants
you!
Road too narrow'fraid of things getting rubbed in
my saddle-bags,replied Uncle J.
Here I politely made a movement to fall in the rear and
give up my privilege; but my skittish jade, catching sight
of Uncle John's upraised switch, snorted, and cocking back
her ears trotted me up again to the place of punishment
while from Uncle John's face, it was plain enough he was
indulging in a malicious inward laugh. Nay, although I
hate to tell it, he actually put up his finger against his
cheek and made signs of shaving!a pretty way for a
pious man of returning good for evil!
I shall not detail all my misapprehensions nor
contrivances
to avoid answering at hazard, as for instance,
suddenly
crying out, when expected to reply to a query
See! see! that deer!orHurraw! for the turkeys
there!orSmell cowcumbersguess a rattlesnake's
near? Nor shall I relate how, at last, I did get behind
Uncle John; and how Mr. M. fell back and rode with him;
I ever and anon admonishing Mr. Seymour to take care of
his saddle-bags;nor how Uncle John was attacked with
a very uncommon and alarming stiffness, rendering it
necessary for him to dismount and walk a whole mile;
and how he over took us at the ford of the Wabash, Mr.
M. fortunately volunteering to lead his horse; but I hasten
to say that about evening we reached the house of a friend
who had invited us to call on him, and that here, to crown
the pleasures of the day, we found our host Mr. Softspeech
was even more inarticulate in speech than Mr. Mealymouth
himself.
Uncle John now proposed to bury the hatchet, and form
a league of offence and defence; hence, after due
deliberation
while out washing and wiping, it was concluded
that we both sit together, and always in front of the fire;
thus keeping our innocent tormentors each at opposite sides
of the chimney place. For first, this would do them a
service
by compelling them to talk out, it seeming impossible,
if they designed speaking to one another at all, to do it
long in a mutter; and secondly, if we were assailed by
either enemy right or left, we should have four ears to
defend
and aid us, instead of two, and so we could together
compound a pretty fair answer:this judicious
arrangement
made us nearly equal to a Siamese twins.
And yet, one important matter was found to have been
overlookedthe effect on our risibility. For when the
two cousins of Simongosoftly began a gentle stir of
murmuring
lips, and both found, in despite of keen ears, that
articulate language
must
be used; and when evident
vexation
from their reciprocal mutters and mistakes arose, and
they looked at one another in a style like saying, Blast
you, why don't you speak louderOh! dear reader,
would you have believed it. Uncle John all at once laughed
right out!and then you know I couldn't help itcould I?
But then, the old gentleman turned it so adroitly, thus:
Mr. Carlton,said hewhenever I think of that
trick you served me about the razor I can't help laughing.
And of course that affair was narrated; and we had the
satisfaction of finding our two friends could laugh like
Christians, if they could not talk like them. And truly
man
is
pretty much of a laughing animaland certainly
none deserves to be more laughed at; although for this
vile sin of muttering, and grumbling, and whispering out
words with a fixed jaw, and eyes half-shut up like a dreamy
cat in the sunshine, words, that should be articulated in
the sweet vocality of human speech, the whole abominable
tribe of Mealymouths deserves not only to be laughed and
hooted at, but actually well scourged.
Well, we paid our visit to our Sucker relative; and then,
after the two worthy old gentlemen had exhausted their
reminiscences, and edified one another with adventures in
hunting, and fishing, and camping out, and voyaging, and
so on, we bade farewells; and Uncle John and myself, but
without an escort, took the homeward trail. The accidents
in the path belong to the next chapter.
CHAPTER XL.
Being skilled in these parts, which, to a stranger
Unguided and unfriended, often prove
Rough and inhospitable.
On
the return, our first night was passed with the host
of the antediluvian razor. But going into the woods we
needed
now no shaving; although we shortly became entangled
in another scrape, to be estimated in comparison and
contrast
,
according to the tenderness of one's face, and his
leggins
and trousers.
Let me not forget that, before reaching Razorville, we
had passed through a primitive world, an antique French
settlement; and in it could be discerned no trace of modern
arts and inventions; but agriculture, architecture and other
matters were so ancient that we seemed to have come
among aboriginal Egyptians or Greeks. The carts or
wagons were like the wain of Ceres, and moved on
spokeless
wheels of solid wood, without naves, and, if
circumsference
applied to wheels must be a circle, without
circumference
.
The horseif such may be called a dwarf, shaggy
pony, so dirty and earthy as to seem raised in a crop, like
turnips or potatoesthis villanous and cunning horse was
tied to the Cerealian vehicle by thongs of elm bark,
fastened
to a collar of corn blades around his neck; and he had
a head-gear of elm bark ropes for halter or bridlebut
sometimes he had no head-gear whatever. He was driven
usually by flagellation from a stick-whip, in size between
a switch and a pole, yet often with a corn-stalk fourteen
feet long without its tassel, and, not infrequently, by a clod
or rock
[10]
[10]
All minute pieces of granite, &c., are called
rocks
out there
but even
little
things there are
big
.
thrown against his head or side.
At the first hint from the persuasives, shaggy coat would
merely shake his head and look up, and then, with an
impudent
flourish of a tail compounded of burs and
horse-hair
,
he would pull awaynot, indeed, at his loadbut at
the corn-blades and ears dangling in plenty about his
unmuzzled
mouth. On a repetition of the hint, especially if
accompanied by a Canadianised-French execration(and
its potency may be thus judged)pony would whisk with
his cart some half-dozen decided jerks, attended by the
rattling of his corn-collar, the straining of bark traces, and
the screeching of dry wheel and axis;
minus
also a mess
of corn bounced from the wain at every jerk. And thus
matters proceeded, with iterations of thumps, pelts, curses,
and outcries on one side, and jerks ahead on the other, till
the horse and wagon was clear of the corn-fieldand then
look out! Pony had now no more to expect in the way of
mouthfuls till he reached the stack-yard, and so, go ahead
was his mottoand, with him, no idle sentiment! True,
the machine wabbled and bouncedthat was owing to the
inartificiality of the workmanship, and the asperities of the
ground; the load jumped over the sides or rattled from the
tailthat was because the sides were too low, and there
was no tail-board; perhaps, even the collar broke, and
little
shaggy was releasedthe collar should have been
leather
:
his duty was plainto get to the stack-yard as
speedily as possible, with or without a cart, or with it full
or empty.
How my nameless quadrupedal old friend would have
relished and adorned this areadian life! What a theatre
for his abilities and accomplishments! It may be
something
to live in clover; but what is life in a clover-patch
of a dozen rods, to life in a prairie corn-field of a thousand
acres?
But this is digression, of which, indeed, other examples
occurred on our way home.
A friend of ours, a citizen of Woodville, returning now
from Vincennes, and who travelled in a small
one-horse-wagon
,
had told us of a short cut across the prairie; and
had stated also that, while the path was an almost
imperceptible
trace, being used only by a few horsemen, still we
should easily follow the marks of his wheelsand thus a
whole hour could be gained. Passing us, therefore, on
the evening we had reached Razorville, he went by the
short cut to ole man Stafford's, a distance of seven miles,
intending there to stay all night and await our arrival to a
very early breakfast next morning,the remainder of the
journey to be made in company.
Well, an hour before day-break on Tuesday morning we
put out, and in half an hour came to the blind path, into
which we struck bold enough, considering we had to
dismount
to find it, and that from the dimness of the early
morn, no wagon ruts could yet be discerned. But as the
light increased, we could see here and there in the grass
traces of a light wagon; and that emboldened us to trot on
very fast, in the comfortable assurance of rapidly
approaching
a snug breakfast of chicken fixins, eggs, ham-doins,
and corn slap-jacks. By degrees the prairie turned into
timber land; but that had been expected, although the
woods were rather more like thickets and swamps than
ought to be encountered on entering the Stafford country.
Still, every two or three rods was some mark of our friend's
wagon; and as short cuts often pass through out-of-the-way
districts, and we travelled now not by stars, or sun, or
compass
,
but by wheel-ruts, we deemed it best to stick to our
guide and Uncle John's old saw'tis a long lane that
has no turn.
At last we came to the edge of a dense and dark thicket;
and here, at right angles with the ruts, (for long since the
six-inch horse-path had run out, or sunk, or evaporated, or
something,) ran a deep and wide gulley blocked with fallen
trees and brushwood; over which of course the wagon had
got somehow, and, as was natural, without leaving any
visible trace. This deficiency was, however, not
important
,
because, you know, we should find the wagon tracks
on the far side of the ravine; and so over we went
working
,
where the impediments seemed fewest, in a zig-zag
method, for about two hundred yards, when all at once we
rose, large as life, up the opposite bank, and instantly
began
talking:
See any ruts?
No,do you?
No,let's ride to the left.
Through that papaw and spice!no, no, try the right.
The right!look at the grape and green briarbetter
keep straight ahead.
Straight ahead, indeed!that's worse than the other
courses.
Why, how in the name of common sense did Mr.
Thorn ever get his wagon through here!come, you go
right and I'll go left, and let's see if we can't find the
wheel-ruts
.
And then we separated; but after hard scrouging
each way some hundred yards, and halloing questions,
answers
,
doubts, guesses, &c., &c., in a very
unmealy-mouthed
manner, till we became hoarse, and withal
finding
no ruts, nor even hoof-marks, we came together and
held a council. The result of the deliberation was:
1. That we were
probably
(Uncle J. being a
woodsman
would allow only a probability)were probably lost:
2. That maybe we might have followed a wrong wagon,
and maybe we might not:
3. That maybe we had better go back, and maybe we
had not:
4. That as it was likely we had been spirited into the
Great Thicket of the White River, it would be best to work
ahead, and
strike
the river itself now,
up
or
down
which
(I forget which Uncle J. said) was a settlement
maybe
.
This last proposition having a decided majority of two
voices, we began to
work our passage
into the river, Mr.
Seymour as general in the van, Mr. C. as rear-guard.
Now how shall our swamp be described? What
language
can here be an echo to the sense? Any attempt of
the sort would be so complicated an implexicity in the
interwovenness
of the circularity, that should give the sight,
and sound, and fragrance of the maziness in that most
amazing
of mazes, where all sorts of crookednesses made
contortion
worse in its interlacings, thatthatone would go
first this way, and then some other way, and then back
again once more towards the end, side, middle and
beginning
of the sentence, and yet fail to discover thethe
echo,and be no more able to get through with so
labyrinthical
unperiodical a period, in any other way than we were
to get out of the thicket, and that was by bursting outso!
However, you've picked black-berries?gone after
chicken-grapes or something, in your early days? You've
set snares in pretty thick thickets, where you went on
all-fours
through prickle-bushes to save your face? Well
aggregate the trifling impediments of your worst
entanglements
;
then colour matters a little, and you approximate a
just conception of our thicket. In this, all sorts of trees,
bushes, briars, thorns, and creepers, the very instant their
seeds were dropped or roots set by nature,and some
without
staying for either root or seed,started right up and
off all at once a growing with all their might, each and
Vol. II.4
every struggling, like all
creation
for the
ascendancy
, and
thus preventing one another and all others from getting too
large; yea, in haste and eagerness, like candidates
climbing
a hickory-pole, all wrapping, and interlacing, and
interweaving
trunks, boughs, branches, arms, roots and shoots,
till no eye could tell whether, for instance, the creeper
produced the thorn, or the thorn the creeper, or the vine
the scrub-oak, or the oak the grapesand till the shaking,
or pulling, or touching, of a single branch, vine, root, or
briar shook a thousand!ay! like the casting of a pebble
into a lake, till it disturbed in some degree the whole
immensity
of the thicket! And so all, in sheer rage, malice,
and vexation, sent forth all manners, kinds and sorts of
prickers and scratchers, and thorns, and scarifiers; and
began
to bear all manners and kinds and sorts of flowers,
and poisonous berries, and grapes!
In places, a black walnut, or hackberry, or sycamore,
having, like a Pelagian, an intrinsic virtue had got the start
of nature by a few hours at the beginning of the swamp;
and had ever since kept a head so elevated as now to be
overlooking miles around of the mazy world below, and
presenting a trunk and boughs so wrapped in vines and
parasites as to form a thicket within a thicket, an
imperium
in imperio;
while coiled and wreathed there into fantastic
twistings, immense serpentine grape vines seemed like
boas and anacondas, ready to enfold and crush their
victims
!
Nay, in every labyrinth were concealed worlds of
insects, reptiles, and winged creatures; and some, judging
from their hisses, and growls, and mutterings, as they
darted
from one concealment to another at the strange invasion
of their dens and lairs, were doubtless formidable in aspect,
and not innoxious in bites and stings.
Through this apparently impervious wilderness of the
woven world twist, however, we didonward, as Uncle
John said. I thought it was a vain struggle, like striving
to free one's self from the meshes of a giant's net! Yet I
kept close in the rear of his horse; for Mr. Seymour
insisted
on being pilot, and politeness yields to elders even
in wriggling through a swamp. But what need be told our
contrivances to work through? Never in words can be
painted the drawing up of our legs!the shrinking of our
bodies!the condensation of our arms!the bowings
down of our heads, with compressed lips and shut eyes!
But still we talked thus:
Oh! hullow! stop, won't you?
What's the matter?
My hat's gone.
There it is, dangling on that branchlook uphigher!
higher yet!
Oh! yesI see:lucky the hat wasn't tied under a
fellow's chin, hey?how the thing jerked!
Ouch!what a scratch!just get out your knife and
cut this green-briar.
I've cut itgo on:look out, you'll lose your right
leggin.
Whi-i-i-rr!what's that?
A pheasant!
H-i-i-ss!what's that?
A snake!
Haw! haw! haw!if your trousers aint torn the
prettiest!
Don't taste them!they aint grapes!they are poison
berries!
Lookquick!what an enormous lizard!
And then such knocks on the head! Did I ever think
heads, before the aid of phrenology, could bear such
whacks!
Soft
heads, surely, must have been mashed, and
hard
ones, cracked; and, therefore, Uncle John and I
had medium sculls, and the precise developments to go
through thickets. I had always disbelieved the vulgar
saying about knocked into a cocked hat,deeming it,
indeed, possible to be knocked out of one; but my infidelity
left me in that swamp, when I saw the very odd figures
we made after our squeezings, abrasions, and denudings.
The shape of a cocked hat was not at all like them! and
yet, in about three hours from the starting at the gulley,
we somehow or other stood on the summit of a bold bluff,
and beheld the river coolly and beautifully flowing beneath
our feet away below! Here we halted, first to repair
apparel, wipe off perspiration, and pick out briars and thorns
from the hands and other half-denuded parts; and,
secondly
,
to determine the next movement, whenhark! the
sound of an axe!yes! and hark!of human voices!
Between us and the sounds, evidently not more than
two hundred yards up the river, interposed a dense and
thorny rampart; but with coats fresh buttoned to our
throats, hats half-way over the face, and leggins rebound
above the knee and at the ankle, we, in the saddles, and
retired within ourselves, like snails, the outer man being
thus contracted into the smallest possible dimension, and
with heads so inclined as to render following the nose alike
impossible and useless, we charged with the vengeance of
living battering rams against and into the matted wall of
sharp and sour vegetables; and onward, onward, went we
thus, till all at once, the impediment ceasing, we burst and
tumbled through into an open circular clearing of about fifty
yards diameter!
In one part was a rude shantee or temporary lodge of
poles and bark,
a la Indian
, having in front, as cover to a
door-way, a suspended blanket, perhaps to keep out
mosquitoes
;
for I could neither see nor imagine any other use.
On one side the area, were large heaps of hoop-poles, on
another, of barrel-staves; while in several places stood
gazing at us three squatter-like personages, and evidently
not gratified at our unceremonious visit. The nature of
their employment was manifestthe preparation of some
western notions and ideas for the Orleans market. And
down the bluff was a grand fleet of flat boats, ready to float
whenever the water chose to come up to them, and convey
to market a whole forest, in the shape of hoop-poles, staves,
and other raw material, not only now
being
prepared, but
which had been
being
prepared and was yet to be
being
pre
-prepared in all the fashionable modern tenses!
Well, what of that?
Nothing; it was very correct, except in one small
particular
,
although not a grammatical one; this snug little
swamp and thicket, some thirty miles by two in extent, and
full of choice timber, happened to belong to our Great
Father's elder brother, the venerable dear good old Uncle
Sam! And these reprobate nephews, our cousins, were
simply busy in taking more than their share of the
common
heritagein short, they were poaching and stealing!
Now, kind reader, for the last three hours, we had passed
through a considerable scrape; nay, as we had shrunk up,
it may be called a narrow scrape, but on comprehending
the present affair, it seemed not improbable that we had
only come out of the scrape literal, into the scrape
metaphorical
.
How so? Why you see, a large penalty was incurred
for cutting down and stealing public timber; and the
informer
got a handsome share of the fine as reward; so that our
industrious kinsmen taking us, at first, for spies and
informers
,
not only looked, but talked quite growly; and we both
felt a little nervous at sight of the rifles and scalping knives
in the shantee! Here is a first-rate temptation to make a
thrilling
story; but I must not forget the dignity of history
(although Uncle John and I both
thrilled
at the time
without
any
story
)and so I proceed to say, that we soon
satisfied
our free traders who we were; and that they
condescended
not only to laugh, but to sneer at us, and then
pointed to a nice little wagon that one of them had driven
yesterday from near Razorville, with their supplies for the
current week! And that was the identical rut-making
machine, that, so contrary to every body's wishes had
coaxed us into the thicket!
We were then taught how to return on its trace, by a
kind of opening through the maze; and received ample
directions where and how to cross the ravine. We
accordingly
hastened away; but we never felt perfectly easy, or
ventured to laugh honestly, till full two hundred yards
beyond the longest rifle shot, which might very
accidentally
take our direction, and, may be, hit us. The path over
the ravine was, indeed, less tangled, where the wagon had
passed; yet it was a quarter of a mile above our crossing
place, and concealment had evidently been studied in the
way the stave-maker's vehicle had put off, even at an acute
angle, at the point where we had lost its trail; and in the
windings we had to thread among the high grass before we
again reached that point. After having thus lost a wagon
in a prairie, I felt inclined to believe in the difficulty of
finding
a needle in a hay-stack. But we came, finally, to a
deserted cabin; and there, after a keen look, discovered a
little path laid down for us in the late verbal chart. Here,
confident from experience, that this rabbit track of a road,
some two inches wide was yet one of fifty similar ones
leading to the grand trace, path, or way, we struck off at a
rapid gait; and in an hour came to the open wagon road,
which we knew conducted to Mr. Stafford's Public.
Revived we now cantered on, and not long after reached
our breakfast-house, just as the sun was going
down
having
in the day's navigation with all our tackings made
precisely
seven miles, by the short cut, in the homeward
direction
.
Since Monday night, we had eaten nothing, and
were naturally ready now for three meals in one; and yet
were we destined to wait a little longer, and condense into
one
four
repastslike ancient Persians when hunting.
For, either not liking our appearance, or vexed at our not
having come earlier to breakfast, we were here most
pertinaciously
refused any entertainment whatever, and even
peremptorily ordered away; and were, indeed, compelled
to put off for the nearest house, some eight miles farther at
the ferry! Half a mile from Stafford's, we met a young
fellow, evidently in an ill humour at something, who did,
verily, condescend to direct us how to steer through a sea
of grass, rolling its waves over the prairie's bosom in the
haze of the approaching night; but whether the rascal sent
us wrong purposely, or we had so practiced getting lost as
to render the thing easy, after seeming to come duly to
expected points, in about six miles we could find no more
points, and so began again travelling at a venture; and at
ten o'clock at night, it being then profoundly dark, we
resigned
our reason to the horses' instinct to take us where
they listed. We knew the creatures would follow some path
and carry us, some time or other, to a human habitation, if
that of a poacher or squatter; and any thing seemed then
preferable to the wilds of the prairie!
In about two hours my horse, now in the lead, suddenly
halted, when dismounting, I tried first with my feet, and
then my hands, and quickly had by these new senses a
feeling sense
of our situation, viz. that we stood at the
diverging
point of two paths running from one another at
nearly a right angle!
Well, what do you saywhich shall we take?
Hem!what do
you
say? Don't it seem damp towards
the right?
I think it doesand maybe the river is that way,
Don't it seem like rising ground towards the left, to
you?
It doeslet's try the leftwe've had enough of
thickets
for one dayhark! hark!!
Bow-wow-wow! bow-
wow
! on the left.
Sure enough! a dog towards the left! push a-head that
way.
The canine outcry was reduplicated and prolonged; and
we were soon rewarded for our sagacity in going to
the left by coming whack up against a worm-fence! But
groping our way through this impediment, a light was
soon discerned gleaming through some crevice; and the
noise of the dog then subsided into an angry growlwhich
growl was again exchanged into a bark, as we let out our
hearty and door penetrating Hullow! This backwood's
sonnet had soon the desired effect on the clap-board
shutter
;
for it now creaked slowly open, and allowed to issue
from the cabin the following reply in a strong soprano, yet
vibratory from apprehension
Wellwho be you? what's a wantin?
Strangers, ma'am, from the Big Meeting at Vincennes;
we've been lost all day in the Swamp below Stafford's
and we're lost now. Will you be so kind as to let us stay
the rest of the night here?
Well, it's most powerful onconvenentcouldn't you
a sort a keep on to Fairplay'taint more nor two miles no
how, and you'd git mighty good 'comedashins thar?
Oh! ma'am, we'd never find the way in the dark.
Besides
,
our horses are nearly given out; and we ourselves
haven't touched food for nearly two days
Well! now! if that aint amost too powerful hard like!
I'm a poor lone woman bodybut I can't let you go on
so come in. But, strangers, you'll find things right down
poor here, and have to sleep on the floor, as 'cos I've no
more nor two beds and them's all tuk up by me and the
childurn. Howsever, thar's a corn heap over thar to feed
your critturs; but we're now teetotally out of meal;and
Bill's to start in the morning for a gristand I'm
powerful
sorry we've nothin to eat
Oh! thank you, ma'amnever mind usthank you
never mind! If we get corn for our poor brutes, and shelter
for ourselves that will dothank you, ma'amnever
mind!
Having fed our jaded animals we entered the cabin, and
depositing our saddles and furniture in one corner, we sat
down on two rude stools, like some modern ottomans in the
city; being so low as to force one's knees and chins into
near proximity. They had, indeed, no covering or cushion,
unless such be considered the lone woman's
indescribable
,
lying on the one, and Bill's tow-linen breeches on the
otherarticles we considerately, however, removed for fear
of soiling.
The next thing we did was to poke up the slumbering
fire; by the light of which we first cast rueful looks on
one another, and then some sideway glances around the
apartment. In one spot, stood a barrel with an empty bag
of dim whiteness, hanging partly in and partly out, while
across its top was laid a kneading bowl, and in that a small
washing machine;the barrel being manifestly the
repository
of meal, and the bag the very affair Bill was to ride,
in the morning, to mill. Near us was a shelf holding a
few utensils for mush and milk, several tin cups, a wooden
bowl in need of scouring, and some calabashes; a large
calabash we had noticed outside the door, having a small
grape vine for a handle, and intended to represent a bucket
for water and other wet and dry uses. In a strap of
deer-skin
nailed under the shelf were stuck certain knives,
some ornamented with buck-horn handles, one or two with
corn-cob handles, and one handleless; and interspersed
judiciously in the same strap were pincushions, scissors,
comb, and a few other
et ceteras
of a hoosiery toilette.
But the curiosities were the two beds and all tuk up
by the mother and the childurn. What the bedsteads were
made out of was not ascertained. Ricketty they were,
screeching, squirming, and wriggling at every slight motion
of the sleeping household; but tough and seasoned too
4*
must they have been to bear up under their respective
loads, especially considering the way some that night kicked
under
the covers, and, occasionally
over
them!
In one bed were the lone (?) woman and two children;
and in this I am confident having counted three heads, and
one with a cap on. In the other were three or four bodies
Uncle John insisted on,
four
but I only counted three
heads at the bolster; yet Uncle John in his very last letter
holds to it, that he saw another head sticking out near the
foot, and two or three legs in such direction as could come
only from a head in that latitude. Strong presumptive
evidence, granted;yet only presumptive, for a real
backwood's
boy can twist himself all round; beside the fleas
[11]
[11]
Fleas out there are very savagebut while they make the folks
very active in bed, they cannot wake them; for nothing scarcely breaks
a woodsman's sleep.
that night made the bed loads twist their utmost, and legs
and arms became so surprisingly commingled, that no
ordinary
spectator could tell to what bodies they severally
pertained
.
And never were beds so all tuk up, nor so
wonderfully
slept all over, till by daylight the whole of their sleep
must have been fully extracted; and hence, it was plain
enough there was no room for Uncle John or me in either
bed; and that if we wanted any sleep we must get it out of
the puncheons. We spread, therefore, our horse-blankets
each on a puncheon, our separating line being an interstice
of three inches; and, transforming saddlebags into pillows,
we essayed to sleep away our weariness and hunger. But
the sweet restorer's balmy influences were all confined
that night, to the two regular beds; and that among other
causes owing to a motherly she-swine with a litter of ever
so many pigs, and some other bristled gentry in the
basement
,
whence ascended an overpowering dry hickory nut
fragrance, and endless variations of grunt, squeak, and
shuffle
and
in all likelihood the oceans of fleas disturbing us!
If not thence, I leave it to such critics to ascertain, who
delight in saying and finding
smart
things.
Upon the whole it was not, then,
so
odd that about an
hour before dawn, we made ready to set out in search of
Fairplay. And of course our preparations awaked the
lone woman; when the cap, already named, being
elevated
above the sleeping line of the other heads, and also
several capless pates of dirty matted hair(gender
indeterminate
)being
also raised and thrust forth in the other bed,
we thus held our farewell colloquy:
Well, my good friend, we thank you kindly for your
hospitality, and we are about starting now;what shall we
pay you?
Laws! bless you, stranger! how you talk!why do
y' allow I'd axe people what's
lost
anything?and for sich
'comedashins?
Oh! ma'ambut we put you to trouble
Trouble!I don't mind trouble now no howI've had
too big a share on it to mind it any more amost
Why, ma'am, you've been very kindand we really
can't go away till we pay you something
`Stranger!I sees you wants to do what's rightbut
you needn't take out that pussI'll have to be a most
powerful
heap poorer nor I'm now, afore I'll take anything
for sich a poor shelter to feller critturs what's lostand
them a comin from
meetin
too! Ain't that oldermost
stranger
a kinder sort a preacher?
No, my friend, I'm only a member
WellI couldn't axe meetin folks nothin for the best.
I'm right glad you didn't take the right hand trail below our
fence, you'd a got into the swamp agin. Now jist mind
when you come to a big sugar what blow'd down by the
harricane, and take the left, and that will git you clear of
the bioand then keep rite strate on forrerd and you'll soon
git to Fairplay.
Farewells were then cordially exchanged, and we left
the poor lone woman with emotions of pity, gratitude, and
admiration; and we thought too of the cup of cold water
the two mitesof one half the world knows not
how the other livesand man wants but little here
below
and
of all similar sacred and secular sayings, till
we came to the prostrate sugar-tree. There we made a
judicious digression to avoid miring and suffocating in the
morass, and then shortly after dismounted safe and sound,
but frightfully hungry, at Fairplay.
And here we rest awhile to devour two breakfasts and
repair if possible the loss of dinner and supper; and in the
meanwhile we shall speak of the village.
Fairplay was a smart place, consisting of two entirely
new log houses, built last summer, in spite and opposition
to Briarton concealed in the bushes on the other side of
the river: and also a public or tavern
in futuro
, however,
as it was only now a-building. As yet it was not roofed
entirely
,
nor were the second story floors laid, nor had it
any chimneys. Indeed, its walls were incomplete, the
daubing beingah! what is the fashionable grammar here,
for the case absolute? I do not wish to be behind the age
too far, and am desirous of having the Fairplay hotel
grammatically
daubed. Daubing being done? No, it was
not completed. Daubing doing?that would make mud
an active agent; whereas, in the operation, it is the most
passive subject in the world, and is dreadfully trampled,
pounded, beat, splashed, scattered and smeared. Daubing
a-doing? no: the work had ceased for the present, and
the clay was actually dry where the work had been
being
done. Stop! I have itthe daubing being being
done! and so all eating and sleeping were in one large airy
room below, with a flooring of unnailed boards, and half a
dozen windows full of sashes but destitute of glass; and
having also two doors closed with sheets instead of
shutters
.
Cooking was performed to day out of doors; hence, while
waiting for breakfast we inhaled the savory essence of
fried chickens, fried bacon, roasted potatoes, herb-tea,
store-coffee
,
and above all, of slap-jacks compounded from
cornmeal
,
eggs and milk, and fried in a panthus in a measure
getting two breakfasts out of one. True, with the
fragrance
entered the smoke; yet what great pleasure is
without its concomitant pain! Besidebut take care! take
care! here comes the breakfast, and we are ordered:
Well, strangers! come, sit up and help yourselves. I
allow you're a sorter hungry after sich a most powerful
starvation.
Breakfast among the Stars
Landlord! our horses, if you please.
They're at the doorthey look a right smart chance
wustedbut maybe they'll take you homewish you a
pleasant journey and no more scrapes.
The landlord's wishes were not disappointed, for in due
time we were snug at home.
CHAPTER XLI.
This man's brow, like to a title leaf,
Foretells the nature of a tragic volume.
Not
long after Mr. Seymour's return to Glenville, the
patriarchal cabin with its acres of clearings, deadenings and
girdlings, and with all its untouched and unfenced woods,
was sold to a stranger; and then our friends all removed to
Bishop Hilsbury's late residence, near the tannery. The
name, indeed, was retained, but the glory of Glenville
Settlement
was fading. Still, visits were interchanged,
although we of Woodville received more than we paid;
and my emotions became most delightful, whenever returning
on Saturday evenings from a short squirrel hunt, I discerned
at a distance Uncle John's horse tied to our rack. Often,
too, would some of us, the day he was expected, sit the
last hour at an upper window, and watch the leafy barrier,
where our dear friend was expected momentarily to break
through into the mellow light of the departing sunay!
that dear old man was so loved, we felt like hugging and
kissing the very horse that brought him!
Christmas was now approaching; and all Glenville that
remained
was expected to spend the holiday at Woodville.
For this visit, our whole house had been prepared
bed-rooms
were arranged to render sleeping warm and
refreshing
fat
poultry was killedmince-pies concocted, cider
bought; in short, all the goodies, vegetable, animal, and
saccharine, usually congregated at this joyous season, were
stored and ready. In the parlour, a compound of
sitting-room
,
dining room, and bed-chamber, a magnificent fire of
clean white sugar-tree with a green beech back-log was
warming and enlivening; while the lid of the piano was
raised, with copies of favourite pieces ready, and an
eight-keyed flute, and a four-stringed violin on its topall
ready for a grand burst of innocent fun and frolic at the
coming of the loved ones! Oh! we should be so happy!
Night at length drew near; and so after an entire
afternoon
passed in expectation and affirmations, thusWell,
they will be here in a few minutes, now!and after
repeated
visits to our observatory in the attic, we had
concluded
that, beyond all doubt, within a half-hour the
cavalcade
would arrive. But, that half-hour elapsed, and no
friends came! and then another! and still another! and
even then no friends! It was then so very much later than
our old folks had been wont to come, that we all sat now
in the gloom of disappointment around the parlour, uneasy,
and with forebodings of evilwhen the clatter of a horse
moving rapidly over the frozen earth called us in haste to
the door; upon opening which, John Glenville was seen
dismounting, who immediately entered and with a
countenance
of deep distress
Why, dear John! what
is
the matter?
Melancholy enough! poor Uncle has fallen and broken
his thigh! I've come over for Sylvan, and must go back
with him instantly. I left word for him to be ready in
fifteen minutes.
Ah! dear reader! if one's happiness is wholly from the
earth, what shall we do when that happiness is
so
marred?
Our joy became instant mourningour pleasant apartment,
cheerlessour dainty food, tastelessour music, the voice
of lamentation!
Dear old kind-hearted man! after all the sore
disappointments
of a long life, is this sad affliction added to your
sorrows
,
and pains, and many bodily injuries! Again, in old
age, must you lie in that dark forest in the anguish of
broken
limbs!again separated from many that so love you!
What a Christmas eve for you! how different from those
passed in our days of prosperity!
For myself, when recalling the incidents of our late
journeyour harmless pleasantriesour solemn and
serious
conversationshis hoary head on the floor of the lone
woman's cabinhis patience, hilarity, and noble heart
and thought of
him
refused a night's lodging, who had
sheltered
and fed so many strangers, and of
him
turned, weary,
hungry and sick into a western wilderness at night!and
now that grey head on a pillow of anguish! that pleasant
face changed by pain! that often broken body again
crushed and mangledBut, let us change the subject.
Our friends had purposed leaving home early on the
morning of the 24th, but an unforeseen business having
called away John Glenville, the expedition was postponed
a few hours. Yet when he came not at the hour, it was
then concluded that the old folks should set out by
themselves
,
with the belief that Mr. Glenville could easily
over-take
them on the road. To prepare the horses, Mr.
Seymour
descended a small hill to the stable, whilst Aunt Kitty
remained in the cabin to arrange a few small matters
previous
to the starting. But as her brother was absent a full
quarter of an hour beyond what seemed necessary, she
stepped to the cabin-door, and with the slightest possible
impatiencewhen, to her amazement, she heard a faint
voice calling on her for help, and the groans of one as
in great bodily pain! She flew in alarm down the hilland
at the stable-door lay Uncle John, his leg broken off at the
head of the thigh bone, himself in an agony of pain, and in
danger of perishing even from cold, without a speedy
removal
!
His horse had proved restive on being led from
the stable, and in a consequent struggle Mr. S. slipping on
some ice had fallen and received the hurt.
Aunt Kitty quickly decided on her plan. She brought
from the cabin the buffalo robe bestowed by the Osage
warchief
,
and spreading it near her wounded brother, she
managed
,
weak and unaided, to get him, a large and heavy
man, fairly into the middle of the robe. Staying, then, her
tears, and raising her heart to God for fortitude and strength,
she began to drag her mournful load towards the cabin.
But she soon found herself too weak for the task, and in
despair looked aroundwhen, on her way home, and, by
an
unusual
path near our cabin, passed now that very
woman
commemorated elsewhere in this work for a novel
appearance in cow hunting! Catching a glimpse of this
woman Aunt Kitty cried out for assistance; and the
kind-hearted
neighbour was almost instantly at her side, and
adding a strength superior to that of a dozen pretty ladies,
she soon, with Aunt Kitty's aid, had our wounded relative
hauled to the cabin-door. Here, with great difficulty and
labour on their part and pain on his, the sufferer was partly
lifted and partly dragged up and over the steps and sill,
and finally laid on a low bed prepared for his reception.
Mrs. Littleton now examined her brother's wound, and
with the help of her humble friend, she forced the leg into
something like a natural position, and then splintered and
bandaged it, to the best of her ability. In a few minutes
after this, John Glenville entered the cabin, who, on
learning
the mournful accident, instantly remounted and hurried
to Woodville.
Dr. Sylvan was unfortunately not at home, and we
obtained
only one of his students; when Glenville, having
refreshed himself a few moments with us, was, attended by
the pupil, quickly replunged into the cold and darkness of a
now tempestuous night and howling wilderness! They
reached the cabin a short time before day-break: but the
embryo surgeon, without adding or taking from, deemed it
best to let all the bandages remain as Aunt Kitty had bound
them! And so poor Uncle John, after lying on his bed for
seventy wearisome days and nights, rose again to life and
healthyet not to his former shape and activity; for the
leg had shrunk in the knitting of the bone, and his right
side was two inches shorter than before the accident.
And yet, reader, so youthful and buoyant the spirit of
this noble old gentleman, that he and I hunted often
together
after his recoveryhe walking with a crutch in one
hand and a heavy rifle in the other! But so gloomy had
become the cabin life to the old folks, where death might
easily occur from the absence of ordinary help, and where,
perhaps, Uncle John's deformity might have been lessened
by prompt medical aid, that our tannery was sold, and our
relatives removed to Woodville. Mr. Glenville, however,
chose a new site for a store several miles from the old
settlement
,
which then, as to us, ceased to besave that
sacred spot reserved in the sale, and where rest, far from
us, scattered as we are, and ever in this life shall be, the
ashes of the mother!
Once, and but once, subsequent to this desertion, did I
pass along a new road laid through that settlement, and
between the two cabins. Around, for many acres, the
forest was no more, but corn and grain were ripening in
its place. A new brick house stood in our garden; and
the cabin was changed into a stable. And yet, while all
the changes were for the better, and a most joyous
evening
was smiling on the coming harvestI sat on my horse
and had one of my girlish fits of tears!
Yes!I cried like Homer's heroesand that in spite of
the critic who, running over the book to make an article,
will say, the author, tender-hearted soul, cries again
towards
the close of year the third, Chap. xli. p. 77, Vol. II.
Yes!I
cried!
And since that summer's evening, I have
never
seen my first forest home; for I purposely ever after
avoided the hateful new road through it, and that too by
the Indian grave.
FOURTH YEAR.
CHAPTER XLII.
Sit mihi fas audita loqui.
It is the witness still of excellency
To put a
stranger
face on his own perfection.
Our
fourth year introduces an epoch, the Augustan age
of the New Purchasethe opening of the State College!
And now comes on the stage, as one principal actor, my
friend, the Reverend Charles Clarence, A.M., Principal
and Professor of Ancient Languages. This gentleman had
accepted our appointment, not for the paltry stipend paid as
his salary, but wholly because he longed to be in the
romantic
West, and among its earliest literary pioneers; and
hence, early this spring, he was with us, and not merely
ready, but even enthusiastically impatient to commence his
labours.
His wife was with himthe woman of his seven years'
love! They had tasted, however, the wormwood of
affliction's
cup, and even now wore the badges of recent
bereavements
.
Mr. Clarence, leaving his wife and two little
children, went to the South again on business; and after
an absence of four months, on returning to his
boardinghouse
in Philadelphia, he was surprised at hearing and
seeing no signs of his babes. His wife, instead of
answering
in words his eager questions, suddenly threw her arms
about his neck, and bursting into an agony of tears,
exclaimed
,Both
are dead!come into our roomI'll tell
you all!
Here was a sad waking from day-dreaming! and
Clarence
was with us, having altered views of life, and seeing
that we have something to do in it, besides to amuse or be
amused. Happy chastisement our friend afterwards
deemed
it, when encountering sore disappointments and many,
in his professional career: ay! he was destined to endure
the utter crushing of all his high hopes and purposes. For,
if ever man was influenced by disinterested motives, and
fired with enthusiasm for advancing solid learning,if ever
one desirous of seeing Western institutions rival if not
excel
others,if ever a person came willing to live and die
with us, and to sacrifice eastern tastes and prejudices, and
become, in every proper way, a Western Man, my friend
Clarence was he.
His labours and actions proved this. Look for instance
at his daily teachinghis five and six hours usually spent
in the recitation room; at his preaching, always twice on
the Sabbath, and commonly several times during the week;
at his visits to the sick and the dying, and his attendance on
funerals! And these things extended beyond his own
denomination
when
requested, and that was often; for
rarely
,
even in his own sicknesses and melancholy hours, did
he refuse what seemed his duty to others. When too
feeble
to leave his house, he heard the recitations in his bed;
and when unable to stand, he sat in his congregation and
preached, his person emaciated and his face death-like.
Nor did he confine his teaching to the routine himself had
followed, but he introduced other branches, and also a
course of Greek, unknown then in western colleges, and
not common in eastern ones; and this, although it added
to the severity of his private studies, and for many months
kept his lamp
[12]
[12]
A tin lamp, supplied with melted lard, and suspended at the end
of a wooden crane, whose perpendicular shaft moved in sockets
fastened
to the wall.
burning even till two o'clock! His only
inquiry was, how can I best promote the interests of the
institution? In short, therefore, all his learning, his
talents
,
his experience, his accomplishments, were freely
and heartily employed and given, in season and out of
season
;and
a knowledge of all the music he possessed,
vocal
and instrumental, was imparted,
gratuitously
, to the
studentsand also grammar, moral philosophy, and the
like,
gratuitously
, and at
extra
hours, to certain teachers
of ordinary schools, and some of these his former
opponents
!
Much more could we say, if the modesty of my friend
permitted; but he affirms positively that he will not edit
the book if I do not stop here. And yet this man was no
match for veteran cunning; we must not, however, antici
pateand so we shall begin regularly at the beginning,
and go on till we end with the end; refreshing, during the
story, our spirits with the occasional pleasant matters
belonging
to our rather tangled road.
Be it remembered, as was intimated in the early part of
volume first, that Uncle Sam is an undoubted friend of
public
education, and that, although so sadly deficient in his
own; and hence, in the liberal distribution of other folk's
land, he bestowed on us several entire townships for a
college
or university. It was, therefore, democratically
believed
,
and loudly insisted on, that as the State had freely
received, it should freely give; and that larnin, even the
most powerfullest highest larnin, should at once be
bestowed
on every body! and without a farthing's expense!
Indeed, some gravely said and argued that teachers and
professors in the people's college ought to sarve for the
honour! or at least be content with a dollar a day,
which was more nor double what a feller got for mauling
rails! The popular wrath therefore was at once excited
almost to fury when necessity compelled us to fix our
tuition
fee at ten dollars a year; and the greatest indignation
was felt and expressed towards Clarence as the feller
what tuk hire for teaching and preaching, and was gettin
to be a big-bug on the poor people's edicashin money.
Be it recollected too, that both big and little colleges were
erected by persons who, with reverence be it spoken, in
all matters pertaining to high larnin, had not sufficient
discrimination to know the second letter of an alphabet from
a buffalo's foot. Nothing, we incline to believe, can ever
make State schools and colleges very good ones; but nothing
can make them
so
bad, we repeat, as for Uncle Sam to
leave every point open to debate, especially among
ignorant
,
prejudiced, and selfish folks in a New Purchase. For
while trustees may be ninnies, nincompoops, or even
ninnyhammers
as to proper plans and buildings, yet are such
when masons, bricklayers and carpenters, keen-sighted
enough to secure the building contracts for themselves and
their friends, and curiously exorbitant in their demands on
the sub-treasurers for their silly work. The mean-looking
and ridiculous arrangements at Woodville cost as much,
perhaps more, than
suitable
things would have cost; so
that when a college is to be commenced, it ought to be
done, not only by honest but by wise, learned, classical
men; but as such are not abundant in very new
settlements
,
let such men at Washington(and such
are
at
Uncle Sam's bureau)let them prescribe when, and how,
and where, our new western institutions are to be; and if
rebellious democrats refuse the gift so encumbered, let it
thus be given to more modest and quiet democrats.
Proceed we, however, to open the college. And my
narration may be depended on, as Clarence has reviewed
the whole and says it is substantially correct,indeed, in
some respect I was a
quorum-pars
.
The institution was opened the first day of May, at 9
o'clock, A.M., anno Domini 1800 and so forth. And, some
floors being unlaid, and the sashes all being without glass,
the opening was as complete as possiblenearly like that
of an Irish hedge school! When the Principal(so named
in our minutes and papers, but by the vulgar called
master
,
and by the middle sort,
teacher
,)appeared, a clever
sprinkle of
boy
[13]
[13]
A very lively animal anywherebut a very peculiar one out there.
was in waiting; most of which firmly
believed
that, by some magic art, our hero
could
, and being
paid by government,
should
, and without putting any body
to the expense of books and implements, touch and
transmute
all, and in less than no time, into great scholars.
Boys and
young gentle men
, said Mr. C. compounding
the styles of a pedagogue and professor, I am happy to
see you; and we are now about to commence our State
College, or, as some call it, the Seminary. I hope all feel
what an honour attends being the first students in an
institution
so well endowed; and which, therefore, by proper
exertions on our parts, may eventually rise to the level of
eastern colleges, and become a blessing to our State and
country. You have all, I suppose procured the necessary
books, of which notice was given at meeting, and in several
other ways, for the last four weeks.
I've got 'em
Me too
I've brung most on 'em
MasterUncle Billy's to fetch mine out in his wagin
about Monday next
Father says he couldn't mind the names and wants
them on a paper
Books!I never heern tell of any bookswont these
here ones do, Master?this here's the Western Spellin
oneand this one's the Western Kalkelatur?
Mr. ClarinseI fotch'd my copy-book and a bottle of
red-ink to sit down siferin inand daddy wants me to larn
book-keepin and surveyin.
Order boysorder!(hem!)let all take seats in
front. There is a misunderstanding with some, both as to
the books and the whole design and plan of the school, I
perceive. This is a Classical and Mathematical School;
and that fact is stated and fully explained in the trustees,
public advertisements; and no person can be admitted
un-less
one intending to enter upon and pursue the prescribed
course; and that includes even at the start Latin, Greek,
and Algebra. Now, first, let us see who are to study the
dead languages
I doI dome toome too, &c., &c.
Do you, then, sit there. Wellnow let me have your
names for the rollA. BerryS. SmithC. D. &c., &c.
ten namesI will attend to you ten directly, so soon as
I have dismissed the others. I regret, my young friends,
that you are disappointed--but I am only doing my duty;
indeed, if I wished I have no power to admit you, unless to
the course of studiesnay, even the trustees have
power to do only what they have done. I hope, therefore,
you will now go home, and explain the matter to your
friends
By several
Daddy says he doesen't see no sort a use in the high
larn'd thingsand he wants me to larn Inglish only, and
bookkeepin, and surveyin, so as to tend store and run a
line.
I allow, Mister, we've near on about as good a right
to be larn'd what we wants, as them tother fellers on that
bench;it's a free school for all.
I am sorry, boys, for this misunderstanding; but we
cannot argue the subject here. And yet every one must see
one matter plainly; for instance, any man has a right to be
governor, or judge, or congressman; yet none of you can
be elected before the legal age, and before having some
other qualifications. It is so here, you all have a right to
what we have to bestow; but you must be qualified to
enter; and must be content to receive the gift of the State
in the way the law provides and orders. You will please
go home now.
The disappointed youngsters accordingly withdrew; and
with no greater rudeness than was to be expected from
undisciplined
chaps, full of false notions of rights, and
possessed
by a wild spirit of independence. Hence, Mr. C.
heard some very flattering sentiments growled at him by
the retiring young democrats; but which, when they had
fairly reached the entry, were bawled and shouted out
frankly and fearlessly. And naturally after this he was
honoured with some high sounding epithets by certain
hypocritical demagogues in rabblerousing speeches
sneaking
gentlemen, who aimed to get office and power by
endless
slanders on the college, and most pitiful and malicious
slang about liberty and equality, and rights, and tyranny,
and big-bugs, and poor people, and popular education,
et id omue genus!
Ay! certain small-petato-patriots publicly on the stump
avowed it was a right smart chance better to have no
collidge
no how, if all folks hadn't equal right to larn what
they most liked best. And two second-rate pettifoggers
electioneered on this principle; that it was most
consistent
with the republicanism taught by the immortal
Jefferson
,
and with the genius of our institutions, to use the
college
funds to establish common schools for rich and poor
alike, and make the blessings of education like air, sunshine,
and water!
Clarence, therefore, was now hated and villified, as the
supposed instrument of pride and aristocracy, in drawing a
line between rich and poor;
[14]
[14]
Of the
ten
boys who entered the college, seven or eight were
poor
many that would not enter were
rich
.
and for a while his person,
his family, his very house was abominated. On one
occasion
he was in Woodville when a half drunken brute thus
halloed against himthare goes that darn'd high larn'd
bug what gits nine hundred and ninety-nine dollars and
ninety-nine cents of the people's eddekashin money for
larnin ristekrats sons high flown wordsgimme that 'are
stone and I'll do for him. Whether this was fun or
earnest
,
Clarence did not care to ascertain; for hearing the
sneers and derision of the bystanders, and fearing it might
become earnest, he took shelter in my store.
At another time walking with Professor Harwood in
the outskirts of the village, they heard a cry in their rear
knock 'em downwhen suddenly turning, there stood a
stout chap flourishing a bludgeon over their heads,
evidently
,
Vol. II.5
indeed, in a
sort
of fun, which was, however, an
index of the popular ill-will and spite.
When persons rode by his dwelling, remarks like the
following would be shouted forth:
Wellthar's whar the grammur man lives that larns
'em Latin and grand-like thingsallow we'll oust him yet
he dosen't own little college any how; he's poor as Job's
turkey, if it want for that powerful sallury the trustees give
him.
Clarence's salary was four hundred dollars per annum!
Well, bawled out one fellowdog my hide if that
ain't the furst time I ever seed that big man's door open!
hem!powerful fine carpet!(a beautiful rag carpet made
by Mrs. C.)allow, people's eddekashin money
bought
that!
Even Mr. C.'s gratuitous preaching could not secure him
from ill-natured remarks. Well, said an occasional hearer
to another oncehow do y'like that sort a preachin?
Foo! was the reply. I don't want no more sich! I
like a man that kin jist read, and then I know it comes from
the sperit! he tuk out his goold watch twice to show it, and
was so dmnation proud he wouldn't kneel down to
pray!
But the reader may wish to know how Mr. Clarence got
along with the Few. Well, as the warm weather
approached
,
the boys and young gentlemen came to
recitation
without coats; and, as the thermometer arose, they
came without
shoes
What! in the State college? Could your Mr. Clarence
not have things ordered with more decency?
Softly, Mr. Dignityin a world where our presiding
judge, a man of worth and great abilities, presided in court
without his coat and cravat, and with his feet modestly
reposed on the upper rostrum, thus showing his boot-soles
to by-standers and lawyers; where lawyers were stripped
and in shirt-sleeves; and where even Governor Sunbeam,
in a stump speech, gave blast to his nose pinched between
a thumb and finger, and wiped said pinchers afterwards on
the hinder regions of his inexpressibles; do you, sir,
think our Mr. C., or all eastern dignitaries combined, could
have compelled young bushwhackers to wear coats and
shoes in recitation rooms? He indeed ventured once as
follows:
Young
gentlemen
(hem!)why do you attend
recitations
without coats and shoes?
'Tis cooler, sir!with surprise.
Ay! so it isperhaps it would be still cooler if you
came without your
pantaloons
.
Haw! haw!by the whole ten.
And
did
they, Mr. Carlton, come without their
indispensables
?
Oh! dear me! no; on the contrary, the young
gentlemen
were so tickled at our professor's pleasant hint direct,
that next day they not only come in their breeches, but also
with shoes and coats on! But still, many proper regulations
of our friend were distasteful to scholars and parents equally
for instance, the requirement of a written excuse for
certain absences. One parent, an upper class Thompsonian
doctor, did, indeed, once send a notebut that was an
insolent
[15]
[15]
How should a steam-doctor know better?
out there
.
and peremptory order to Clarence to believe in
future his son, without a written excuse! And another
person, a captain in the
late
war, not only refused to write
a note, but he sent a verbal message by his son to the
master
,
viz.Charley Clarence, you needn't think of
introducing
your dn Yankee tricks out here!
Yes! yes!raise your hands, and elevate your
eyebrows
,
good folks. Mr. C. did all that sort of thing too, at
first; but he lived long enough with us to get used to mat
ters! The only evil was, that, like the Irish Greek's
famous
horse that unluckily died, just when he had learned
to live without eating,
[16]
[16]
That curious art has been revived lately in Great Britain, and is
practiced extensively and with great success among the poor.
our professor, when he had outlived
his prejudices, and abandoned his Yankee ways, fell a
victim
to veteran cunning and artifice; and was forced, like
Aristides, to obey the Ostracism!
CHAPTER XLIII.
This is some fellow
Who, having been praised for bluntness, doth affect
A saucy roughness.
What would you have, you curs?
The
nature of our favourite doctrinethe sovereignty
of the peopleis but imperfectly understood from theory;
and, truly, what importance to the vast majority to be called
kings, unless opportunities are afforded to exercise the royal
prerogatives?
True, in the constitutions of the twenty-six States, are
paper models of republican governments, the purest in
nature
;
such as the monarchical-republic, the oligarchic, the
aristocratic, the federal, the democratic, ay, the cheatitive
or repudiative, the despotic, the mobocratic, the anarchic,
cum multis al is:
but what of all this, if the citizen kings
cannot be indulged in a little visible, tangible, audible,
law-making
,
law-judging and law-executing?
Now, in the New Purchase, the people universal, the
people general, the people special, of every county, town
and village, of every sect, religious and irreligious, of every
party, political, impolitical, and non-political, were indulged
in
bona fide
acts of real rity-dity sovereignty. And each
and every part, party, and parcel, lorded it over the whole,
and over one another; and the whole over the parts and
over itselfay, and every one that did it against the wall,
ruled the State and the nation, and his neighbour, and then
turned round and ruled himself, not in the fear of heaven,
but in the fear of the people! The fact is, we did nothing
else than rule one another; and none ever even obeyed for
fear of disobeying; and hence our public servants (and we
kept them sweating) being distracted by opposite
instructions
from different constituents(for candidates with us
only carried up votes, wishes, &c.)from Thomas and
Richard and Henry and Squire Rag and Major Tagg and
Mister Bobtail, and being imperiously ordered to rob Peter
to pay Paul, our public servants, poor knaves and honest
rascals, would not obey, simply out of reverence and for
fear of offeuding and hurting our feelings!
Here follows a specimen of the people ruling the
college
and the college ruling the people.
We, the people of the Trustees, for the good of the
people general, did resolve this autumn to elect a Professor
of Mathematics and advertised accordingly. This of itself
enraged the people who set no value on learning, and deemed
one small salary a waste of the poor people's education
money; but when rumour declared we intended to elect a
man nominally a Rat,
[17]
[17]
Nickname for a religious sect in the Purchase.
(Mr. Clarence being also a Rat,)
the wrath was roused of the people, religious, and
irreligious
,
of all other sects. This, indeed, was confined to
Woodville; for from the very first, we, the people of
Woodville
and thereabouts, did kindly adopt the State College
as ours; and we, therefore, claimed the sole right of
superintending the Legislature, the Board of Visitors, the
Board of Trustees, the Faculty, proper and improper, the
Students, foreign and domestic, the Funds, the Buildings
the everything; and for some time we ordered and
regulated
,
and turned in and out most despotically.
Well, the people having united the peoples in a fixed
purpose, viz.to keep out a Rat, but not having united
them in any purpose of putting in anybody else, the people,
now sovereign and of many kings, held a meeting up town
in the court-house yard; while we, the trustee-people and
sovereigns of another sort, were holding our meeting to
elect a professor in the prayer-hall of Big College; and
then the People's-people, formed under the command of
Brigadier Major General Jacobus, Esq., Clerk of Court,
Chief Librarian of Woodville Library, and Deputy Post
Master under his late Majesty, General Andrew Jackson,
marched down in a formidable battalion to give us our
orders.
This grand dignitary of so many tails we have just
named, was most fit head to the fit body he conducted.
He was no inconsiderable a people himself, being very fat
and very saucy; nay, as in warm weather he always
appeared
without coat, vest, cravat, and usually with slouched
hat, shoes down at heel on stockingless feet, and one
gallus hard strained to keep up his greasy and raggy
breeches; and as in this costume he strutted everywhere
full of swagger and brag, he was
then
the best living and
embodied personification of a mistaken, conceited,
meddlesome
,
pragmatical people anywhere to be found. He
flourished
in that grand era, rotation in office; but by him it
was interpreted a rotation out of
one
public office into
another
yea! even now he actually sustained at once
seven
salaried offices little and bigyea! moreover to these
seven tails he added and very commonly exhibited another
the tail of his shirt! Now, one may conceive how our
great father of one or more terms looks; one can even
imagine
how Uncle Sam looks; but who forms approximating
conceptions of that proteus sovereignthe People! Believe
me, his rowdy majesty, General Jacobus, is as near a
likeness
,
in many essential respects, as can be obtainedbut
this is digression.
Our honourable Trustees were, as usual, sitting with
open doors, and hence were, as heretofore, accommodated
with numerous lobby members; and these kept muttering
discontent at our doings, and often volunteered remarks in a
play-house whisper for our correction and guidance. Dr.
Sylvan, however, who anticipated a storm, had contrived to
put the vote for Mr. Harwood's election, a little prior to the
first faint noise of the coming cataract of turbid waters, and
had succeeded in securing this gentleman's unanimous
choicewhen a considerable hurrahing outside announced
the People's peopleand in a moment after, in swaggered
his greasy royalty, General Jacobus, followed by as much
of the ultimate sovereignty as could squeeze into the room.
And then King Slouch commenced as follows:
Mr. President and gentlemen of the Board!hem!
I have the honour to be the orgun of the peoplehem!
and by their orders I've come in here, to forbid the
election
of Mr. Harwood of Kaintuckey, as
our
Professur of
Mathematucshem!in the people's collidgehe-e-m!!
You'r all servunts of the people and hainit the right no how
to give away their edicashion money without thar consent
I sayhem!as all is not admitted to these here halls
of sciencehe-e-m!! And the people in the inbred,
incohesive use of thar indefeesibul native rights, order me
thar orgun to say they don't want two teachers of the same
religion no howand I say itand I say, Mr. President,
they say its better to have them of different creeds, and I
say that toofor they say they'll watch one another and
not turn the students to thar religion andhem! Yes, the
people in their plentitude have met, and they say they don't
want no church and stateand I say it; for thar's a
powerful
heap of danger to let one sect have all the power
and I call on this board to let their historic recollections be
berecollectedand wasn't thar John Calvin, the
moment
he got the power, didn't he burn poor Mikul Servetis
at the stakeandandso ain't it plain if two men here git
all the power thar's a beginning of church and state, as that
immortal Jefferson says? And who knows if you and me
and the people here mayn't be tortered and burn'd yet
in a conflagaration of fagguts and fire? Who then with
this probability
Here Dr. Sylvan, our worthy President, interrupted the
speaker, the doctor being now only recovered from his
surprise
;
for, veteran as he was in politics, and often as he
had known the people essay small overt acts of
sovereignty
,
this affair was so novel and so grandly impudent, that it
took him the first half of the harangue to collect himself,
and the other to concoct the following judicious compound
of decision, sarcasm and blarney:
It is with regret, General Jacobus and my respected
fellow citizens, I interrupt the eloquent utterance of
sentiments
so patriotic and so well adapted to excite our disgust
and horror at a union of Church and State; but in the
present
case, I do really believe the danger is not to be
apprehended
.
In the first place, we all know the liberal
sentiments of Professor Clarence towards all religious
bodies; and in the second place, the gentleman just
elected
by us before the entrance of your honourable body and
organ, is not known to be a member of any communion;
and lastly, we Trustees are of six different denominations
ourselves, and therefore, as we put in we can also put out,
the instant danger is found to threaten the State from our
present course. And, fellow-citizens, we shall, I am
confident
,
be quite Argus-eyed over our facultybut at all
events we have gone too far to retrace our steps; for Mr.
Harwood is
legally
appointed, and for what we deemed
good reasons. And surely no American citizen in this
glorious land of equal rights and blood-bought liberties,
where the meanest felon has a trial by jury, will contend
that an honourable and unoffending man of another state
the noble old Kentuckyshould be turned out of office
and no accusation against his competency and moral
character
?
Backwoodsmen don't ask
that!
and they don't
think of it. Had this honourable representation come
fifteen
minutes sooner,
something
might have been done or
prevented;for we are indeed servants of the peoplebut
Mr. Harwood ought now to have time to show himself, and
cannot be degraded without an impeachment. And who is
ready to impeach a
Kentuckian
because John Calvin or
John Anybody else burnt Servetus a hundred years ago?
and that, when it is not even known whether Mr. Harwood
himself might not have been roasted in the days of
persecution
for some heresy mathematical or religious! Fellow
citizens, our meeting is adjourned.
Our venerable Congress at Washington sometimes gets
into a row, and even breaks up in a riot. And why should
it not be so, when many conscript fathers have practised
bullyism from early life, and have only gone to the great
conservative assembly to do, on a large scale, dirty
things often done before on a small one? Or why, on the
other hand, if the reverend young fathers there set us, the
people, the example, should any person affect to wonder
that we sometimes imitate our law givers? Whether we,
the New Purchase people, set or followed the example,
need not be determined; but we certainly adjourned to-day
in a grand kick-up; which, if described, must be in the
pell-mell style of history.
At the word adjourned, ending Doctor Sylvan's
speech, came a violent and simultaneous rush; some
pushing
towards the door, to get outsome from without into the
door, to get inand some towards the clerk's seat, to
seize and destroy the record: but that wary officer, at the
5*
same word just named, had quietly slipped the sacred record
into his breeches' pocket, the minutes being only recorded
with a lead pencil on a quarter sheet of cap paper. Then
commenced a hell-a-below, loud enough at first, but which,
like a Latin Inceptive, still went on and tended to
perfection
;
being an explosion commingled of growl, curse,
hurrah
,
hiss, stamp, and clap; and then and there and all
through the mass meeting, were Brigadier Major
General
Jacobus, and our people and the people's people and
other people, all huddled and crowded and mixed, and all
and every one and each were and was explaining, demanding,
denying, do-telling, and wanting to know, somewhat thus:
Hurrah for Harwood!damn him and Clarinse too
ain't the money our'n, that's what I want to know?I say
Doctor, remember next 'lection!that's the pintyou lie,
by the lord Harry!let me out, blast your eyes!it ain't
it tislet us in, won't you?do tellGeneral Jacobus
ought to have his nose pulledhe didn't burn himdon't
tell mepull it if you darehe burnt hisselfgo to the
devilno patchin' to himpowerful quick on the trigger
Calvinget up petition to legislatureratsdidn't I say
we ought to get down sooner?faggotsHarwood ain't
gunpowderdarn'd clever fellowServetushurrah for
hic haec hoc!
let's outgive 'em more moneylet's in
is the board to be forced?get out o' my wayfair trial
don't blastanswer thatI know better'tain't'tishold
your
jawwhoo!shoo!hiss  hinyowbowwow
rumblegrumbleSylvanClarinseJacobusHarwood
Servetus&c. &c., and away rolled majesty, till the
noise in the distance was like the grum mutter of retiring
thunder!
How awfully grand and solemn a little people in the
swell of arrogated supremacy! But we saw King Mob to
greater advantage next year; which sight shall be duly
set before our readers. Meanwhile we shall take a pleasant
rural excursion in the following chapter, by way of
recreating
after our toils in behalf of learning.
CHAPTER XLIV.
We still have slept together,
Rose at an instant, learn'd, play'd, eat together.
are not these woods
More free from peril than the envious court?
Reader
!
Well, what now?
Will you go with us? Come, surely Tippecanoe will
arouse you; and although we have miles of dark, tangled,
and, in places, almost untrodden forests to pass; although
we shall ford and swim creeks, swollen from recent rains,
and where a blundering horse would plunge the rider into
rapid and whirling waters; and although some
inconveniences
and customs will be found inconsistent with
steamboats
and rail road journeys, yet who will not risk all to
stand on the battle field of the brave, amid the sadness of its
solitary and far distant prairie!
Very
eloquent!but, Mr. Carlton, only think of the
mud
.
Yes, dear reader, but the
girls
are to go along.
Girls!
Yes, and very pretty and intelligent ones tooreal lady
Hoosiers.
Are you in earnest? Who are they?
The young ladies of Miss Emily Glenville's Woodville
Female Institute.
Oh!ay!I had forgot your schoolwhat then?
Why, it is our vacation, and myself with one or two
other gentlemen are going to escort the girls home. Seven
of the pupils belong to wealthy and respectable families
in the north, and one or two live very near to
Tippecanoe
.
Heigho!out of compliment to the ladies we go; but
how long will you be yet?
Oh, we shall get through after a while. No lane,
you know, &c. Of course then you consent.
Well, our party consisted of eleven personsthe seven
girls, the father and brother of one girl, and myself and
young Mr. Frank, of Woodville, who, like myself, wished
to see the world. To carry us were precisely ten horses
and a half, the fractional creature being a dwarf pony, an
article or noun, which young Bk, the brother rode, like
a velocipede, and which, by pressing the toes of boots
against hard and hilly places in the path, could be aided
by pushing. And thus, also, the rider could a
sorter
stand
and go, like wheels in motion, at once; and all that would
greatly relieve the tedium of monotonous riding. The
special use of the pouy was manifested in fording
mud-holes
,
quicksands, quagmires, marshes, high waters, and
the like. In vain did the rider pull up his limbs;
[18]
[18]
Lower limbs here, in contradistinction to upper ones.
in vain
shrink away up towards the centre of his saddleup
followed
the cream-coloured mud in beech swamps, the black
mud and water in bayous, the black mud itself in walnut
and sugar lands, or the muddy water in turbid creeks and
rivers, and the rider became
deeply
interested in the
circulating
medium.
But what a contrast to a stage coach, to say nothing of a
car; ten horses and upwards to carry eleven people! And
how I do wish you could have seen us set out! Dear, oh
dear! the scampering, and tearing, and winnowing, and
kicking up, and cocking of ears, as the quadrupeds were
being rid up to the rack! and then the clapping on of
horse-blankets and saddles, male and female, croopers and
circingles and bridles, double and single! What a
drawing
of girths! What a fixing and unfixing and refixing of
saddle-bags! What a hanging of fixins themselves,
done up in red handkerchiefs on the horns of the gentler
sex saddles! And then the girlslike the barbarians in
Csar's Commentaries in one battle, they seemed to be
every where at onceup stairs, down stairs, on the stairs,
in the closet under the stairs! They were in the house,
out of the house, in the yard, at the door, by the horses!
And oh how they did ask questions and get answers.
Where's my shawl? Is this it? Did nobody see
my basket? I didn't. Who's got my album? Mr.
Frank. Will some body fasten my fixens? He ain't
here. Won't nobody carry this? and so on through all
the bodies.
The animals were now all harnessed, and stood
comparatively
quiet, except an occasional impatient stamp, or
an active and venomous switch of a tail: the bustle, too,
had subsided, and all had come to that silent state when no
more questions can be asked, but all are waiting for some
one to begin thefarewell. And then came that sad word,
amid gushing tearsmid sobs and kissesfor with some
the schooling was finished, and who could tell
whether
ever more should meet those sprightly, happy, sweet
companions!
But soon followed the uproar of mounting; and with that
seemed
to pass all sorrow; and yet so painful had been the
last few moments, that an excuse was needed for saying
and doing something lively. Of course we all said a great
many smart things, or what passed for such, in the way of
compliment, raillery and repartee; and we guessed and
reckoned and allowed and foretold the most contrary
matters
about the weather, and the roads, and the waters, and
even about our fates through the whole of our coming lives.
In the meanwhile horse after horse was paraded towards
the block, each receiving extra jerks, and some handsome
slaps and kicks on the off flank, to make him wheel into
position, when next moment away he scampered with a
side-way rider, in trot, shuffle, pace, or canter, according
to his fancy, till all the lady riders were on the saddles, and
then Mr. Bk, sen., and myself riding in advance, he
shouted, Come on, girlswe're off.
And
off
it wasamidst the giggling of girls, and the
laughter of neighbours, nodding good-byes with their heads,
or shaking them out of handkerchiefs, from doors and
windows
;
and also the boisterous farewells of some two
dozen folks that had helped us fix.
Off
it was, some at a
hard trot, some at a round gallop, and others at a soft pace
or shuffle, the animals snorting, squeeling, and winnowing
sometimes six abreast, sometimes two, sometimes all
huddled like a militia cavalry training; and then all in
Indian file, one by one, with yards of space between us!
Oh! the squeezing of lower limbs against horse rumps!
the kicking and splattering of mud!the streaming forth
of ill-secured kerchiefs and capes! Oh! the screeching!
shouting! laughing! shaking! What flapping of
saddle-skirts
!
What walloping of saddle-bags! Away with
stages!steamers!cars! Give me a horse and the
life, activity and health of Hoosiers and Hoosierinas let
loose all at once in the whirligig storm and fury of that
morning's starting!
We soon degenerated into a slow trot, and finally into a
fast walk, with episodial riding to scare a flock of wild
turkies, or add wings to the flight of a deer; till we all
became at last so shaken down and settled in our saddles
as to seem each a compound of man (
homo
) and horse.
Yet for hours we kept up talk of all kinds. Yea! we
halloed  we quizzed  we laughed! Ay! we talked
seriously toofor no one rides through our grand woods
any more than he sails forth on the grand waters, and feels
not solemn! And we even talked
religiously
more so than
most readers would care to hear! Lively, indeed, we
werebut God even
then
was in our thoughts; and some
of that happy company were then, and are yet, ornaments
of the Christian worldsome are in heaven! Yes, then
as now, we often passed, as is the case with the joyous,
the frank-hearted, the middle class,
[19]
[19]
To that we belong, and hope we always shall:Give me neither
poverty nor riches.
and, in an instant,
from laughter to tears.
No halt was made for dinner: it was handed round on
horseback. A piece, or half a piece of ham, boxed neatly
between two boards of corn broad, and held delicately
as possiblebetween the finger and thumb of an attendant,
was thus presented for acceptance. Yet not always was
it easy to take the proffered dainties; since often the
horse, out of sheer affectation, or because of a sly kick or
switch from an unseen quarter, would, at the instant of
captation
,
jump aside, or leap forward, and verify the proverb
many a slip between the cup and the lip.
Towards evening it was heard that Slippery River was
falling, but could not yet be forded; and hence it was
determined
to stay all night in a cabin several miles this side,
in expectation of our being able to ford in the morning.
We were, of course, received by our friends with open
hearts, and entertained in the most approved backwoods'
style,the only awkwardness being that beds could be
furnished
but for four of our party. As some, therefore, must
sleep on the floor, it was unanimously voted that all should
share alike in the
hardship
and frolic of a puncheon's
night's rest; and hence, in due season, all hands were
piped to convert our supper-room into a grand bed-chamber.
And first, the floor was swept; secondly, our blankets were
spread on it; thirdly, over these horse-cloths was put a good
rag carpet; and, lastly, in a line were ranged saddle-bags
and valises, interspersed with other bolsters and pillows
stuffed with feathers and rags; and then, the fire being
secured
,
we all began to undress
Oh! goodness! Mr. Carlton!girls! and all?
Girls and all, my dear.
I vow then, I will never marry and go to a New
Purchase
!
But did the ladies really divesthem!before
thethe
To be sure.
What! take off all the usual
Oh! that I cannot say. Western gentlemen never peep.
Besides the gentlemen took off only coats and boots; and
intelligent
ladies everywhere always know how to act
according
to necessity.
Our order of reclinature, as Doctor Hexagon would
here doubtless say, was as follows: Mr. Bk, sen.,
reclined
first, having on his outside next the door, his son,
and on the inside, his daughter; then the other girls, one
after another, till all were finished; then his modesty, Mr.
C., who, having a wife at home, was called, by courtesy to
suit the occasion, an old man; and then, outside him, and
next the other door, young Mr. Frank
I never!
[20]
[20]
What! never read the story of Boaz and Ruth?
and then after a little nearly inaudible whispering,
bursting at short intervals into very audible giggles, the
hush of the dark wilderness came upon usandana
What?
Hey!oh!ah!I beg pardonI think we must have
been asleep!
After breakfast our friend Mr. Bk, sen., offered an
earnest prayer, in which thanks were returned for past
mercies and favours, and supplication made for protection
during the prospective perils of the day; and in an hour
after we were within sight, and hearing too, of the sullen
and angry flood.
The waters had, indeed, fallen in a good degree, and
they were still decreasing, yet no person, a stranger to the
West, could have looked on that foaming and eddying
river leaping impetuous over the rocky bed, and have heard
the echoes of its many thunders calling from cliff to cliff,
and from one dark cavern to another in the forest arched
over the water,no inexperienced traveller. all sign of
hoof and wheel leading to the ford obliterated, could have
supposed that our party, and mostly very young girls, were
seriously preparing to cross that stream on our horses!
But either that must be, or our path be retraced; and
sobered, therefore, although not intimidated, we made ready
for the perilous task. The older and more resolute girls
were seated on the sure-footed horses, and all their dresses
were properly arranged, and all loose cloaks and clothes
carefully tied up, that, in case of accident, nothing might
entangle the hands or feet. Several little girls were to
be seated behind the gentlemen, while a loose horse or
two was left to follow. We gentlemen riders were also to
ride between two young ladies, to aid in keeping their
horses right, to seize a rein on emergencies, and to
encourage
the ladies, in case they showed any symptoms of
alarm.
Things ready, we all rode boldly to the water's edge;
where a halt was called, till Mr. Bk and Mr. C.
should go foremost and try the ford. And now, dear
reader
,
it may be easy to ford Slippery River in this book, and
maybe Mr. C. has contrived to seem courageous likebut
that morning, at first sight of that ugly water, he did
secretly
wish it had been bridged, and feelthat iswished
all safe over; and possibly had he been favoured with a
few moments' more reflection, he might have been rather
scaredyet just then, souse went Mr. B. up to his
saddle-skirts
,
seeming a man on a saddle with a tail streaming
out horizontally, and then came his voice thus:
Come on, Carlton!come on!
Ay! ay! sirI'm insousesplash! Oho! the
water's in my boots!
Hold up your legs!why don't you?
Forgot it, Mr. B.don't care nowcan't get any
wetter
.
N. B. None, save born and bred woodsmen, can keep
the limbs properly packed and dry on the horse neck, in
deep fords: naturalized woodmen never do it either
gracefully
or successfully. I have myself vainly tried a hundred
times: but at the first desperate plunge and lurch of the
quadruped, I have always had to unpack the articles and
let them drop into the waterotherwise I should have
dropped
myself.
Mr. B. and myself rode around and into the deepest
places
,
satisfying ourselves and the rest, that with due caution
and fortitude the ford was practicableor
nearly
so: and then
I returned for the girls, while Mr. B. rode down and
stationed
himself in the middle river about twenty-five yards below
the ford proper, to intercept, if possible, any article or
person
falling from or thrown by a blundering horse. Having
myself been in the deepest water, although not the most
rapid, and knowing that much depended on my firmness
and care, my sense of personal danger was lost in anxiety
for my precious charge; and I re-entered the perilous flood
with the girls with something like a determination, if
necessary
,
to save their lives rather than my own.
Several of these, from the first, utterly refused all
assistance
;
and they now sat like queens chivalric age
seeming, occasionally, tiny boats trimmed with odd sails and
tossing mid the foam, as their horses rose and sunk over
the roughness of the rocky bottom! The other girls,
shutting
their eyes to avoid looking at the seeming dangers, and
also to prevent swimming of the head, held the horn of the
saddle with a tenacious grasp, and surrendered the horses
to the guidance of the escorts.
On reaching the middle of the river, here some eighty
yards wide, the depth had, indeed, decreased to about two
feet; but then the rocks being more, and larger and
rougher
,
the current was raging among thema miniature of the
Niagara Rapids. Here was I seized with a momentary
perplexity. By way of punishing the incipient cowardice,
however, I checked my own horse and that of the trembling
girl next me, and thus remaining, forced my eyes to survey
the whole really terrific scene, and to contemplate a
cataract
of waters thundering in an unbroken sheet over a ledge
of rocks thirty feet high, and a short distance above the ford.
And having thus compelled myself in the very midst of the
boiling sea, to endure its surges, we proceeded cautiously
and leisurely, till with no other harm than a good wetting,
especially to my boots and upwards, and a little palpitation
of the heart, all came safe to land.
And then the chattering! and how we magnified
ourselves
!
The charges and denials too!Mary what makes
you so pale?Pshaw!I'm notI was not scared a
bit!Nor me neither Ha! ha! ha!you had
your eyes shut all the time!Oh! Mr. Carlton had I?
Wellsaid hewe must not tell tales out of school:
beside I was half
afraid
I should get
scared
myself.
You! Mr. Carltonsaid Mr. B.well it may be so;
but without flattery, you brought the girls over about as well
as I could have done it myselfwhy, you were as cool as
a woodsman.
Well after that praise, Mr. Blank(for that is the
name)I mean to set up for a real genuine Hoosier.
Reader! I did not deserve such praise: but as to being
cool, there was no mistakeonly think of the cold
water
in my boots and elsewhere!
Inquiry was now made about the pony: and that was
answered by a general Haw! haw! haw! hoo! hoo!
hoo! he! he! he! and so through the six casesand
mingled with the exclamations look! look!down
thare! down thare!
We of course looked; and about thirty yards below the
landing, was pony, or rather pony's head, his body and tail
being invisible; but whether hippopotamus like he walked
on the bottom, or was actually swimming, was uncertain.
But there he was; and, by the progression of his ears, he
was manifestly making headway pretty fast towards our
side; although ever and anon, by the sudden dousing of
his ears, he had either plunged into water deeper than his
expectation, or been momentarily upset by the current. By
this time our two young gentlemen had got opposite to
pony
and were waiting to assist at his toilette on his
emerging
;for
his saddle and bridle, &c., had been all brought
over on a vacated steed. The three soon rejoining us, we
all, in health and with grateful hearts and good spirits, were
again dashing on, wild and independent Tartars, through
our own loved forests.
But before we could reach our quarters this night, Nut
Creek was to be passed, too deep to be forded, and having
neither bridge nor scow! it was to be doneby canoe!
and travelling by the canoe line has very little amusement,
although abundance of danger and trouble and excitement.
The canoe, in the present case, was a log ten feet long
and eighteen inches wide and hacked, burned, and scraped,
to the depth of a foot: and it was tolerably well rounded
to a
point
at each end, being however, destitute of keel or
or rudder. It was indeed, wholly unlike any fairy skiff
found in poetry or Scott's Novels, or in the engravings of
annuals bound in cloth and gold and reposing on centre
tables
.
Nor was it either classical or Indian. It differed
from a bark-canoe as a wooden shoe from a black morocco
slipper! Either nature, or a native, had begun a
hog-trough
to hold swill and be snouted: but its capacities
proving better than expectationa little extra labour had
chopped the thing into a log-boat!
Wellinto this metamorphosed log was now to be
packed
a most precious load. To one end went first, Mr.
Blank, senr. with a paddle; then were handed along, one
by one, the trembling girls, who sitting instantly on the
bottom
of the trough and closing their eyes, held to its sides
with hands clenched as for life; and then followed Mr. C.
filling up the few inches of remaining space, and for the
first time in his days holding a canoe paddle! and then at
the cry let go! our two junior gentlemen on the bank
relaxed
their hands and our laden craft was at the mercy of
the flood!
Many a boat had I rowed on the Delaware and the
Schuylkill,often a skiff on the Ohio,ay! and poled and
set over many a scow: but what avail that civilized
practice
,
in propelling for the first time in one's life a hollow log,
and with a small paddle like a large mush stick?and
across a raging torrent in a gloomy wilderness? Was it so
wonderful my end went round?and more than once!
Could I
help
it? Was it even a wonder I looked solema?
grew dizzy?and at last quit paddling altogether? But
it
was
a wonder I did not
upset
that vile swine thing, and
plunge all into the waterperhaps into death! and yet we
all reached, by the skill of Mr. Blank, our port in safety.
The horses in the meanwhile had been stripped, and
three or four trustworthy ones released from their bridles to
swim over by themselves; and so we made ready to ferry
over the remaining animals and all the baggage, not, indeed
at one, but several trips. The trust-worthy and more
sensible
creatures were led by the mane, or the nose, or
driven
with switches, and pelted with clods to the edge of the
creek; where they were partly coaxed, and partly pushed
into
the flood, whence rising from the plunge, they swam
snorting
to the far side, and landing, continued cropping about
till wanted.
The less accommodating creatures were one at a time
managed thus: Mr. Blank, senr. took a station at that end
of the canoe, which when dragged round by the horse
would become the stern, to guide and steer; and Mr. C.
twice, and Mr. Frank and young Blank each once, was
seated in the prow that was to be, and held the rope or
bridle
attached at the other end to the horse's head: then, all
ready, the creature pulled by the person in the canoe and
pelted, beat, slapped and pushed by the two on land took
the shoote;in this case a plunge direct over head and
ears into water a little over nine feet deep! If this did not
drag under or upset the log, that was owing to the(hem!)
dexterity and presence of mind and so forth, of the
steersman
and
the man at the bridle end! But when the
animal
arose and began to snort and swim ahead!oh! sirs,
then was realized and enjoyed all ever fabled about
Neptune
and his dolphins! or Davy Crockett and his alligators!
What if you have a qualm at first!that is soon lost in the
excitement of this demi-god sailing! It is even grand! to
cross a perilous flood on a log harnessed to a river horse!
and with the rapidity of a comet, and the whirl and splash
of a steamer! No wonder our Western people do often
feel contempt for the tender nurslings of the east! And is
it not likely that the fables about sea-cars, and water-gods,
originated when men lived in the woods, dieted on acorns,
and recreated themselves with this horse and log
navigation
?
The hint may be worth something to the editors of
Tooke's Pantheon.
In an hour and a half we reached our second night's
lodging place; and next day, at noon, the girls being
committed
to the junior gentlemen to escort to Sugartown,
the residence of Mr. Blank, he and the author took the
episodial journey, described in the following chapter.
CHAPTER XLV.
Shaking his trident, urges on his steeds,
Who with two feet beat from their brawny breasts
The foaming billow; but their hinder parts
Swim, and go smooth against the curling surge.
We
parted from our young folks, at an obscure trace,
leading Mr. B. and Mr. C. away to the left towards Big
Possum Creek; along which, somewhere in the woods,
Mr. Blank expected to meet an ecclesiastical body, of
which he was a member.
The spot was found late that night; but as yet no
delegates
had appeared, and when next day at three o'clock, P.M.
a single clergyman appeared, jaded and muddy, and
reported
the waters as too high for members in certain
directions
to come at all, the whole affair was postponed till
the subsidence of the flood; or, it was adjourned till dry
weather!
Mr. Blank being an officer of the general government,
and having important matters demanding his immediate
attention, now took me aside, and began as follows:
Mr. Carlton, do you want to try a little more backwood's
life?
Why?
Because, if possible, I should like to reach my house
to-night.
To-night!!why 'tis half-past three! and your house
is at least thirty-five miles
Yes, by the trace, up Big Possumbut in a straight
line through the woods 'tis not over twenty-five miles.
But there is no road?
I don't want any; the sun is bright, and by sun-down,
we shall strike a new road laid out last fall; and
that
I
can follow in the night.
I have never, Mr. B. swum a horse; and I confess I'm
a
leetle
timid; and we cannot expect even canoes where
there are no settlements
Oh! never fear, I'll go ahead; beside, Big Possum is
all that is very seriously in the way; and I think it will
hardly
swim us nowcome, what do you saywill you go?
Welllet's see; twenty-five milesno road, no
settlement
,
won't
quite
swim, maybenew road in the dark
pretty fair for a tyro, Mr. Blank; but I can't learn sooner;
I'll go, sirlet us be off at once then.
Our friends expressed some surprise, and used some
dehortation; but the bold, energetic, and cautious
character
of Mr. B. was well known, and hence no great fears
were either expressed or felt for our safety. Accordingly,
after a hasty kind of dinner-supper, we were mounted,
and started away in the fashion of boys' foot races,
prefaced
by the
formula
are you saddled?are you
bridled??whip!start!and Go-o!!
Big Possum was soon reached; and as there was no
ford established by law or custom, it was to be forded at a
venture. My friend sought, indeed, not for a place less
deep apparently, but for one less impeded by bushes and
briars, and then in he plunged, accoutred as he was, and
bade me follow. And so, indeed, I did boldly, and
promptly; for my courage was really so modest as to need
the stimulus of a blind and reckless conduct. Hence, all I
knew was a powerful heap of water in my boots again,
and an uneasy wet sensation in the saddle-seat
[21]
[21]
I hope the Magazines won't be hard on the grammar hereit is so
great a help to our delicacya
double intender
like.
with a
curious sinking of the horses hinder parts, as if he kicked
at something and could not hit itand then a hard
scramble
of his fore legs in the treacherous mud of a bank;
and then this outery of Mr. Blank, as he turned an instant
in his saddle to watch my emersion:
Well done! Carlton! well done! You'll be a
woodsman
yet! Come, keep upthe worst is over.
Reader! I
do
think praise is the most magical thing in
nature! In this case it nearly dried my inexpressibles!
And on I followed, consoling myself for the other water in
the boots, by singingpossum up a gum tree!
Hulloo! Mr. B. how are you steering? by the
moss?
Noby the
shadows
.
Shadows! how's that?
Our course is almost North Eastthe sun is nearly
Westso cutting the shadows of the trees at the present
angle, we'll strike the road, this rate, about sun-set.
I had travelled by the moss, a good general guide, the
north and north-west sides of trees, having more and
darker
moss than the others; I had gone by a compass in a
watch key-by blazesby the under side of leaves recently
upturned, a true Indian trace, as visible to the practiced eye
as the warm scent to a hound's noseand by the sun, moon,
or stars; I had, in dark days, gone with comrades, who by
keeping some fifty yards apart in a line, could correct
aberrations
;
but never had I thought of our present simple and
infallible guide!
Man maybe, as some think, very low in the intellectual
scale, and yet he has
one
mark of divine resemblancehe
always is in search of simple agents and means, and when
found, he uses them in producing the greatest effects.
Witness
here man's contrivances for navigating through the
air and the waters, and for crossing deserts and solitudes!
Laugh if you will, but I do confess that as we bounded along
Vol. II.6
that beautiful sunny afternoon and evening, I felt how like
gods we availed ourselves of reason, in that wilderness
without
squatters, without blazes, without dry leaves, having
no compass, and indifferent to moss; ay, and I smiled at
the grim trees, while we cut athwart their black shadows
at the proper angle, and heard from den and ravine and
cliff the startled echoes crying out in amazement, in
answering clatter and clang of hoofs and clamour of human
voices!
For many miles the land was low and level, and mostly
covered with water in successive pools, seeming, at a short
distance, like parts of one immense lake of the woods!
These pools were rarely more than a few inches deep,
unless
in cavities where trees had been torn up by their roots,
and such holes were easily avoided by riding around the
prostrate tops. My friend had not expected quite so much
water; for he now called out at intervals
Come on! Carlton! we mustn't be caught here in the
darkthe sun's getting lowcan you keep up?
Ayay!go on!go on!
And then, after every such exhortation and reply, as if all
past trotting had been walking, away, away we splashed,
not kicking up a dust, but a mimic shower of aqueous
particles
,
and many a smart sprinkle of mud, that rattled like
hail on the leaves above, and the backs and shoulders
below
!
Never did I believe how a horse can go!at least
through mud and water! True, I did often think of the
merciful man, merciful to his beastbut I thought in
answer, that hay and oats were as scarce in the swamp as
hog and hominy; and hence, that for all our sakes we
had better
bestir
matters a little extra for an hour or two,
that all might get to entertainment for man and horse.
Hence, finally, we gave up all talking, singing, humming,
and whistling, and all conjecturing and wishing; and set
in to plain, unostentatious hard riding, kicking and whipping,
our respective critturs so heartily as to leave no doubt
somewhere under their hides, of our earnestness and haste;
and, therefore, about half an hour after sunset, we gained
or
struck
the expected road, where, although not yet free
from the waters, we had no more apprehension of losing
the course.
This road was, in truth, a new new road; and not like
some new new roads, new theatres and so forth that have
had a patent for immortality and been fresh with youth for
half a century
[22]
[22]
However, new books now-a-days are exempt from the remark
being no more than literary fungi. Our fathers liked
state
new things
the sons prefer new things that
have a smell
and die.
And, happily, our road had never been
cut up by a wagon, being only an opening twelve yards
wide, full of stumps, and for a few miles a-head, full of
water. Without a fixed purpose, therefore, we could not
wander from the partially illuminated and comparatively
unimpeded way; and hence twilight as it was, on we
splattered
and splashed in all the glory and plenitude of
mudhail
,
and dirt-coloured rain.
At last we re-entered the dry worlda high and rolling
country. As it was, however, then profoundly dark, our
concluding five miles were done in a walk, slow, solemn,
and funereal; till at half past ten o'clock that night we
dismounted
or disembarked, wet, weary, and hungry, at Mr.
B.'s door: and there we were more than welcomed by his
family, and all our boys and girls snug and safe from the
late perils of woods and waters.
CHAPTER XLVI.
Slowly and sadly we laid him down
From the field of his fame, fresh and gory;
We carved not a line, we raised not a stone,
But we left him alone with his glory.
At
the end of a week's visit we left Sugartown for
Tippecanoe
:
but with a very diminished party. It consisted
of one young lady only, the two young gentlemen, myself,
and other four, horses. The lady, Miss Charille, lived
twenty-five miles to the north, and within ten miles of
Tippecanoe. The young fellows accompanied out of
gallantry
,
and to visit with me the field.
Being in a hurry, I shall not say how, in fording and
swimming Sweet Creek,
my
head became
dizzy
, till my
horse seemed to rush side ways up the streamand how,
spite of all practice and contrary resolutions, I felt sick and
let down my limbs into the water, while Mr. B., who came
to
see
us safe over, kept crying out, Stick to your horse
don't look at the waterlook at the bank! Nor shall I
tell how, in crossing a prairie, we saw, oh! I don't know
how many deer!nor how we started up prairie fowls,
hens and roosters, and wished we had guns!yes, and
saw prairie wolves too, a cantering from us over the plain!
And I shall not narrate how, in crossing one wet prairie,
we were decoyed by some pretty, rich, green grass, into a
morass!and how Miss Charille's horse stuck fast, and
struggling, pitched her into the mire!and how she was
more scared than hurt, and worse muddied than either! I
should like to tell about the tall grass in places, but I hasten
to say, that early in the evening we arrived at Mr. Charille's;
that we were cordially received; that we got supper in due
season, and then went to bed in western style, all in one
room: the beds here nearly touching in places, but
ingeniously
separated by extemporary curtains of frocks and
petticoats, and on a side of
my
bed, by two pairs of modest
and respectable corduroy breeches. Fastidious folks, that
smell at essences and flourish perfumed cambric, I know
would have laid awake, curling their noses at the articles,
but sensible ones in such cases go quietly to sleep; while
men of genius are even captivated with the romance.
`Romance!what, a curtain of corduroy thinging-bobs?'
Yes, corduroy breeches modestly hung as wall between
ladies and gentlemen, reposing amid the solemn vastness
of a prairie! If
that
is not romance, pray what is? To
sleep alone in a plastered chamber, with a lock on the
door, blinds to the windows, wash-stand, toilette, and so
on, is very comfortablevery civilizedbut surely not very
romantic. And if strangeness is a constituent of romance,
could any fix and fixtures be contrived stranger than ours?
However, like a
sensible
body, I went soon and quietly
to sleep, and was quickly in spirit lost in the land of
shadows
and dreams: and having a fine capacity for dreaming,
I had many visions, till at last came one of my pet dreams
a winged dream! Then, lifted on pinions fastened some
where about me, I went sailing in the air over the wide
expanse of the meadow world; then, careering in a black
tempest and hurricane, far above the bowing and crashing
trees of the forestand then suddenly descending near a
mighty swollen river, I was deprived in some mysterious
way of the wings! Here I lay stretched on a bed, while
the form of that venerable quadruped, my dear nameless old
friend, a little larger than life, backed up and became
harnessed
to the foot of the couch, and the dwarf pony began
with his hinder parts to push against the head-board, and I
was just a-launching into the waters, when down dropped
both the steeds, and commenced to snort with so tremendous
a tempest of noise as to wake me! I rubbed my eyes and
smiledbut is it possible?hark!am I still dreaming?
What is that beyond the corduroys in the adjoining bed?
Dear, oh dear! can that be Dr. Charille snoring?
During the week spent at Mr. Blank's his lady had once
said to me,
Mr. Carlton, you will not sleep any at Dr. Charille's.
Not sleep anywhy?
His snoring will keep you awake.
Never fearI can sleep in a thunder storm.
So I thought. But when lately he visited here, he
insisting on sleeping alone in the passage, which we not
permitting, when his snoring began, sure enough, as he
himself pleasantly predicted, nobody else could sleep.
This conversation now recurred, when that amazing
snoring formed and then destroyed my dream! What a
relief, if young Mr. Frank and I, who slept together, could
have laughed! One might have ventured, indeed, with
impunity, during any paroxysm of snoring, if one could
have quit when it subsided; for the most honest
cachination
must have been unheard in the uproar of the Doctor's
nasal trumpetings.
How shall we so write as to give any correct idea of the
performance? Pitiful, indeed, it began, like a puppy's
whine; but directly its tone passed into an abrupt, snappish,
mischievous, and wicked snort; and then into a frightful
tornado of windy sleep; after which, in a few minutes, it
subsided, and suddenly ceased, as if the doctor had made a
successful snap and swallowed it! If this description be
not satisfactory, I hope the reader will send for Robert
Dale Owen, who, knowing how to represent morals and
circumstances by diagrams, may succeed in the same way
at setting forth snoring; but such is beyond our power.
The doctor evidently worked by the job, from his
earnestness
and haste: and certainly he did do, in any five
minutes of a paroxysm, vastly more and better than all of us
combined could have done the whole night. Happily any
sound, regularly repeated, becomes a lullaby; and hence
he that had snored me awake, snored me asleep again; but
never can I forget that amazing, startling, and exhilatory
nasal solo! That nose could have done snoring parts in a
somnambula, and would have roused up the drowsy hearers
better than the clash of brass instruments!
After an ealy breakfast, the two youngsters and myself set
off on horse-back for Tippecanoe; intending, as the field
was only ten miles, to return, if possible, in the evening to
Dr. Charille's.
The day was favorable, and our path led usually through
prairies, where awe is felt at the grandeur of the wild
plains stretching away, sometimes with undulations, but
oftener with unbroken smoothness, to meet the dim horizon.
Yet one is frequently surprised and delighted there, with
views of picturesque meadows, fringed with thickets
intervening
,
and separating the primitive pasturages as in the
golden age! The green and flowery meads seemed made
for flocks and herds: and imagination easily created, under
the shade of trees, shepherds and shepherdesses, with
crooks and sylvan reeds! It heard the sound of pipes!
the very tones of thrilling and strange voices!
Then we seemed to approach a country of modern farms,
where the gopher hills resembled hay-cocks awaiting the
wagon! and countless wild plums laden with rich and
fragrant
fruit recalled the Eastern orchards! Alas! our
inconsistency
!
then I, who a while since looked with
rapture
to the sun-set and longed for the West, now looked to
the sun-rise and sighed for the Eastthe far East! And
why not? There was the home of my orphan boyhood!
there had I revelled, and without care, in the generous toils
of the harvest!the binding of sheaves!the raking of
hay!the hay-mow!the stack-yard! There had I
snared
rabbitstrapped muskratsfound hens' nestslaid up
walnuts and shell-barks! Ay! there had I fished with
pinhooks
,
and caught in a little, dark, modest brook, more
roach and gudgeon than the fellow with his store hook with
a barbed point! And then the sliding down hills of ice on
our own home-made sleds!and upsetting!and rolling
to the bottom! Yes! yes! after all, those were the
halcyon
days! And so for a time how keen that morning the
pangs of a desolate heart as I realized the immense
solitudes
around me!
We had been directed to cross the river at a new town,
which, on reaching, was found to contain one log-house
half finished, and one tent belonging to a Canadian
Frenchman
,
and some Indians. And yet, before we left the New
Purchase, this Sproutsburgh had become a village to be
seen from a distance, and not many years after contained
fourteen
retail
stores!a specimen of our
wholesale
growth
in the West. But to me an object of great interest was a
tall young Indian, dressed in a composite mode, partly
barbarian
,
partly civilized. His pantaloons were of blue cloth,
and he wore a roundabout of the same; while his small
feet were tastefully clad with sumptuously wrought
moccasins
,
and his head encircled with a woollen or ram-beaver
hat, banded with a broad tin belt, and garnished with a
cockade! He was seemingly about eighteen years old;
and by way of favour he consented to ferry us over the
water. And now, reader, here hast thou a fair token that
this work is true asmost history; and not more
extravagant
than our puerile school histories for beginners:
[23]
[23]
The present age is that of beginnings. Hence school-books are
usually all for beginners; and it requires a wheel-barrow for a scholar
now instead of a satchel. Things are also
ended
and
finished
but not
continued
and
done
.
I
resist the temptation of having ourselves skiffed over in a
bark canoe! For, alas! we crossed in an ugly scow, and
it moved by a pole!
Yet was it nothing, as I held my horse, to look on that
half reclaimed son of the forest, while he urged our rude
flat-boat across the tumultuating waters of a river with an
Indian nameWabash! and we on our way to an Indian
battle fieldTippecanoe!
On the far bank we galloped into one of many narrow
traces along the river, and running through mazy thickets
of undergrowth; and shortly, spite of our many directions
and cautions, quite as bepuzzling as the paths themselves,
we were lost; having followed some deer or turkey trail
till it miraculously disappeared, the animal being there
used to jump off, or the bird to fly up! Then, and on
like occasions, we put in towards the river, and when in
sight or hearing of its waters, sometimes without, and
sometimes
with a blind path, we kept up stream the best we
could. A blind path has that name because it tries the
eyes and often requires spectacles to find it; or because
one is in constant jeopardy of having the eyes blinded or
struck out by unceremonious limbs, bushes, branches, and
sprays.
Recent high water had formed many extemporary
lagoons
,
beyous and quagmires, which forced us often away
from the river bank, that we might get round these sullen
and melancholy lakes; although, after all our extra riding,
we commonly appeared to have gone farther and fared
worse; and hence, at last, we crossed wherever the
impediment
first offered. Once a muddy ravine presented
itself; and as the difficulty seemed less than usual, we
began
our crossing with little or no circumspection,and
yet it was, truly, a most dangerous morass! Happily, we
entered a few yards below the worst spot, and had
creatures
used to floundering through beds of treacherous and
almost bottomless mire.
6*
I had small space to notice my comrades, for my noble
and spirited animal, finding in an instant the want of a solid
spot, by instinct exerted her entire strength in a succession
of leaps so sudden and violent as soon to displace the rider
from the saddle; and when she gained
terra firma
, that
rider was on her neck instead of back. A leap more would
have freed her neck of the incumbrance, and our author would
have either sunk or have done his own floundering. He
stuck to the neck, not by skill, but for want of sufficient
time to fall off! Having now opportunity to look round,
we saw one young gentleman wiping the mud from his
eyes, nose, ears, and mouthproof that all his senses had
been open; and the other we saw stand, indeed, but very
much like a man that had dismounted hastily and not
altogether
purposely,he was on all fours! The three horses
were sorely panting and trembling; while the bosom of the
quagmire was regaining its placidity after the late unusual
agitation, and in a few moments had become calm and
deceitful
as policy itself when for the
people
it has sacrificed
its
friends!
And yet, where we had crossed, the mire after all was
not so
rery
deepit did not, we were told, average more
than
five
feet! But, two rods above and one below, the
quaggery required a pole to touch its bottom some fifteen
feet long! And this we ascertained by trial, and also from
the squatter, at whose cabin we halted a moment, just one
mile belowthe Field.
Our windings, however, brought us to a sight mournful
and solemna coffin in which rested an Indian babe!
This rude coffin was supported in the crotch of a large
tree, and secured from being displaced by the wind, being
only a rough trough dug out with a tomahawk, and in which
was deposited the little one, and having another similar
trough bound down over the body with strips of papaw.
Sad seemed the dreamless sleep of the poor innocent so
separate from the graves of its fathers and the children of
its people! Mournful the voice of leaves whispering over
the dead in that sacred tree! The rattling of naked
branches there in the hoarse winds of winter!how
desolate
!
And yet if one after death
could
lie amid thick and
spicy ever-green branches near the dear friends left
instead
of being locked in the damp vault! or trodden like
clay in the deep, deep grave!
But would that be rebellion against the sentence dust
thou art, and unto dust shalt thou return?then let our
bodies be laid in the silence and the dark till the morning
and the life! See! what woodland is that yonder? That
advanced like the apex of a triangle; and yet as we now
approach nearer and nearer, is rising up and has become an
elevated plain?
That
is Tippecanoe!
Yes! this is Tippecanoe, as it stood some twelve years
after the battle!Tippecanoe in its primitive and sacred
wilderness
!
unscathed by the axe, unshorn by the scythe,
unmarked
by roads, unfenced! We are standing and walking
among the slain warriors! Can it be that I am he, who but
yesterday was roused from sleep to aid in setting up the
declaration of war against Great Britain, to appear as an
extra sheet? and who, each subsequent week, thrilled as
I composed in the iron stick accounts of battles by
land and fights at sea?in the days of Maxwell rollers and
Ramage presses!and hardy pressmen in paper aprons
and cloth trousers!long before the invasion of petticoats
and check aprons!
Oh! ye men and boys of ink and long primer! how our
spirits were stirred to phrensy and swelled with burnings
and longings after fame!while, like trumpeters calling to
battle, we scattered forth our papers that woke up the souls
of men! Then I heard of Harrison and Tippecanoe; and
dreamed even by day of a majestic soldier seated on his
charger, and his drawn sword flashing its lightnings, and
his voice swelling over the din of battle like the blast of the
clarion!and of painted warriors, like demons, rushing with
the knife and tomahawk upon the white tents away, away off
somewhere in the unknown wilds,of shout, and groan,
and sabre-stroke, and death-shots falling thick and fast as
lightning from the mountain cloud!And do I
stand
, and
without a dream
look on
Tippecanoe?
Even so!for see, here mouldering are trunks of trees
that formed the hasty rampart!here the scars and seams
in the trees torn by balls!ay! here in this narrow circle
are skeletons of, let me count again, yes, of fourteen
war-horses
!
But where the riders? Here, under this beech
see, the record in the bark!we stand on the earth over
the deadrider and horsefriendfoein one red burial
blent!
What is this?the iron band of a musket! See! I
have found a rusty bayonet! Was it ever wet with blood?
Perhaps it belonged to the brave soul about whom the
squatter gave us the following anecdote:
A party of United States regulars were stationed
there
,
and with strict orders for none to leave ranks. An Indian
crawled behind this large logits pretty rotten now you
seeand here loading and firing he killed four or five of
us; while we daresn't quit ranks and kill him. But one
of our chaps said to the nearest officer`Leftenint! for
Heaven's sakegimme leaf to kill that red devil ahind the
logI'll be in ranks agin in a minute!' `My brave
fellow'
said
the officer, `I darn't give you leaveI musn't
see
you go.' And with that he walked off akeepin his
back towards us; and, when he turned and got back, our
soldier
was in ranks; but, gentlemen, his bagnit was bloody,
and a deep groan from behind this here old log, told the
officer that the bagnit had silenced the rifle and avenged
the fall of our messmates and comrades.
If the reader imagine a strip of woodland, triangular in
form, its point or apex jutting a kind of promontory into the
prairie whose long grass undulates like the waving of an
inland
sea; if on one side of this woody isle, he imagines a
streamlet about fifteen feet below and stealing along through
the grass; and on the other side, here, a mile, and there,
two miles across the prairie, other woodlands hiding in
their darkness the Wabash; and if he imagines that river,
at intervals gleaming in the meadow, like illuminated parts
merely of the grass-lake, he may picture for himself
something
like Tippecanoe in the simplicity of uncurled
[24]
[24]
Hemans.
nature, and before it was marred and desecrated by man's
transformations!
The first intimation of the coming battle, as our squatter
who was in it, said, was from the waving grass. A
sentinel
hid that night in the darkness of the wood, was gazing
in a kind of dreamy watchfulness over the prairie,
admiring
,
as many times before, the beauteous waving of its hazy
bosom. But never had it seemed so strangely agitated;
a narrow and strong current was setting rapidly towards
his post; and yet no violent wind to give the stream that
direction! He became first, curious soon, suspicious.
Still nothing like danger appearedno voice,no sound
of footsteps,no whisper! Yet rapidly and steadily
onward
sets the currentits first ripples are breaking at his
feet! He awakes all his senses;but discovers nothing
he strains his eyes over the top of the bending grass
and then, happy thought! he kneels on the earth and looks
intently below that grass! Then, indeed, he saw, not a
wind moved currentbut Indian warriors in a stooping
posture
and stealing noiseless towards his posta fatal and
treacherous under current in that waving grass!
The sentinel springing to his feet cried out, Who comes
there?
Pottawatamie!the answer, as an Indian leaped with
a yell from the grass, and almost in contact with the
soldier
and
then, fell back with a death scream as the ball
of the sentinel's piece entered the warrior's heart, and gave
thus the signal for combat!
Our men may have slumbered; for it was a time of
treaty and trucebut it was in armour they lay, and with
ready weapons in their bands; and it was to this
precaution
of their general, we owed the speedy defeat of the
Indians
;
although not before they had killed about seventy
of our little army. No one can properly describe the
horrors
of that night attackat least, I shall not attempt it.
It required the coolness and deliberation, and at the same
time, the almost reckless daring and chivalric behaviour
of the commander and his noble officers and associates, to
foil such a foe, and at such a time; even with the loss of
so many brave men of their small number. That the foe
was defeated and driven off is proof enough to Western
men(if not to Eastern politicians who do battles on paper
plains)that all was anticipated and done by Harrison
that was necessary. It would not become a work like this,
which
inexperienced
folks may not think is quite as true as
other histories, to meddle with the history of an honest
President; but the writer knows, and on the best authority,
that General Harrison did that night all that a wise, brave,
and benevolent soldier ought to do or could do; and among
other things, that his person was exposed in the fiercest
and bloodiest fights where balls repeatedly passed through
his clothes and his cap.
There was, however, one in the battle so generous, so
chivalric, so kind, and yet so eccentric, that his life would
make a volume of truth more exciting than fictionthe
celebrated Joseph Hamilton Davies, familiarly and kindly
called in the West,
Joe Daris
. A lawyer by profession,
he was eminent in all pertaining to his science and art;
but pre-eminent in the adjustment of land claims. An
anecdote about him on this point appeared in the
newspapers
some years since; it deserves a more imperishable
record in a work destined to be read and preserved in so
many familiesmaybe!
A person, served with an ejectment, and fearing from
the length of his adversary's purse, that he must be unjustly
deprived of his lands, came from a great distance to solicit
the aid of Davies. He succeeded in his application, and
was dismissed with an assurance that, in due season, the
lawyer would appear for his client and prevent his being
dispossessed.
The arena of contest was, as has been intimated,
distant
;
and hence Davies was in person a stranger to the
members of that court, or so imperfectly known that an
uncanonical
dress would be an effectual concealment. His
client's case being duly called, matters by the opposite
party were set in such a light that a verdict from the jury,
and a decision from the bench, in favour of the plaintiff
seemed inevitable; yet, for form's sake, the defendant must
be heard.
The poor client had relied so entirely on Davies, and
had felt so certain of being secured in his possessions, as
to have neglected to obtain any other legal aidand still,
at this critical moment when he was to be summoned for
his defenceDavies had not arrived! Nay!while
earnestly
straining his eyes, the client was even rudely jostled
by a rough chap in hunting shirt and leather breeches, who
carrying a heavy rifle in his hand and with a racoon-skin
cap slouched over his face, kept squeezing very
impudentdently
even among the laughing and good natured lawyers
inside the bar; where, to everybody's diversion, he
appropriated
to himself a seat with the most simple and awkward
naivete possible; but what diversion was all this to our
client looking round in despair for his lawyer! And then
when the judge asked who appeared for the defendant,
what amazement must have mingled with the client's
despair
when at the call up rose that rude hunter and replied:
I do, please your honour!
You!replied his honorwho are you, sir?
Joseph Hamilton Davies, please your honor!
And now, after that heavy rifle was slowly placed in a
snug corner of the bar, and that skin cap was removed from
the head, plain enough was it that the noble face, no longer
concealed, was his; the talented, the philanthropic, the
eccentric Joe Davis. Never before had so much law been
cased in a hunting shirt and buckskins; and never before
nor since, was, or has been, a difficult cause in such a guise
pleaded so triumphantly: for the entire superstructure of
the opposite argument was completely subverted and a
verdict and decision, in proper time, rendered for the
defendant
,
when to all appearance it had been virtually made,
if not formally declared, for his antagonist.
Alas! noble heart! and here is thy very grave! Yes,
J. H. D. is here in the barkmy finger is in the rude
graving!and now at the root of the tree I am seated
making my notes! The last the squatter ever saw of Joe
Davies alive, was when his grey horse was plunging in
the furious charge down this hillwhen the sentinel,
already
named, had fired and called to arms! And the
next day our guide helped to lay Davies in this grave; and
saw his name transferred to the living monument here
sheltering
and fanning his sepulchre!
We lingered at Tippecanoe till the latest possible
moment
!there
was, in the wildness of the battle-fieldin
my intimate acquaintance with some of its actorsin the
living trees, scarred and hacked with bullet and hatchet,
and marked with names of the deadin the wind so sad
and melancholysomething so like embodied trances, that
I wandered the field all over, here standing on a grave,
there resting on a decaying bulwark; now counting the
scars of trees, now the skeleton heads of horses; finding
in one spot a remnant of some iron weapon, in another, the
bones of a slain soldier dragged, perhaps, by wild beasts
from his shallow grave!till my young comrades insisted
on our return if we expected to reach our friend's house
before the darkness of night.
Having, accordingly, deposited in my valisse a few relics
and mementos, we rode down the hill into the prairie, at
the spot poor Davies was seen descending and leading a
charge; and over the very ground where the grassy
current
had betrayed the dangerous under-tide of painted foes.
Hence we crossed over to the town whence the Indians
issued for the attack, and where the wily prophet himself
remained in safety, concocting charms against the white
man's weapons! After this, we turned down the Wabash,
keeping our eyes ever directed towards the mournful island
of wood, till at last we doubled its cape, and lost sight of
Tippecanoe for ever!
That field, however, and its hero of North Bend are
immortal
.
BATTLE OF TIPPECANOE.
Within the shelter of the primal wood,
An isle amid the prairie's flow'ry sea,
Upon his midnight watch, our sentry stood,
Guarding the slumbers of the brave and free;
And o'er the swellings of a seeming tide,
Dim sparkling in the moonlight's silv'ry haze,
The soldier oft, distrustful, far and wide,
Sent searching looks, or fixed his steadfast gaze.
Long had he watch'd; and still each grassy wave
Brought nought save perfumes to the tented isle;
Nor sign of foe the fragrant breezes gave;
Till thoughts of cabin-home his sense beguile,
Far from the wilds: for yet, though fix'd intent,
As if his eyes discerned a coming host,
Those moisten'd eyes are on his lov'd ones bent
He sleeps not; but the dreams upon his post.
Soldier! what current like a hast'ning stream,
Outstrips the flowing of you lagging waves?
Shake off the fetters of thy fatal dream!
Quick! save thy comrades from their bloody graves!
He starts!he marks the prairie's bosom shake!
He sees that current to the woodland near!
He kneelsupleaps and criesComrades, awake!
To arms! to arms!the treach'rous foe is here!
Like mountain torrent, furious gushing,
The warrior tribe is on us rushing,
With weapons in their red hands gleaming,
And charmed banners from them streaming!
To arms! to arms! ye slumb'ring brave!
To arms!your lives and honor save!
Arm'd, from the earth, our host is springing;
Their sabres forth from sheaths are ringing;
Their chargers mounted, fierce are prancing;
Their serried bay'nets swift advancing:
Quick, to your posts! the general's cry,
Answer'd, We're there, to do or die!
Hand to hand, within that solemn wood,
For life, fought warriors true and good!
The hatchet through the brain went crushing!
The bay'net brought the heart blood gushing!
On arrows' feather'd wings death went,
Or swift, at the rifle flash, was sent,
Till victor shouts the air was rending,
And groans the wounded forth were sending!
Charge! soldiers, charge! brave Davies shouted;
They charg'd; the yelling foe was routed;
Yet long before that foe was flying,
That hero, on the plain, was dying!
That prairie lake rolls peaceful waves no more;
Its bosom rages 'neath a tempest pow'r
See! driven midst it, from the woodland shore,
Fierce bands rush vanquish'd from a deadly show'r!
And gleaming steel, and lead and iron hail
Pour vengeful out of war's dark sky,
'Mid shriek, and fright, and groan, and dying wail,
And triumph's voice, Charge home! they fly!
Solemn the pomp where mourning heroes tread
With arms revers'd, and measur'd step, and slow!
Sadly, yet proud, is borne their comrade dead,
Their warlike ensigns bound with badge of woe!
Sublime, though plaintive, pours the clarion's tone!
The heart, while bow'd, is stirred by muffled drum!
But stand within that far-off wild wood lone,
Where Prairie scented winds, with dirges, come,
Where the rough bark, rude grav'd with hunter's knife,
Points to the spot where Davies rests below,
And relics scatter'd, tell of bloodiest strife
Heart gushing tears from dimming eyes must flow!
And round thy mournful bier, our warrior sage;
Who rushing reckless to each fiercest fight,
Didst fall a victim to no foeman's rage
Amid the camage of that fearful night,
A nation, yet, in tears, has smitten stood
Grieving o'er thee with loud and bitter cry!
Rest thee, our hero of that island wood!
Worthy in thine own ransom'd West to lie!
When floating down Ohio's grand old wave,
Our eyes shall turn to where his forests stand,
Stretching dark branches o'er our chieftain's grave
Father and saviour of the Western's land!
CHAPTER XLVII.
For now I stand as one upon a rock
Environed with a wilderness of sea.
Late
at night we arrived safe at Dr. Charille's. The
next day we set out for Woodville, choosing on the return
other paths, to avoid former difficulties and dangers; by
which prudence, however, we only reversed matters; for
instance, instead of water before a swamp, we got the
swamp before the water. And, also, we thus often set out
before
day-light in the dark, instead of travelling in the
dark
after
day-lighttravelling occasionally to reach a
settlement in the dark at both ends of the day. Besides
our new route threw us away up Nut Creek, where,
contrary
to all expectation, it was found necessary either to
swim below a mill-dam, or be canoed across above the dam.
The latter was our choice; and as it afforded a pleasant
variety in the horse and log navigation, we shall give the
adventure and then skip all the way to Woodville.
The whole plain
[25]
[25]
Aequor
is classic and poetic authority.
of water to be crossed was about one
hundred and twenty yards wide. But it consisted of three
divisions, the Creek Proper, twenty yards wide and now
eighteen feet deep; and two lagoons, each full, on opposite
sides of the creek, and averaging each fifty yards in width,
although in most places, the banks being low, the lagoons
could not be distinguished from the creek, but the three
divisions
seemed one water, lake, or sea. Our transit spot
was a place, where, from the edge of the hither lagoon
could be discerned by a careful observer, a modest little
grassy mound in the water, a kind of frog-island, which the
miller said was the nearest bank of the creek; and that
from this mound another on the opposite bank could be
discovered
,
or
nearly
so. And nothing, he said, would be
easier for us than first to ford over the lagoon to the
nearest
mound, where he would meet us in a canoe: that here
we could strip our horses, and thence by turns every thing
could be transported to the farther mound, whence, all
matters re-arranged, we could ford the distant lagoon, and
so come finally to the dry land on the opposite hill beyond
the bottom.
This certainly was plausible, if not captivating;
especially
should not the horses become entangled in the brush and
vines, forming tolerable fish-nets under water, and should
the lagoons be
only
four feet deep. They certainly looked,
to judge from the surface water up the trunks of trees,
somewhere about six feet deep; but then both the
miller-man
and his son were right down sartin, it wan't more
nor four feet no place, nor it moughn't be that deep,
except
in them 'are blasted holes!
Receiving ample direction for circumnavigating the holes
aforesaid, we took aim for the first isle-of-bank, and were
soon so well
in
for it, that the difficulty and peril of going
backward and forward were equal; and therefore, we
worked onward, tacking incessantly every way to avoid
logs, trees, and vines, and in awe all the while of them
'are holes, till we began to rise once more in the world,
and stood sublime in the very middle of Frog-land!
Believe me, reader! it was not void of uneasiness, we
thus sundered from the world, looked back on the woods
just left, and standing partly in and partly out of the water!
while, at our feet, and separated by a strip of grass, swept
along in the pride and fury of risen waters, the creek itself,
curling amply over a few inches of the still visible dam, and
shaking and tearing away with its yet rising tide our little
territory! And that canoe! a tiny log shell, to transport
us to the other lagoon, where four feet water, logs, trees,
vines and holes must be encountered again! How like
the realms of Pluto! and we, how like terrified ghosts
awaiting a passage across the Styx in the rickety bark of
Charon!
All ready, I attempted, bridle in hand, to step into the
canoe, but by some awkwardness, I stumbled into the far
end, and thus so violently jerked the rein, that my creature
soused in, and descended almost the length of the bridle;
but by the time she gave her first snortings, on regaining
the air, our log was over, and the creature (i. e.
equa
) was
pawing up the isle-of-bank number 2. Here we remained
till Mr. Frank and his horse arrived, and a third trip had
brought our saddles and baggage; and then, duly prepared,
we forded lagoon the second, and in proper season gained
our wished for hill, and
What stuff!
What stuff? gentle reader, what better could you do
with a mud and water subject?
Yesbut what's the use of such things?
La! that's so like what Aunt Kitty said, when I got to
Woodville, all dirty and tiredmy new boots thick with
exterior mudmy best coat altogether spoiledmy fur
hat crushed into fancy shapes, and the seat of my corduroy
inexpressibles abraded to the finest degree of tenuosity at
all consistent with comfort and decorum!
CHAPTER XLVIII.
And it came to pass at noon, that Elijah
mocked
them.
Vide on Ancient Record
.
Let me see wherein
My tongue hath wrong'd him: if it do him right,
Then he hath wrong'd himself:if he be free,
Why then, my taxing, like a wild goose flies,
Unclaimed of any man.
On
the last day of the return to Woodville, we met at
intervals during the final half-dozen miles, not less than
one dozen wagons, large and small, and partially loaded,
some with beds and bedding, and some with culinary
utensils
;
the interstices being filled with a wedging of human
bodiesmen, women, and children, some laughing and
talking, others solemn and demure.
They seemed at first view settlers, who, having sold to
advantage old farms, were flitting to where wood and game
were more abundant, and neighbours not crowded offensively
under other's noses, as near as one or two miles. But
soon appeared people riding once, twice, and even thrice on
a horse; and some kind-hearted horses, like the nameless
one, were carrying on their backs whole families; and
then it was plain enough what was meanta big meeting
was to come off somewhere. And shortly all doubt was at
an end, when familiar soprano and alto voices from under
wagon covers, and out of scoop-shovelled bonnets came
forth thusHow'd do! Mr. Carlton?come, won't you
go to camp meetin? And then sounded, from extra
devotional
parties and individuals, snatches of favourite religious
songs, fixed to trumpet melodies, such as Glory! glory,
glory!He's a coming, coming, coming!Come, let
us march on, march on, march on! and the like; and the
saintly voices were ever and anon oddly commingled
with some very unsanctimonious laughing, not intended
for irreverence, but not properly suppressed at some
ill-timed
joke in another quarter, related perhaps, yet more
probably practiced. For nothing excels the fun and frolic,
where two or three dozen half-tamed young gentlemen and
ladies, mounted on spirited and mischievous horses set out
together to attend a Mormon, a Shaking-quaker, or a Millery
or a Camp-meeting.
At the very edge of Woodville, too, there met us a
comfortable
looking middle-aged woman, who was riding a
horse, and was without any bonnet; her other apparel being
in some disorder, and her hair illy done up and barely
restrained
by a horn comb. She thus addressed me:
I say, Mister, you haint seen nara bonnit?
Bonnet!no, ma'am; have you lost your bonnet?
YesI've jist had a powerful exercise over thare in
the Court-house; and when I kim to, I couldn't see my
bonnit no whare about
Has there been meeting in the Court-house lately?
Oh! Lord bless you, most powerful timeand it's
there I've jist
got
religion
And
lost
your bonnet?
Yes, sir,but some said as it maybe mought a-gone on
to camp with somebody's plunder: you didn't see or hear
tell on it, did you?
No, I did not; but had you really no power over your
bonnet, ma'am?
Well! now!who ever heern of a body in a exercise
a thinkin on a bonnit! Come, mister, you'd better turn
round and go to camp and git religion yourself, I allow
thar's whar all the town a'most and all the settlemints round
is agoinbut I'll have to whip up and look after my
bonnit
good
bye, mister!
And so all Woodville and its vicinities were in the
ferment
of departure for a camp-meeting! Now as this was
to be a big meeting of the biggest size, and all the
crack
preachers within a circle of three hundred miles were to
be present, and also a celebrated African exhorter from
Kentucky; and as much was said about these
heaven-directed
,
and heaven-blessed, and heaven-approved
campings
;
and as I, by a constant refusal to attend heretofore,
had become a suspected character, it being often said,
yes,Carlton's a honest sort of man, but why don't he
go out to camp and git religion?I determined now to go.
Why whole families should once or twice a year break
up for two weeks; desert domestic altars; shut up regular
churches; and take away children from school; why cook
lots of food at extra trouble and with ill-bestowed expense;
why rush to the woods and live in tents, with peril to health
and very often ultimately with loss of life to feeble persons;
why folks should do these and other things under a belief
that the Christian God is a God of the woods and not of the
towns, of the tents and not of the churches, of the same
people in a large and disorderly crowd and not in one
hundred
separate and orderly congregationswhy? why? I had
in my simplicity repeatedly asked, and received for answer:
Oh! come and see! Only come to camp and git your
cold heart warmedcome git religionlet it out with a
shoutand you'll not axe them infidel sort of questions no
more.
This was conclusive. And like the vicar of Wakefield,
I resolved not always to be wise, but for once to float with
a tide neither to be stemmed nor directed. A friend,
learned
in these spiritual affairs, advised me not to go till
Saturday
night, or so as to be on the ground by daylight on
Sunday
.
This I did, and was handsomely rewarded by seeing
and hearing some very extraordinary conversionsas far as
they went; and also some wonderful scenes and outcries.
Vol. II.7
The camp was an old and favourite ground, eight miles
from Woodville. It had been the theatre of many a
spirit-stirring
drama; and there, too, many a harvest of glory had
been reaped in battling with the devil and his legions.
Yet wonderful! his satanic majesty never became shy of a
spot where he was said always to have the worst of the
fight! and now it was commonly said and believed that a
prodigious great contest was to come off; and
hell-defying
challenges had been given in some Woodville
pulpits for Satan to come out and do his prettiest. Nay, by
certain prophets that seemed to have the gift of discerning
spirits, it was allowed the ole boy was now out at camp
[26]
[26]
Candour obliges me to say these allowings and predictions
were truethe devil did seem to be out there in pretty great force. I
cannot say so positively about his defeats.
in great forcethat some powerful fights would be seen,
but that the ole fellow would agin and agin git the worst
of it.
The camp proper was a parallelogramic clearing, and
was most of the day shaded by the superb forest trees, which
admitted, here and there, a little mellow sunshine to gleam
through the dense foliage upon their own dark forms
quivering
in a kind of living shadow over the earth. At night,
the camp was illuminated by lines of fires kindled and duly
sustained on the tops of many altars and columns of stone
and log-masonrya truly noble and grand idea, peculiar to
the West. Indeed, to the imaginative, there is very much
to bewitch in the poetry and romance of a Western
camp-meeting
:the
wildness, the gloom, the grandeur of our
foreststhe gleaming sunlight by day, as if good spirits
were smiling on the sons of light in their victories over the
children of darknessthe clear blue sky like a dome over
the tentsthat dome, at night, radiant with golden stars, like
glories of heaven streaming through the apertures of the
concave! And the moon!how like a spirit world, a
residence
of ransomed ones! The very tents, too!formed
like booths at the feast of tabernacles, and seeming to be
full of joyous heartsa community having all things
common
,
dead to the world, just ready to enter heaven! And
when the trumpet sounded for singing!the enthusiastic
performance of child-like tunes, poured from the hearts of
two thousand raptured devotees, till the bosom of the
wilderness
trembles and rejoices while it rolls over its
wooded
hills and through its dark valleys the echo of the pan
with the peal of deep thunder and the roar of rushing
whirlwinds
!
Under the direction of wise and talented
men
, a
camp-meeting
may possibly be a means of
a little
permanent
good; but, with the
best
management, it is a doubtful means
of much moral and spiritual goodnay, it cannot long be
used in a cautious and sober way. In religion, as in all
other affairs, where the main dependence is on expedients to
reach the moral man through the fancy and imagination, what
begins in poetry must soon end in prose. Nay, if a religious
meeting be protracted beyond one or two days, novelties
must
be introduced; and such are
invariably
exciting and
entertaining
,
but
never
spiritual and instructive; if not
introduced
,
the meeting becomes, in the opinion of the majority,
stale. Heat, and flame, and smoke, constitute, with most,
a good meeting. Nay, again, and yea also, the
final
result of man-contrived means and measures is at war with
true courtesy, uncensorious feelings, the cheerful discharge
of daily secular duties, and the culture of the intellect.
The whole is selfish in tendency and promotive of
presumptuous
confidence, and a contemptible
self-righteousness
.
Adequate reasons enough may be assigned for the
popularity of camp-meetings, and none of them essentially
religious or even praise-worthy; although
many
essentially
worthy and religious persons both advocate and attend such
places; for instance, the love of variety and noveltythe
desire of excitementsromantic feelingstedium of
common
every-day life--love of good fellowship--and even a
willingness to obtain a cheap religious character--and,
also, a secret hope that we please God and merit heaven
for so extraordinary and long-continued devotion. Add,
our innate love of pageantry, inclining us not only to behold
scenes but to make and be a part of scenes; for even in
this senseAll the world's a stage, and all the men and
and women merely players.
A camp-meeting might, indeed, be reformed; and so might
the theatrebut the one event is no more probable than
the other: and as a reformed theatre would be little
visited
,
so we apprehend would be a reformed camp-meeting.
The respective
abuses
of both are
essential
to their
existence
.
But this is digressing.
The tents were in a measure permanent fixtures, the
uprights
and cross pieces remaining from season to season;
but now all were garnished with fresh and green branches
and coverings. These tents formed the sides of the
parallelogram
,
intervals being left in suitable places for alleys
and scaffolds; while in the woods were other more
soldierly-looking
tents of linen or canvass, and pitched in true
war style; although not a few tents were mere squares of
sheets, coverlets and table-cloths. Also for tents were up
propped some twenty or thirty carts and wagons, and
furnished
with a chair or two, and some sort of sleeping
apparatus. In the rear of the regular tents, and, indeed,
of many others, were places and fixtures for kinding a fire
and boiling water for coffee, tea, chocolate, &c. &c.a
few culinary operations being yet needed beyond the
mountains of food brought from home ready for demolition.
Indeed, a camp-meeting
out there
is the most mammoth
pic-nic possible; and it is one's own fault, saint or sinner, if
he gets not enough to eat, and that the best the land affords.
It would be impossible even for churlish persons to be stingy
in the open air; the ample sky above and the boundless
woods around; the wings of gay birds flashing in sunshine,
and the squirrels racing up gigantic trunks and barking and
squeaking amid the grand branches; and what then must
be the effect of all on the proverbially open-hearted native
born Westerns? Ay! the
native
Corn-Cracker, Hoosier,
Buckeye, and all men and women born in a cane-brake
and rocked in a sugar trough,all born to follow a trail
and cock and old fashioned lock-rifle,all such are
openhearted
,
fearless, generous, chivalric, even in spite of much
filth and scum and base leaven from foreign places. And
hence, although no
decided
friend to camp-meetings,
spiritually
and morally and theologically considered, we do
say that at a
Western
camp-meeting as at a barbecue, the
very heart and soul of hospitality and kindness is wide
open and poured freely forth. We
can
, maybe, equal it in
here; but we never try.
[27]
[27]
If folks like the New Purchase, we shall write The Old
Purchasein which work things in here will receive justice.
Proceed we now to things spiritual. And first, we give
notice that attention will be paid only to grand matters
and that very many episodial things are omitted, such as
incidental exhortations and prayers from authorized, as well
as unauthorized folks, male and female, whose spirits often
suddenly stirred, and not to be controlled like those of
old-fashioned
prophets, forced our friends to speak out, like
quaker ladies and gentlemen in reformed meetings, and even
when they have nothing to say; and also will be omitted
all irregular outcries, groans, shouts, and bodily exercises,
subordinate, indeed, to grand chorusses and contests, but
otherwise beginning without adequate cause and ending
in nothing.
The camp was furnished with several stands for
preaching
,
exhorting, jumping and jerking; but still one place
was the pulpit above all others. This was a large scaffold
secured between two noble sugar trees, and railed in to
prevent
from falling over in a swoon, or springing over in
an ecstacy; its cover the dense foliage of the trees whose
trunks formed the graceful and massive columns. Here
was said to be also the
altar
but I could not see its
horns
or any
sacrifice;
and the pen, which I
did
seea place
full of clean straw, where were put into fold stray sheep
willing to return. It was at this pulpit, with its altar and
pen, the regular preaching was done; around here the
congregation assembled; hence orders were issued; here,
happened the hardest fights and were gained the greatest
victories, being the spot where it was understood Satan
fought in person; and here could be seen gestures the most
frantic, and heard noises the most unimaginable, and often
the most appalling. It was the place, in short, where most
crowded either with praise worthy intentions of getting some
religion, or with unholy purposes of being amused; we of
course designing neither one nor the other, but only to see
philosophically and make up an opinion. At every grand
outcry a simultaneous rush would, however, take place
from all parts of the camp, proper and improper, towards
the pulpit, altar, and pen; till the crowding, by increasing
the suffocation and the fainting, would increase the tumult
and the uproar; but this in the estimation of many devotees
only rendered the meeting more lively and interesting.
By considering what was done at this central station
one may approximate the amount of spiritual labour done
in a day, and then a week in the whole camp:
1. About day-break on Sabbath a horn
blasted
us up for
public prayer and exhortationthe exercises continuing
nearly two hours.
2. Before breakfast, another blast for family and private
prayer; and then every tent became, in camp language,
a bethel of struggling Jacobs and prevailing Israels;
every tree an altar; and every grove a secret closet;
till the air all became religious words and phrases, and
vocal with Amens.
3. After a proper interval came a horn for the forenoon
service; then was delivered the sermon, and that followed
by an appendix of some half dozen exhortations let off right
and left, and even
behind
the pulpit, that all might have a
portion in due season.
4. We had private and secret prayer again before
dinner
;some
clambering into thick trees to be hid, but
forgetting
in their simplicity, that they were heard and
betrayed
.
But religious devotion
[28]
[28]
A man may make a fool of himself in worship in a Christian land,
and be deemed a saint; when he does so in Pagan worship, we call
him a sinner. Six of one and so forth.
excuses all errors and
mistakes
.
5. The afternoon sermon with its bob-tail string of
exhortations
.
6. Private and family prayer about tea time.
7. But lastly, we had what was termed a precious
season in the third regular service at the
principia
of the
camp. This season began not long after tea and was kept
up long after I left the ground; which was about midnight.
And now sermon after sermon and exhortation after
exhortation
followed like shallow, foaming, roaring waters; till
the speakers were exhausted and the assembly became an
uneasy and billowy mass, now hushing to a sobbing
quiescence
,
and now rousing by the groans of sinners and the
triumphant cries of folks that had jist got religion; and
then, again subsiding to a buzzy state occasioned by the
whimpering and whining voices of persons giving spiritual
advice and comfort! How like a volcanic crater after the
evomition of its lava in a fit of burning cholic, and striving
to re-settle its angry and tumultuating stomach!
It is time, however, to speak of the three grand services
and their concomitants, and to introduce several master
spirits of the camp.
Our first character, is the Reverend Elder Sprightly.
This gentleman was of good natural parts; and in a better
school of intellectual discipline and more fortunate
circumstances
,
he must have become a worthy minister of some
more tasteful, literary, and evangelical sect. As it was,
he had only become, what he never got beyonda very
smart man; and his aim had become oneto enlarge his
own people. And in this work, so great was his success,
that, to use his own modest boastfulness in his sermon
today
,although
folks said when he came to the Purchase
that a single corn-crib would hold his people, yet, bless the
Lord, they had kept spreading and spreading till all the
corn-cribs in Egypt wern't big enough to hold them!
He was very happy at repartee, as Robert Dale Owen
well knows; and not slow (inexpert) in the arts of
taking offandgiving them their own. This trait
we shall illustrate by an instance.
Mr. Sprightly was, by accident, once present where a
Campbellite Baptist, that had recently taken out a right for
administering six doses of lobelia, red pepper and steam,
to men's bodies, and a plunge into cold water for the good
of their souls, was holding forth against all Doctors, secular
and sacred, and very fiercely against Sprightly's
brotherhood
.
Doctor Lobelia's text was found somewhere in
Pope Campbell's
New
Testament; as it suited the
following
discourse introduced with the usual inspired preface:
Doctor Lobelia's Sermon
.
Well, I never rub'd my back agin a collige, nor git no
sheepskin, and allow the Apostuls didn't nithur. Did
anybody
ever hear of Peter and Poll a-goin to them new-fangled
places and gitten skins to preach by? No, sirs, I allow
not; no sirs, we don't pretend to logukthis here
new
testament's
sheepskin enough for me. And don't Prisbeteruns
and tother baby sprinklurs have reskorse to loguk and skins
to show how them what's emerz'd didn't go down into the
water and come up agin? And as to Sprightly's preachurs,
don't they dress like big-bugs, and go ridin about the
Purchis
on hunder-dollur hossis, a-spunginin on poor
priest-riden
folks and and a-eaten fried chicken fixins so
powerful
fast that chickens has got skerse in these diggins; and
them what ain't fried makes tracks and hides when they
sees them a-comin?
But, dear bruthrun, we don't want store cloth and
yaller
buttins, and fat hosses and chickin fixins, and the like
doinsno, sirs! we only wants your soulswe only wants
beleevur's baptismwe wants primprimyes, Apostul's
Christianity, the christianity of Christ and them times,
when Christians
was
Christians, and tuk up thare cross
and went down into the water, and was buried in the
gineine
sort of baptism by emerzhin. That's all we wants;
and I hope all's convinced that's the true wayand so let
all come right out from among them and git beleevur's
baptism
;
and so now if any brothur wants to say a word I'm
done, and I'll make way for him to preach.
Anticipating this common invitation, our friend Sprightly,
indignant at this unprovoked attack of Doctor Lobelia, had,
in order to disguise himself, exchanged his clerical garb
for a friend's blue coatee bedizzened with metal buttons;
and also had erected a very tasteful and sharp coxcomb on
his head, out of hair usually reposing sleek and quiet in the
most saint-like decorum; and then, at the bid from
the pulpit-stump, out stepped Mr. Sprightly from the
opposite
spice-wood grove, and advanced with a step so
smirky and dandyish as to create universal amazement and
whispered demandsWhy! who's that?! And some
of his very people, who were present, as they told me, did
7*
not know their preacher till his clear, sharp voice, came
upon the hearing, when they showed, by the sudden lifting
of hands and eyebrows, how near they were to
exclaiming
Well!
I never!!
Stepping on to the consecrated stump, our friend,
without
either preliminary hymn or prayer, commenced thus:
My friends, I only intend to say a few words in answer
to the pious brother that's just sat down, and shall not
detain
but a few minutes. The pious brother took a good
deal of time to tell what we soon found out ourselves
that he never went to college, and don't understand logic.
He boasts too of having no sheep skin to preach by; but I
allow any sensible buck-sheep would have died powerful
sorry, if he'd ever thought his hide would come to be
handled
by some preachers. The skin of the knowingest old
buck couldn't do some folks any goodsome things salt
won't save.
I rather allow Johnny Calvin's boys and `'tother baby
sprinklers,' ain't likely to have they idees physicked out of
them by steam logic, and doses of No. 6. They can't be
steamed up so high as to want cooling by a cold water
plunge. But I want to say a word about Sprightly's
preachers, because I have some slight acquaintance with
that there gentleman, and don't choose to have them all run
down for nothing.
The pious brother brings several grave charge s; first
they ride good horses. Now don't every man, woman,
and child in the Purchase know that Sprightly and his
preachers have hardly any home, and that they live on
horseback? The money most folks spend in land, these
men spend for a good horse; and don't they
need
a good
horse to stand mud and swim floods? And is it any sin
for a horse to be kept fat that does so much work? The
book says `a merciful man is merciful to his beast,' and
that we mustn't `muzzle the ox that treadeth out the corn.'
Step round that fence corner, and take a peep, dear friends,
at a horse hung on the stake; what's he like? A wooden
frame with a dry hide stretch'd over it. What's he live on?
Ay! that's the pint? Well, what's them buzzards after?
look at them sailing up there. Now who owns that live
carrion?the pious brother that's preached to us just now.
And I want to know if it wouldn't be better for him to give
that dumb brute something to cover his bones, before he talks
against `hunder dollur hossis' and the like?
The next charge is, wearing good clothes. Friends,
don't all folks when they come to meeting put on their best
clothes? and wouldn't it be wrong if preachers came in old
torn coats and dirty shirts? It wouldn't do no how. Well,
Sprightly and his preachers preach near about every day;
and oughtn't they always to look decent! Take then a
peep of the pious brother that makes this charge; his coat
is out at elbow, and has only three or four buttons left, and
his arm, where he wipes his nose and mouth, is shiney as
a looking glasshis trousers are crawling up to show he's
got no stockings on; and his face has got a crop of beard
two weeks old and couldn't be cleaned by `baby sprinklin;'
yes, look at them there matters, and say if Sprightly's
preachers ain't more like the apostles in decency than the
pious brother is.
A word now about chicken-fixins and doins. And I
say it would be a charity to give the pious brother sich a
feed now and then, for he looks half-starved, and savage as
a meat-axe; and I advise that old hen out thare clucking
up her brood not to come this way just now, if she don't
want all to disappear. But I say that Sprightly's preachers
are so much beliked in the Purchase, that folks are always
glad to see them, and make a pint of giving them the best
out of love; and that's more than can be said for some
folks here.
The pious brother says, he only wants our soulsthen
what makes him peddle about Thomsonian physic? Why
don't he and Campbell make steam and No. 6 as free as
preaching? I read of a quack doctor once, who used to
give his advice free gratis for nothing to any one what
would
buy
a box of his pillsbut as I see the pious brother
is crawling round the fence to his anatomical horse and
physical saddle bags, I have nothing more to say, and so,
dear friends, I bid you all good-bye.
Such was Rev. Elder Sprightly, who preached to us on
Sabbath morning at the Camp. Hence, it is not remarkable
that in common with many worthy persons, he should
think his talents properly employed in using up Johnny
Calvin and his boys; especially as no subject is better
for popularity at a camp-meeting. He gave us,
accordingly
,
first, that affecting story of Calvin and Servetus, in
which the latter figured to-day like a Christian
Confessor
and martyr, and the former as a diabolical
persecuter
;
many moving incidents being introduced not found in
history, and many ingenious inferences and suppositions
tending to blacken the Reformer's character. Judging
from the frequency of the deep groans, loud amens, and
noisy hallelujahs of the congregation during the narrative,
had Calvin suddenly thrust in among us his hatchet face
and goat's beard, he would have been hissed and pelted,
nay possibly, been lynched and soused in the Branch;
while the excellent Servetus would have been
toted
on our
shoulders, and feasted in the tents, on fried ham, cold
chicken fixins and horse sorrel pies!
Here is a specimen of Mr. S'.s mode of exciting
triumphant
exclamation, amens, groans, &c., against Calvin and
his followers:
Dear sisters, don't you love the
tender
little darling babes that hang on your parental bosoms?
(amen!)Yes! I know you do(amen! amen!)Yes I
know, I know it(Amen, amen! hallelujah!) Now don't
it make your parental hearts throb with anguish to think
those dear infantile darlings might some day be out
burning
brush and fall into the flames and be burned to death!
(deep groans.)Yes, it does, it does! But oh! sisters, oh!
mothers! how can you think your babes mightn't get
religion
and die and be burned for ever and ever? (the Lord
forbidamengroans.) But, oho! only thinkonly think
oh! would you ever a had them darling infantile sucklings
born, if you had a known they were to be burned in a brush
heap! (No, no!groansshrieks) What! what!
what!
if you had
foreknown
they must have gone to hell!(hoho!
hoho!amen!) And does any body think He
[29]
[29]
We substitute words in place of the divine namesirreverently
used often in sermons and prayers.
is such a
tyrant as to make spotless, innocent babies just to damn
them? (No! in a voice of thunder.)No! sisters! no!
no! mothers! No! no!
no!
sinners
no
!!he
ain't
such a
tyrant! let John Calvin burn, torture and roast, but He never
foreordained babies, as Calvin says, to damnation! (
damnation
echoed by hundreds.)Hallelujah! 'tis a free
salvation! Glory! a free salvation!(Here Mr S.
battered
the rail of the pulpit with his fists, and kicked the
bottom
with his feetmany screamedsome cried amen!
others groaned and hissedand more than a dozen
females
of two opposite colours arose and clapped their
hands as if engaged in starching, &c. &c.) No-h-o! '
tis
a
free, a free, a
free
salvation!away with Calvin! 'tis for
all
all!
ALL. Yes! shout it out! clap on! rejoice!
rejoice
!
oho-oho! sinners, sinners, sinners, oh-ho-oho!
&c. &c.
Here was maintained for some minutes the most edifying
uproar of shouting, bellowing, crying, clapping and
stamping
,
mingled with hysterical laughing, termed out there
holy laughing, and even dancing! and barking! called
also holy!till, at the partial subsidence of the bedlam,
the orator resumed his eloquence.
It is singular Mr. S. overlooked an objection to the
divine Providence arising from his own illustration. That
children do sometimes perish by being burnt and drowned,
is undeniable; yet is not their existence preventedand
that in the very case where the sisters were induced to say
they would have prevented their existence! But, in
justice
to Mr. S., we must say that he seemed to have
anticipated
the objection, and to have furnished the reply; for,
said he, in one part of his discourse, God did not
wish
to
foreknow
some
things!
But our friend's mode of avoiding a predestined death
if such an absurdity be supposeddeserves all praise for
the facility and simplicity of the contrivance. Let us,
said he, for argnment's sake, grant that I, the Rev. Elder
Sprightly, am foreordained to be drowned, in the River, at
Smith's Ferry, next Thursday morning, at twenty-two
minutes
after ten o'clock; and suppose I know it; and
suppose
I am a free, moral, voluntary, accountable agent, as
Calvinists saydo you think I'm going to be drowned?
No!I would stay at home all day; and you'll never ketch
the Rev. Elder Sprightly at Smith's Ferrynor near the
river neither!
Reader, is it any wonder Calvinism is on the decline?
Logic it
can
stand; but human nature thus excited in
opposition
,
it cannot stand. Hence, throughout our vast
assembly
to-day, this unpopular
ism
, in spite of Calvin and the
Epistle to the Romans, was put down; if not by
acclamation
,
yet by exclamation,by shouting,by roaring,by
groaning and hissing,by clapping and stamping,by
laughing, and crying, and whining; and thus the end of the
sermon was gained and the
preacher
glorified!
The introductory discourse in the afternoon was by the
Rev. Remarkable Novus. This was a gentleman I had
often the pleasure of entertaining at my house in Woodville;
and he was a Christian in sentiment and feeling: for though
properly and decidedly a warm friend to his own sect, he
was charitably disposed towards myself and others that
differed
from him ecclesiastically. His talents were
moderate
;
but his voice was transcendentally excellent. It
was rich, deep, mellow, liquid and sonorous, and capable
of any inflections. It could preserve its melody in an
un-ruffled
flow, at a pitch far beyond the highest point reached
by the best cultivated voices. His fancy, naturally
capricious
,
was indulged without restraint; yet not being a
learned
or well-read man, he mistook words for ideas, and hence
employed without stint all the terms in his vocabulary for
the commonest thoughts. He believed, too, like most of
his brotherhood, that excitement and agitation were
necessary
to conversion and of the essence of religion; and this,
with a proneness to delight in the music and witchery of
his own wonderful voice, made Mr. Novus an eccentric
preacher, and induced him often to excel at camp-meetings,
the very extravagances of his clerical brethren, whom
more than once he has ridiculed and condemned at my
fireside.
The camp-meeting was, in fact, too great a temptation
for my friend's temperament, and the very theatre for the
full display of his magnificent voice; and naturally, this
afternoon, off he set at a tangent, interrupting the current
of his sermon by extemporaneous bursts of warning,
entreaty
,
and exhortation. Here is something like his
discourse
yet
done by me in a
subdued tone
as, I repeat,
are most extravaganzas of the ecclesiastical and spiritual
sort not only here, but in all other parts of the work.
My text, dear hearers, said he, on this auspicious,
and solemn, and heaven-ordered occasion, is that
exhortation
of the inspired apostle, `Walk worthy of your
vocation
.'
And what, my dear brethren, what do you imagine and
conjecture our holy penman meant by `walking?' Think
ye he meant a physical walking, and a moving, and a going
backward and forward thus?(represented by Mr. N.'s
proceeding, or rather marching,
a l militaire
, several times
from end to end of the staging.)No! sirs!it was not a
literal walking and locomotion, a moving and agitating of
the natural legs and limbs. No! sirs!no!but it was a
moral, a spiritual, a religious, ay! yes! a philosophical
and metaphorically figurative walking, our holy apostle
meant!
Philosophic, did I say? Yes: philosophic
did
I say.
For religion is the most philosophical thing in the universe
ay! throughout the whole expansive infinitude of the
divine empire. Tell me, deluded infidels and mistaken
unbelievers! tell me, ain't philosophy what's according to
the consistency of nature's regular laws? and what's more
consentaneous and homogeneous to man's sublimated moral
nature than religion? Yes! tell me! Yes! yes!
I
am
for a philosophical religion, and a philosophical religion is
for
me
ay! we are mutually made and formed for this
beautiful reciprocality!
And yet some say we make too much noiseeven
some of our respected Woodville merchants(meaning the
author.)But what's worth making a noise about in the
dark mundane of our terrestrial sphere, if religion ain't?
People always, and everywhere in all places, make most
noise about what they opine to be most precious. See!
you banner streaming with golden stars and glorious stripes
over congregated troops on the fourth of July, that
ever-memorable
that
never-to-be-
forgotten
day, which
celebrates
the grand annual aniversary of our nation's liberty
and independence! when our forefathers and ancestors
burst asunder and tore forever off the iron chains of
political
thraldom! and arose in plenitude, ay! in the
magnnificence
of their grandeur, and crushed their oppressors!
yes! and hurled down dark despotism from the lofty
pinnacle
of its summit altitude, where she was seated on her
liberty-crushing throne, and hurled her out of her iron
chariot as her wheels thundered over the prostrate slaves
of power!  (Amen!  hallelujah!)  Yes!hark!we
make a noise about that! But what's civil liberty to
religious
liberty, and emancipated disenthraldom from the dark
despotism of yonder terrific prince of darkness! whose
broad, black, piniony wings spread wide o'er the arial
concave, like a dense cloud upon a murky sky?(
A-a-men
!)And
ain't it, ye men of yards and measures,
philosophical
to make a noise about this?(Amen!yes!)
Yes!
yes!
and I ain't ashamed to rejoice and shout
aloud. Ay! as long as the prophet was ordered to stamp
with his foot, I will
stamp
with my foot;(here he
stamped
till the platform trembled for its safety,)and to smite
with his hand, I will
smite
with my hand(slapping
alternate
hands on alternate thighs.)Yes! and I will shout
too!and cry aloud and spare notglory! forever!
(and here his voice rang out like the sweet, clear tones of
a bugle.)
And, therefore, my dear sisters and brethren, let us
walk worthy of our vocation; not with the natural legs of
the physical corporation, but in the apostolical way, with
the metaphysical and figurative legs of the mind,(here
Mr. N. caught some one smiling.)Take care, sinner,
take care! curl not the scornful noseI'm willing to be a
fool for religion's sakebut turn not up the scornful nose
do its ministers no harm! Sinner! mark me!in yon
deep and tangled grove, where tall aspiring trees wave
green and lofty heads in the free air of balmy skiesthere,
sinner, an hour ago, when the sonorous horn called on our
embattled hosts to go to private prayer! an hour ago, in
yonder grove I knelt and prayed for you!(hooh!)yes!
I prayed some poor soul might be given for my hire!and
he promised me one!(Glory! glory!ah! give him
one!)Laughing sinner!take care!I'll have you!
(Grant itamen!ooohoo!) Look out, I'm going to fire!
(assuming the attitude of rifle-shooting)bang!may
He send that through your heart!may it pierce clean
home through joints and marrow!and let all the people
say Amen!(and here amen
was
said, and not in the tame
style of the American Archbishop of Canterbury's
cathedral
,
be assured; but whether the spiritual bullet hit the
chap aimed at, I never learned; if it did, his groans were
inaudible in the alarming thunder of that Amen.)
Ay! ay! that's way! that's the way! don't be
ashamed of your vocationthat's the way to walk and let
your light shine! Now some wise folks despise light and
call for miracles: but when we can't have one kind of light,
let us be philosophical and take another. For my part,
when I'm bogging about these dark woods, far away in the
silent sombre shadows, I rejoice in sunshine; and would
prefer it of choice rather than all other celestial and
translucent
luminaries: but when the gentle fanning zephyrs
of the shadowy night breathe soft among the trembling
leaves and sprays of the darkening forests, then I rejoice in
moonshine: and when the moonshine dims and pales away
with the waning silvery queen of heaven in her azure zone, I
look up to the blue concave of the circular vault and rejoice
in star light. No!
no!
NO! any light!give us any light
rather than
none!
(Ah, do, good Lord!) Yes! yes! we
are the light of the world, and so let us let our light
shine, whether sunshine, or moonshine, or star light!
(oohoo!)and then the poor benighted sinner, bogging
about this terraqueous, but dark and mundane sphere, will
have a light like a pole star of the distant north, to point
and guide him to the sun-lit climes of yonder world of
bright and blazing bliss!(A-a-a-amen!)
Such is part of the sermon. His concluding prayer ended
thus:(Divine names omitted.)
Oh! come down! come, come down!
down!
now!
to-night!do wonders then! come down in
might!
come
down in
power!
let salvation
roll! Come
down!
come!
and let the earthquaking mighty noise of thy thundering
chariot wheels be heard and felt and seen and experienced
in the warring elements of our spiritualized hearts!
During the prayer, many petitions and expressions were
so rapturously and decidedly encored, that our friend kindly
repeated them; and sometimes, like public singers, with
handsome variations: and many petitions by amateur
zealots were put forth, without any notice of the current
prayer offered by Mr. N, yet evidently having in view
some elegancy of his sermon. And not a few petitions, I
regret to say, seemed to misapprehend the drift and scope
of the preacher. One of this sort was the earnest
ejaculations
of an old and worthy brother, who in a hollow,
sepulchral
,
and rather growly voice, bellowed out in a very
beautiful part of the grand prayerOohhoo! take away
moonshine!
But our finest performance was to be at night: and at
the first
toot
of the tin horn, we assembled in expectation of
a good time. For 1. All day preparation had been
making for the night; and the actors seemed evidently in
restraint as in mere rehearsal: 2. the night suits better
displays
and scenes of any kind: but 3. the African was to
preach; and rumour had said, he was a most powerful big
preacher that could stir up folks mighty quick, and use up
the ole feller in less than no time.
After prefatory prayers and hymns, and
pithy
exhortations
by several brothers of the Circassian breed, our
dusky divine, the Rev. Mizraim Ham, commenced his
sermon, founded on the duel between David and Goliath.
This discourse we shall condense into a few pages;
although
the comedy or mellow-drama(for it greatly
mellowed
and relaxed the muscles)required for its entire
action a full hour. There was, indeed, a prologue; but
the rest was mainly dialogue, in which Mr. Ham
wonderfully
personated all the different speakers, varying his tone,
manner, attitude, &c, as varying characters and
circumstances
demanded. We fear much of the spirit has
evaporated
in this condensation; but that evil is unavoidable.
REV. MIZRAIM HAM'S DISCOURSE.
Bruthurn and sisturn, tention, if you pleases, while I
want you for to understand this here battul most purtiklur
'zact, or may be you moughtn't comprend 'um. Furst place,
I'm gwyin to undevur to sarcumscribe fust the 'cashin of this
here battul: second place, the 'comdashins of the
armies
:
third place, the folkses as was gwyin for to fite and
didn't want to, and some did: and last and fourth place,
I'm gwyin for to show purtiklur 'zact them as fit juul, and git
victry and git kill'd.
Tention, if you please, while I fustly sarcumscribe
the 'casion of this here battul. Bruthurn and sisturn, you
see them thar hethun Fillystines, what warnt circumcised,
they wants to ketch King Sol and his 'ar folks for to make
um slave: and so they cums down to pick a quorl, and
begins a totin off all their cawn, and wouldn't 'low um to
make no hoes to ho um, nor no homnee. And that 'ar, you
see, stick in King Solsis gizurd; and he ups and says, says
he, `I'm not gwying to be used up that 'ar away by them
uncircumcis'd hethun Fillystines, and let um tote off our
folkses cawn to chuck to thar hogs, and take away our
hoes so we can't hoe umand so, Jonathun, we'll drum
up and list soljurs and try um a battul.' And then King
Sol and his 'ar folks they goes up, and the hethun and
theirn comes down and makes war. And this is the 'cashin
why they fit.
Tention 'gin, if you pleases, I'm gwyin in the next
place secondly, to show the 'comdashins of this here battul,
which was so fashin like. The Fillystines they had thar
army up thar on a mounting, and King Sol he had hissin
over thar, like across a branch, amoss like that a one thar
(pointing)and it was chuck full of sling rock all along on
the bottom. And so they was both on um camp'd out; this
a one on this 'ar side, and tother a one on tother, and the
lilly branch tween umand them's the comdashins.
Tention once more agin, as 'caze next place thirdly I'm
a gwyin to give purtiklur 'zact 'count of sum folkses what
fit and sum didn't want to. And, lubly sinnahs, maybe
you minds um, as how King Sol and his soljurs was pepper
hot for fite when he fust liss um; but now, lubly sinnahs,
when they gits up to the Fillystines, they cool off mighty
quick, I tell you! 'Caze why? I tell you; why, 'caze a
grate, big, ugly ole jiunt, with grate big eyes, so fashin
(Mr. Ham made giant's eyes here)he kums a rampin out
afrunt o' them 'ar rigiments, like the ole devul a gwyin
about like a half-starv'd lion a seeking to devour poor lubly
sinnahs! And he cum a jumpin and a tearin out so fashin
(actions to suit)to git sum of King Solsis soljurs to fite
um juul: and King Sol, lubly bruthurn and sisturn, he gits
sker'd mighty quick, and he says to Jonathun and tother
big officers, says he`I ain't a gwyin for to fite that grate
big fellah.' And arter that they ups and says`We ain't
a gwyin for to fite um nuthur, 'caze he's all kiver'd with
sheetirun, and his head's up so high we muss stand a hoss
back to reach um!'the jiunt he was
so big!!
And then King Sol he quite down in the jaw, and he
turn and ax if somebody wouldn't hunt up a soljur as would
fite juul with um; and he'd give um his dawtah, the prinsuss,
for wife, and make um king's son-in-law. And then one ole
koretur, they call him Abnah, he comes up and say to Sol so:
`Please your majuste, sir, I kin git a young fellah to fite um,'
says he. And Abnah tells how Davy had jist rid up in his
carruge and left um with the man what tend the hossis
and how he heern Davy a quorl'n with his bruthurs and a
wantun to fite the jiunt. Then King Sol, he feel mighty
glad, I tell you, sinnahs, and he make um bring um up, and
King Sol he begins a talkin so, and Davy he answers
so:
`What's your name, lilly fellah?'
`I was krissen'd Davy.'
`Whose your farder?'
`They call um Jesse.'
`What you follur for livin?'
`I tend my farder's sheep.'
`What you kum arter? Ain't you affeerd of that 'ar
grate ugly ole jiunt up thar, lilly Davy?'
`I kum to see arter my udder brudurs, and bring um
in our carruge some cheese and muttun, and some clene
shirt and trowsur, and have tother ones wash'd. And when
I kum I hear ole Goliawh a hollerin out for somebody to
cum and fite juul with um: and all the soljurs round thar
they begins for to make traks mighty quick, I tell you, please
your majuste, sir, for thar tents; but, says I, what you run for?
I'm not a gwyin for to run awayif King Sol wants some
body for to fite the jiunt, I'll fit um for um.'
`I mighty feerd, lilly Davy, you too leetul for um'
`No! King Sol, I kin lick um. One day I gits asleep
ahind a rock, and out kums a lion and a bawr, and begins a
totin off a lilly lam; and when I heern um roarin and
and pawin 'bout, I rubs my eyes and sees um gwyin to
the mountingsand I arter and ketch'd up and kill um both
without no gun nor swordand I bring back poor lilly lam.
I kin lick ole Goliawh, I tell you, please your majuste, sir.'
Then King Sol he wery glad, and pat um on the head,
and calls um `lilly Davy,' and wants to put on um his own
armur made of brass and sheetirun, and to take his sword,
but Davy didn't like um, but said he'd trust to his sling.
And then out he goes to fite the ole jiunt; and this 'ar
brings me to the fourth and last diwishin of our surmun.
Tention once more agin' for lass time, as I'm gwyin to
give most purtikurlust 'zactest 'count of the juul atween
lilly Davy and ole Goliawh the jiunt, to show, lubly sinnah!
how the Lord's peepul without no carnul gun nor sword, can
fite ole Bellzybub and knock um over with the sling rock
of prayer, as lilly Davy knock over Goliawh with hissin
out of the Branch.
And to 'lusterut the juul and make um spikus, I'll show
'zactly how they talk'd, and jawd, and fit it all out: and so
ole Goliawh when he see Davy a kumun, he hollurs out so,
and lilly Davy he say back so:
What you kum for, lilly Jew?
What I kum for! you'll find out mighty quick, I tell
youI kum for fite juul
Huhh! huhh! haw!'tink I'm gwyin to fite puttee
lilly baby? I want king Sol or Abnah, or a big soljur
man
Hole your jawI'll make you laugh tother side, ole
grizzle-gruzzle, 'rectly,I'm man enough for biggust jiunt
Fillystine.
Go way, poor lilly boy! go home, lilly baby, to your
mudder, and git sugar plumI no want kill puttee lilly
boy
Kum on!dont be afeerd!dont go for to run away!
I'll ketch you and lick you
You dn leetul raskulI'll kuss you by all our gods
I'll cut out your sassy tung
[30]
[30]
Mr. Ham preferred Webster's Dictionarywhich spells according
to nature.
I'll break your blackguard
jaw,I'll rip you up and give um to the dogs and crows
Dont kuss so, ole Golly! I 'sposed you wanted to fite
juulso kum on with your old irun-pot hat onyou'll git
belly full mighty quick
You nasty leetul raskul, I'll kum and kill you dead as
chopped sassudge.
Here the preacher represented the advance of the
parties
;
and gave a florid and wonderfully effective
description
of the closing act partly by words and partly by
pantomime; exhibiting innumerable marches and
counter-marches
to get to windward, and all the postures, and
gestures, and defiances, till at last he personated David
putting his hand into a bag for a stone:and then making
his cotton handkerchief into a sling, he whirled it with
fury half a dozen times around his head, and then let fly
with much skill at Goliath; and at the same instant
halloing
with the phrenzy of a madmanHurraw! for lilly
Davy! At that cry he, with his left hand, struck himself a
violent slap on the forehead, to represent the blow of the
sling stone litting the giant; and then in person of Goliath
he droped
quasi
dead upon the platform amid the deafening
plaudits of the congregation; all of whom, some spiritually,
some sympathetically, and some carnally, took up the
preacher's triumph shout
Hurraw! for lilly Davy.
How the Rev. Mizraim Ham made his exit from the
boards I could not seeperhaps he rolled or crawled off.
But he did not suffer decapitation, like ole Golly:
since, in ten minutes, his woolly pate suddenly popped up
among the other sacred heads that were visible over the
front railing of the rostrum, as all kept moving to and fro
in the wild tossings of religious phrenzy.
Scarcely had Mr. Ham fallen at his post, when a
venerable
old warrior, with matchless intrepidity, stepped into
the vacated spot; and without a sign of fear carried on the
contest against the Arch Fiend, whose great ally had been
so recently overthrowni. e. Goliath, (not Mr. Ham.) Yet
excited, as evidently was this veteran, he still could not
forego his usual introduction stating how old he was;
where he was born; where he obtained religion; how long
he had been a preacher; how many miles he had travelled
in a year; and when he buried his wife:all of which
edifying truths were received with the usual applauses of
a devout and enlightened assembly. But this introduction
over; (which did not occupy more than fifteen or twenty
minutes,) he began his attack in fine style, waxing louder
and louder as he proceeded, till he exceeded all the old
gentlemen to holler I ever heard, and indeed old ladies
either.
EXTRACT FROM HIS DISCOURSE.
Yes, sinners! you'll all have to fall
and be knock'd down some time or nuther, like the great
giant we've heern tell on, when the Lord's sarvints come
and fight agin you! Oho! sinner! sinneroh!I hope
you may be knock'd down to nightnow!this moment
and afore you die and go to judgment! Yes! oho! yes!
oh!I say judgmentfor it's appinted once to die and then
the judgmentoho! oh! And what a time ther'll be then!
You'll see, all these here treesand them 'are stars, and
yonder silver moon a fire!and all the alliments a meltin
and runnin down with fervent heat-ah!(I have elsewhere
stated that the
unlearned
preachers out there (?) are by the
vulgar[not the
poor
] but the
vulgar
, supposed to be
more favoured in preaching than man-made preachers; and
that the sign of an unlearned preacher's inspiration being
in full
blast
is his inhalations, which puts an ah! to the
end of sentences, members, words, and even exclamations,
till his breath is all gone, and no more can be
sucked
in)
Oho! hoah! fervent heat-ah!and the triumpit a
soundinah
!and
the dead arisin-ah!and all on us a flyin-ah!to
be judged-ah!Oohoah! sinnersinnersinner-ah! And
what do I see away tharah!down the Massissipp-ah!
thar's a man jist done a killin-ah!another-ah!and up he
Vol. II.8
goes with his bloody dagger-ah! And what's that I see to
the East-ah! where proud folks live clothed in purple ah!
and fine linen-ah!I see 'em round a table a drinkin a
decoction of Indian herb-ah!and up they go with cups in
thar hands-ah! and seeohoah!see! in yonder
doggery
some a dancin-ah! and a fiddlin-ah!and up they
go-ah! with cards ah! and fiddle-ah! &c. &c.
Here the tempest around drowned the voice of the old
hero: although, from the frantic violence of his gestures,
the frightful distortion of his features, and the Pythonic
foam of his mouth, he was plainly blazing away at the
enemy. The uproar, however, so far subsided as to allow
my hearing his closing exhortation, which was this:
Yes I sayfall downfall down all of you, on
your knees!shout!cry aloud!spare not!stamp
with the
fool!
smite with the
hand!
down!
down!
that's it!down brethren!down preachers!down
sisters
!
pray
away!take it by storm!
fire
away! fire
away!
not one at a time! not two together-ah!a single
shot the devil will
dodge-ah!
give it to him
all at once
fire a
whole pla'oon!
at him!!
And then such platoon firing as followed! If Satan
stood that, he can stand much more than the worthy folks
thought he could. And, indeed, the effect was wonderful!
more than forty thoughtless sinners that came for fun,
and twice as many backsliders were instantly knocked
over!and there all lay, some with violent jerkings and
writhings of body, and some uttering the most piercing
and dismaying shrieks and groans! The fact is, I was
nearly knocked down myself
You?Mr. Carlton!!
Yes,indeedbut not by the hail of spiritual shot
falling
so thick around me: it was by a sudden rush towards
my station, where I stood mounted on a stump. And this
rush was occasioned by a wish to see a stout fellow
lying on the straw in the pen, a little to my left, groaning
and praying, and yet kicking and pummelling away as if
scuffling with a sturdy antagonist. Near him were several
men and women at prayer, and one or more whispering
into his ear; while on a small stump above, stood a person
superintending the contest, and so as to ensure victory to the
right party. Now the prostrate man, who like a spirited
tom-cat seemed to fight best on his back, was no other than
our celebrated New Purchase bullyRowdy Bill! And
this being reported through the congregation, the rush had
taken place by which I was so nearly overturned. I
contrived
,
however, to regain my stand shared indeed, now,
with several others, we hugging one another and standing
on tip-toes and our necks elongated as possible; and thus
we managed to have a pretty fair view of matters.
About this time the Superintendent in a very loud voice
cried out,Let him alone, brothers! let him alone sisters!
keep on praying!its a hard fightthe devil's got a
tight grip yet! He don't want to lose poor Billbut he'll
let go soonBill's gittin the better on him fast!Pray
away!
Rowdy Bill, be it known, was famous as a gouger, and
so expert was he in his antioptical vocation, that in a few
moments he usually bored out an antagonist's eyes, or made
him cry
peccavi
. Indeed, could he, on the present
occasion
,
have laid hold of his unseen foe's head, (spiritually
we mean,) he would (figuratively of course) soon have
caused him to ease off or let go entirely his metaphorical
grip. So, however, thought one friend in the assembly
Bill's wife. For Bill was a man after her own heart; and
she often said that with fair play she sentimentally
allowed
her Bill could lick are a man in the 'varsal world,
and his weight in wild cats to boot. Hence, the kind
hearted creature, hearing that Bill was actually fighting
with the devil, had pressed in from the outskirts to see fair
play; but now hearing Bill was in reality down, and
apparently
undermost, and above all, the words of the
superintendent
,
declaring that the fiend had a tight grip of the poor
fellow, her excitement would no longer be controlled; and,
collecting her vocal energies, she screamed out her
common
exhortation to Bill, and which, when heeded, had
heretofore secured him immediate victoriesGouge him,
Billy!gouge him,
Billy!gouge
him!
This spirited exclamation was instantly shouted by Bill's
cronies and partisansmischievously,
maybe
, for we have
no right to judge of men's motives, in meetings:but a
few, (
friends
doubtless of the old fellow,) cried out in a
very irreverent toneBite him! devil
bite
him! Upon
which, the faithful wife, in a tone of voice that beggars
description
,
reiterated herGouge him, &c.in which
she was again joined by her husband's allies, and that to
the alarm of his invisible foe; for Bill now rose to his
knees, and on uttering some mystic jargon symptomatic of
conversation, he was said to have got religion;and
then all his new friends and spiritual guides united in fresh
prayers and shouts of thanksgiving.
It was now very late at night; and joining a few other
citizens of Woodville, we were soon in our saddles and
buried in the darkness of the forest. For a long time,
however, the uproar of the spiritual elements at the camp
continued at intervals to swell and diminish on the hearing;
and, often came a yell that rose far above the united din of
other screams and outcries. Nay, at the distance of
nearly two miles, could be distinguished a remarkable and
sonorous
oh!
like the faintly heard explosion of a mighty
elocutional class practising under a master. And yet
my comrades, who had heard this peculiar cry more than
once, all declared that this wonderful
oh
-ing was performed
by the separate voice of our townsman, Eolus Letherlung,
Esq.!
At length the din died sullenly away, like the indistinct
mutter of a retiring hurricane! But for that night and the
next day, the scenes and cries of the camp were vivid
before
my eyes and ringing in my ears; and more than once,
in night dreams, appeared Rowdy Bill dressed in his wife's
cap and short-gown, and standing on the breast of Goliath;
while near stood a dwarf negro with two heads, flourishing
in his hand a corn-hoe, and crying from both his mouths
Gouge him! Billy,
gouge
him!
Next day, (as I was told by an eye-witness and in
triumph
.)
the new converts, amounting to more than two
hundred
!!
were all paraded and marched around the
campgrounds
,
under the appellation of virgins following the
Lamb!after which, they were enrolled and
acknowledged
as trophies snatched from Satan! It being
impossible
,
therefore, to gainsay
facis
, I was constrained, spite of
my latent hostility to
certain
Big Meetings, to acknowledge
to my friend, who insisted on my immediate and honest
answer, to acknowledge that:
A camp-meeting was, all things considered, the very
best contrivance and means for making the largest number
of converts in the shortest possible time; and also for
enlarging
most speedily the bounds of a Church Visible and
Militant.
CHAPTER XLIX.
Amor vincit omnia
Love laughs at locksmiths!
Our
present chapter treats of love and matrimony.
Doubtless it has occurred to the reader, that John
Glenville
is yet a bachelor and ought to be looking out for a
wife. Now, although John was never
overhead and ears
in love, he yet was always
falling
into itknee deep at
least; but as yet, he had never found anybody for
help-meet
,
though several were disposed to be help-mates.
My friend had, indeed, often gone a gallin among our
log-cabin beauties; and sometimes received answers so
serious to his sportive questions as to make his backing out
very difficult and ungraceful. For instance, he once
accompanied
Peggy home from a night meeting; and on
reaching the cabin she paused a moment by the wood pile,
when John playfully said:
Well, Peggy, I've a notion to go in and court awhile,
what do
you
say to it?
Wellmaybe you mought and maybe you moughtn't
Why? has anybody cut me out?
Hey?!
Perhaps somebody else is gallin down here?
Prehaps thar is, and prehaps thar isn't.
Awh! come Peggy
do
tell me.
Here Peggy looked down in some perplexity, as
balancing
uncertainties, and after kicking up a large heap of chips
with the toe of her shoe, she seemed to have arrived at
the conclusiona bird in the hand, &c.and, therefore
modestly answered:
Well! JohnI'm a kinder sorter courted like, and a
kinder sorter not like,but I'm more a kinder sorter not,
nor a kinder sorterand I allow you'd better step in and
see daddy; tain't latealthough mammy's in bed.
Of course, John got out as awkwardly as we end his
adventure
.
But once Glenville was caught more effectually and
much more to his surprise; and yet, he backed out with
some ingenuity. The lady, however, had
ultimately
her
revenge. He was on a visit of business in an adjoining
state, when he was invited by the celebrated Mr. Brown to
spend a few days at his house. Here he became naturally
interested in Miss Brown, the daughtera young lady of
some beauty, of much good nature, of good talents, and
mistress
of many useful acquirements beside several
ornamental
branches.
In an unguarded moment, John sportively popped the
question, or rather popped
at
the question, by wondering
how Miss B. would like to live in a cabin with such a
Hoosier as himself; to which Paddy's hint, Miss B. too
seriously intimated that Mr. G. had better consult her
father on such points. Now, generous reader, Glenville
was by no means ready to forsake father and mother at that
time; and the cabin alluded to, was so open and
unchincked
,
that poverty could easily enough have crept in all around,
and love gone flying out through an hundred crevices in
addition
to the doors and window. In plain English, the
fellow was too poor to ask any woman to share his
poverty
;
unless she belonged to the Range, was used to
chinkin and daubin, and to makin
huntin shirts and lether
brichis:
hence after musing on the affair the whole night,
he seized an opportunity the next morning of renewing
with Miss B. the colloquy of the previous afternoon. In
this he painted in true colours, the cheerlessness of his
rude cabin and his half hunter's life, and the privations and
sufferings to which such a man's wife would necessarily
be subjected; and then, with some ingenuity, (certainly
with some boldness,) he wished to know if such a man
ought to ask any kind parent, in affluent circumstances, to
send away an amiable and beloved daughter.
To his relief, Miss B., with a slight betrayal of surprise,
(John said mortification,)agreed with him; but after
this his situation was so awkward, that he left Mr. Brown's
mansion that very day. Here, therefore, is another proof
that some things can be done as well as others; and while
this affair is not
quite
so odd as that of Deerslayer and
Judith, yet it shows the difference between truth and
fiction
.
Well, the present winter, Glenville being often on visits
to Woodville, and circumstances existing to alter cases,
we frequently rallied the bachelor on his courtships; and
more than once, in full assembly, voted that he must and
should forthwith go and find a wife. To all this, he
opposed
the stale replies, that he was too old nowcould
find nobody to suit himand that such as would suit would
not have him,till at last he consented, if I could find the
proper person, and persuade her to have him, he would
marry.
Accordingly, one night after such a discussion, Glenville
and myself sat alone by the fire, when the following talk
went on in continuation of the subject:
But, Glenville, are you really serious?
Yes, Carlton, I am really serious.
Still, you would not marry if you did not love?
WellI'm not quite so sure there. At all events, I
shall easily love any girl
you
will chooseespecially if
you choose
Miss Brown
.
Come, John, be candiddid you ever truly love her?
More, perhaps, than I ever loved any one before, or
ever shall again.
And why did you back out so foolishly?
For the very reasons I have a thousand times told you.
I was too poormy home too utterly dreary to take
such
a girl toand if I had ever dreamed my jesting manner
would have been mistaken, I should have been far enough
from trifling with her
Suppose she had seemed willing next morning?
I would have consulted her father, unquestionably
but for the daughter's sake, I should have regretted his
consent.
Well, Glenville, what do you say to Miss Smythe?
I think she feels tender towards you.
She would do:and with a little practice I should love
her as well as most men love their wives. But Carlton,
the Squire has been cutting round there the last six months,
and
No oddssuppose you
try?
Willingly, if I thought there was any chance; but, in
the first place, maybe she's engagednext, maybe she
might not want meand so I do not like to lose my time
and run risk, and
Tut! tut!you need not waste any time; for I'll write
a love-letter for you; and as to the other objection, I'll bet
a coon skin you're too modest, and the girl, if disengaged,
will have you.
Carlton!
will
you write such a letter? If you will,
I'll
deliver
it.
Done!and I'll write you as many more as you like.
Suppose, then, you do another for Miss Brown? and
so I shall have two snaps.
Agreedwhen shall I do them?
Any time between this and next Saturday. I shall be
8*
in Woodville then, you knowso 'tis settled,come, I'm
tired, let's go to bed.
The two letters were duly concocted, the first one to be
delivered to Miss Smythe,
[31]
[31]
We do not expect the reader to laugh here, unless he is so disposed
I only laughed at the time because I could not help it.
the other, in case of the first
failing, was to be sent to Miss Brown; but if Miss S. was
disengaged and smiled propitious, John was, to all intents
and purposes, a married man; and Miss Brown was to have
no opportunity of revenge.
The letter for Miss Smythe was as follows:
Miss E. A. Smythe
,
A knowledge of your character, derived from mutual
friends, from the opinion of all your acquaintances, and also
from a somewhat intimate personal acquaintance, induces
me to believe that such a lady would fill the vacancy in my
domestic establishment most perfectly and delightfully:
although I am not vain enough to suppose Miss Smythe
will necessarily feel herself flattered by such a preference
on the part of the writer. As, however, Miss S. on better
acquaintance, might become interested in himmore so at
least than he fears she is at presenthe very respectfully,
yet
most carnestly
, craves permission to pay his addresses
in person.
Very truly, your humble servant,
But great admirer,
John Glenville
.
The letter to Miss Brown, or rather
for
her, as it was
addressed to the father, was this:
My dear sir,
In a playful conversation on a subject so common when
unmarried persons meet, your daughter, Miss Brown, in a
jesting manner, remarked, that she always referred
gentlemen
to her fatheras
his
choice would always be
hers
.
What was jest with her, with me would have become very
solemn earnest, had I had then to offer any thing beyond
my hand and my heart, to induce
such
a girl to leave
such
a home. Happily, circumstances are now favourably
altered
;
and willingly now would I ask that father for his
daughter could I flatter myself the daughter could be
induced
to gladden and adorn a hearth, which, however
warm in one sense, must be yet cold and cheerless without
the love of a bosom friend. And such a friend would Miss
Brown prove:and, dear sir, if
you
think such a match
suitable for your lovely daughter, I sincerely entreat the
communication of your favourable opinion to her in my
behalf
hoping
that the daughter's choice then may be as the
father's.
I have, sir, the honour to be
Your obedient servant,
J. Glenville
.
On Saturday Glenville came; when after reading,
criticising
,
correcting, and laughing, he took copies of the
letters
;
it being arranged, that he put one in each coat pocket,
and on waiting next day on Miss Smythe from church, he
should, at a proper time, hand her the proper letter. And
all this he accordingly did, and with no greater blunder than
putting his hand into the Brown pocket, and pulling out the
wrong letterwhich, if he had also delivered it to Miss
Smythe, would have made our book still more interesting
but he fortunately corrected his error in time, and
prevented
a very handsome laugh at our expense.
To save Miss S. the awkwardness of a special
messenger
,
and to avoid prying eyes at the post-office, Glenville,
on bowing adieu at the lady's door, stated that he would
call in person next morning for an answer. At that time,
therefore, after lots of speculating as to the style and manner
of the answer, Glenville, with Miss Brown's letter in his
pocket, and anxious not to be too early for the lady's
convenience
,
nor too late for the ardent affection he
intended
to have, marched off very bravely, looking back once or
twice and shaking his fist as he caught sight of our
cachinating
faces.
Well, in due season he returnedbut what pen or pencil
can give the odd expression of that face!
Well, Glenville, what luck?(Can I ever forget the
peculiar intonation, emphasis, inflection of that answer?)
Engaged!
Is it possible!but if she had
not
been, what then?
Bah!do you think I asked her?
Why not?I should like to know what she thinks of
you.
Why not!!in case she did not fancy me, was I going
to suffer a
double
refusal, when one is decisive?
Haw! ha! he!
[32]
[32]
She was distantly related to the Smiths in the
city
, and the r
kins-folks
the Smythes.
but what have you done with Miss
Brown's letter?
Dropp'd it in the office as I came along; and there's
a chance for Miss Brown to have her revenge. Bet a
dollar she says no!
The case of my friend was like that of the school boy,
who described his disappointment in a composition, which
we shall here introduce to fill up the time till the return
mail.
COMPOSITION ON HUNTING.
The other morning I went out a hunting with father's
duck-gun what he brung out from Kentucky; but as I
had no luck, I allowed I might as well put off for home;
and so I turn about and goes towards home. As I come to
the edge of our clearin, what should I see away off on the
top of a dead walnut, but a black crow! And so I makes
up my mind to try and hit him. The critter was more nor
three hundred yards from me; but I insinuates myself along
as near as two hundred yards to the feller; when he begins
a showing signs of flittin: and so I trees where I was in a
minute. Well, I determines to try him there, although
'twas near as good as desperut to try a black crow that
distance with a shot-gun; although father's duck-gun's
the most powerful shot-gun in the Purchis.
Howsomdever
,
I wanted the load out; and I thought I might as
well fire that a way as any otherand so up I draws the
piece very careful, and begins a takin aim, thinking all the
while I
shouldn't
hit him: still I tuk the most exactest aim,
as if I
should;
when just then he hops about two foot
nearer my way, as if to get a look round my tree, where he
smelt powderand then, thinking all the time, as I said, I
shouldn't
hit
him, as the distance was so most powerful
fur, I blazed away!and sure enough, as I'm aliveI
didn't
hit him!
Now Glenville, from the distance of his second shot,
insisted
he should never hit: yet how near he came may be
conjectured from the following replies to his epistle:
John Glenville, Esq
,
Dear Sir
* * * * * * and the inclosed
from my daughter, to whom was handed your late
communication
,
contains, I presume, the most satisfactory answer,
* * * * and * * *
Yours, very respectfully, &c.
Redman Green Brown
.
Now, this sentence in the envelope containing a sealed
letter from Miss Brown, brought the crow about two feet
nearer; and John's eyes began to sparkle, although he
continued humbly affirming that the sealed epistle
contained
No!
Sir
:
I honour you for honesty, as I am satisfied you assign
true reasons for not taking one to share your home; although
the reasons themselves can never seem satisfactory where
one was willing to share another's
heart
. For, like most
girls in their days of romance, that one cared to find
only
a
heart when she married. As my own home is sufficiently
comfortable, there can be no inducement to wish another,
however comfortable, in the New Purchase; and where its
owner seems to think `altered circumstances' are important
in winning a woman's love. But to show that kindness is
estimated that would spare my delicacy, by leading my dear
father to think
all
our conversation had been sportive, I do
hereby most cordially(here John looked! oh! I tell you
what!)invite you to our Christmas festivities, when the
writer changes her name from Mary Brown to Mary
Burleigh
.
There, Carlton! I
told
you soI said it would be
no! And yet secretly did I wish,ay! I do wish it now
that the answer could beyes! I am glad the girl has
her revenge; but still I have known too many
hard-ships
not to feel happy in the reflection, that one I did love
a little, and could now love a great deal, has never been
called to share them.
And so after all, reader, our chapter ends without a
wedding
!
proving how hard it is to get an old bachelor
married
.
Another year we may, perhaps, be more successful.
FIFTH YEAR.
CHAPTER L.
The three R'sReadin, Ritin, Rithmetic.
London Alderman's Toast
.
I saw a smith stand with his hammer thus
The whilst his iron did on the anvil cool,
With open mouth swallowing a tailor's news.
A GREAT quarrel between the Rev. C. Clarence and the
Commonwealth of Woodville, was in reference to the kind
of education fit for Hoosiers, Woolverines, and other true
democrats. Our man of learning contended for a liberal and
thorough discipline of the mind; while we insisted on a
practical
education. He argued that no course of
education
paid for by the government, ought to have exclusive
regard to any class, or to any one art, trade, or profession:
but that where the State furnished the means, the best
intellectual
education should be given both to the poor and
the rich. Nay, he even affirmed that men ought not to be
trained as mere Americans, and much less as mere western
or eastern citizens; but as men of the world, as gentlemen,
as Christians.
About this time Mind, having been accommodated with
a pair of legs, and the said legs being fitted with seven
league boots, had marched our way, and was now
marking
time
very furiously in the Purchase. Indeed, we began to
be born in circumstances favourable to sucking in
thought
,
or something else, from maternal breasts: and by aid of
patent books and machinery, we now obtained as much
knowledge by the time we could carry a rifle, or tree a
raccoon, as our grandmothers had acquired in a long life!
And all this was real American, United States' learning!
useful, practical stuff!such as would enable a fellow to
get his own bread and butter; or in New Purchase terms,
his hog and hominy!
In the far east, it is true, circumstances demanded many
knowledges  chemistry, botany, anatomy, conchology,
bugology, insectology, phrenology, animal magnetism,
any one of which science, or no science, could, in the
improved
era, be mastered by hearing three lectures and
reading one pamphlet, and all of them in a few weeks; at
least, all that was practical and useful to gain money with:
for so nut-shelly had all books and subjects become, that
all could be even cracked and devoured in infant schools!
Yea! and any teacher could administer a rich and
nutricious
literary pap, that made children bloat right upand
till they perspired
knowledges
through their very pores!
And yea! again, till every body has been taught every
thingand curiosity itself is satiated!and the Mind
having had a long and wearisome march, and a toilsome
beating of time, has drawn off its boots and is laid down in
a deep and death-like repose! But in the Purchase, utility
required little beyond the learned alderman's R. R R.;
except
a little Jografree, and Surveyin enough to run
lines around a quarter section: which were naterally
allowed
to be a sorter useful like.
Nor was our inference to be blamed, if education be, as
it has been made for the last twenty-five years, and is to be
made for the next fifty, a thing of utility, latitudes and
meridians
;
for we New Purchase folks lived, not as folks
at
Boston, or New-York; and did not, hence, need the same
kind of education. Nor cared we for other people's
notions
,
being content with our own. If the Great-North-American
United-States Theories and Systems are founded in true
philosophy, then the Rev. Charles Clarence, A.M. should
have come down from his stilts, and become popular and
useful, and have educated us as we wished, and not as we
ought to be. And many were the friends he would have
bought; ay, and he could have made some money too, had
he spoken in favour of Patent Picture Books that
represented
truth and
falsehood
too, enigmatically; and had he
abused classical learning! Had he delivered Taylorian
twattle! or sent two boxes of dried bugs! or a chest of
flints! with a pair of globes, a double wooden cone, and
other toys to common schools! And had he not advocated
heathen establishments, where poor darling children read
about Jupiter, and Venus, and other he and she divinities,
instead of those noble, man-confiding, common schools,
which in some places so abhor
all
gods, as to acknowledge
none
either by public prayer, or the reading of a Divine
Revelation!
Fortunate times! when a politician may acquire
reputation
for all learning, and patriotism, and wisdom, and
philanthropy
,
by making a fourth-rate plagiarized speech before
some third-rate Lyceum in favour of Practical American
Education! Or by sending five and a half dollars worth of
pebbles and toy-machinery to the People's School to impart
the knowledges!
Alas! Clarence, little believed I once in your
predictions
!
We thought you an ill-boding crow! And yet
Classical Learning with all its generous, manly, and
intellectual
cognates is in most places deadin all dying! In
his last letter Clarence himself thus writes:
I am now in an incorporated classical and
mathematical academy at the capital of a boastful little
Statea school where once numerous pupils were
disciplined
in my favourite system, and in due time became
men. But Othello's occupation's gone! I have only
three pupils professedly studying even Latin! and that only
to understand
law-terms!
The rest are literally in the R.
R. R. and Jogerfree! Indeed, in a population of some
twelve thousand
bodies
, we can count but twelve
souls
as
classical scholars in any of the schools, public or private!
So much for utilitarianism. It pulls down; it never
has
,
it never
can
build up! It will hardly go to heaven if not
paid
for it! Carlton! are we out of the woods? Has
that impudent far-famed Theory of Practical Education,
made us, as was promised, richer and happier and better?
Does it not seem, that Providence has permitted our losses
and distresses to show, among other matters, that where
education is debased into a system to sharpen men's wits
and appetites, and furnish instruments merely with which
to make money and spend it, that education is a curse?
After all, are there not very many
illiterate
fellows worth
immense
estates, who can barely read, rite, and sifer?
and who are vastly richer than the best utilitarian school
system ever made any body? And as to mere knowledge
and knowledges, separate from mental discipline, are they
not productive of more evil than good, more sorrow than
pleasure? To educate men for making most money in the
shortest time, tends directly to content them with the
shortest
,
the cheapest, the most paltry education; and it is
natural
all mere utilitarian schemes should degenerate into the
most pitiful and meagre systems. After all, an education in
mental discipline, in the
good old
way, is the best for
practical
uses; and if a disciplined man fail in making money
or gaining worldly honours, he
never
can fail, if virtuous,
in possessing his intellectual superiority and its
concomitant
joys; but my paper is out. Farewell.
[33]
[33]
Since writing the above Clarence informs me the trustees have
dismissed him and shut the academy, as the people do not wish a
classical
school at all!
Yes, Clarence, you were right and we wrong. Well do
I remember your lectures and conversations, in which you
insisted it was wrong to appeal so exclusively to the
selfish
and political feelings and views, and thus coax men to
have schools. How you argued that whole communities,
if disappointed in immediate and profitable results, came
soon to ask cuibono? not only as to the classics, but even
as to the sacred R. R. R. themselves. For what was else
to be expected, when
virtue
itself was valued as it was
found useful; and
honesty
practiced and tolerated, because
the best policy?
Yes! yes! thy mantle is fallen upon me! the puerile
picture-book, the question and answer, the no-studying,
the cheap as dirt, and nearly as worthless systems, shall
all themselves come in due time to be neglected! Ay!
for a while, a time and a half a time, in some degrees and
minutes and seconds shall rage utility and selfishness; and
this lower world's honours and glories shall be sought and
not found for everybody and everybody's son in the lecture
system, and the common school system, and the lyceum
system; and then before the reformation shall the
friend-to-man
and humbug-system, as well as the nobility-making
and the aristocratical teaching first receive nothing from
pupils, and then pay a premium for scholars! Amen.
Our prefessor, however, did persuade a few to lay the
proper foundation of mental discipline in the proper union
of classical and abstract mathematical studies. And so
well did he cause to appear the few thus persuaded, in
contrast
to equals restricted elsewhere to the beggarly
elements
of a good(?) English education; and so manifest
had it become, that the R. R. R. and other common and
even uncommon English branches could all be acquired,
while pupils were laying the proper foundation, that not
only were some of the Woodville common wealth induced to
try the high and big-bug larnin, but pupils for the same
purpose began to come from abroad. And these were
styled Foreign and Strange Students.
And then, dear reader, as moneys came in, you have
no idea how converts increased to the doctrine of
College-utility
!
for none could deny the utility! It was
tangible, visible, audible! With our own eyes we
saw Cash! handled it with our fingers! heard it
jingle
with our ears! And all at once high larning
became as popular as common schools. It was equal to a
productive system, or grammar! It raised the wind! It
brought the rhino! Only show that a school, an academy,
a college, or,
a church
, will advance the value of town
lotsbring in more consumerscreate a demand for beef,
cloth, pepper and salt, powder and shot; then, from the vulgar
plebeian dealing in shoe leather, up to the American
nobleman
dealing in shops, and who retails butter and eggs, we
shall hear one spontaneous voice in favour!
But wo, Pedagogue, if all are not speedily benefited by
your school! Wo! if town lots rise not! if boots are
not worn with dandy heels! if every body that has one
spare room and two garrets, obtain not boarders! if cloth
sells not ever so many hundred per cent, above cost! if, in
short, you enrich not all your
dear
fellow-townsmen!then
shall you hear the growlings of swine-like selfishness, and
be asked what's the use of learning? Then shall you
be complimented with many honorary titles, as pitiful
schemer!book worm!idle rascal! Or, all will
be summed in darn'd Yankee!the most
comprehensive
A.M. that can be bestowed in the Purchase, saving two
lower case d. d. a few years after this innocently given,
because he was out of sorts, by our college printer to
the worthy and reverend Constant Bloduplex, d. d.
The star of Clarence was, however, on the ascendant;
and he that had introduced the dn Yankee trick of
exacting written excuses, was suddenly discovered to be
a powerful and mighty clever feller! And his high
larn'd idees had more good in them than one could have
conjectured! But when two gentlemen from a slave State
appeared in Woodville, at the opening of this summer's
session, and not merely with three boys as new scholars,
but with the avowed intentions of buying town lots and
living
with us till the education of their sons should be
completed
;
and when these gentlemen were seen in
broadcloth
coats with yellow buttons, and canton crape
pantaloons
,
walking round and examining sites for dwellings
then was the college extolled to the very heavens! And
Clarence! what did he
not
become? If not a demi-god,
at least within a fourth of ita veritable semi-demi-one, a
genuine terrestrial quarter-deus!
Poor fellow! he was a little inflated by the popular
breath; and mistaking the
vox populi
for the
vox dei
, he
said the college was safe! and that Providence had some
remarkably excellent things in view for the great valley of
the Mississippi in general, and for our portion of it in
particular
!
Ah! enthusiast! how you made us thrill with
your paintings of our future! How you thanked Heaven
for casting your lot among us! and dreamed of sumptuous
edifices for colleges! and libraries! and apparatus! and
crowded recitation rooms! You lost sight of your own
principles, and thought pyramids could be built on air!
Happily, my friend's day-dreaming was soon dispelled, or
he would have been ruined. As it was, he increased his
own library many fold. He bought Minoras, and Majoras,
and Homers, and Ciceros, and lexicons, and concordances,
and antiquities, and anthologies, and architecturesand
would have ordered the whole stock of the Carvilsas if
beastly selfishness in a community was the basis for a large
library, more than for a liberal, manly, gentlemanly, and
Christian education!
In these pleasing circumstances, our Principal relaxed
not the reins of wholesome discipline. And at this very
juncture, our Faculty had promulged a decree against
something
;
but on finding both public and private admonition
unavailing, they advertised that the next transgression
would be visited by a brief suspension. On the very next
day two pupils were seen by both masters, and in the very
act of disobedience; and of course Crabstick and
Thorntree
were suspended fortwenty-four hours!
Many things create surprise in our mysterious world,
which are followed, some by contempt, others by
indignation
and rage. A tom-cat exquisite leaps lightly on a
toilette
before a glass, and for the first sees a rival waving a
taper tail, arching a velvet back, and purring with the most
provoking complacencyall where he had reigned alone!
His eye dilates with amazement! yet in a moment he
intrudes
his nose behind the mirror and the antagonist cat
is vanished! And Tom ever after treats such semblances
with the coolest indifference.
Not so Haw-Buck, who came into town to see the battle
of Bunker Hill. His surprise was followed with
indignation
at the reckless chaps that handled fire-arms so
carelessly
.
Why
darn
'em, as he took off his ram-beaver
and saw a hole in its cylinder, why darn 'em! if they
hain't a firin bullits!
The surprise of Woodville, in its consequences, was
analogous
,
not to that of pussy, but of Haw-Buck. The
pupils
generally heard the sentence with a look that said
we allow the masters don't know what they are doing!
while Crabstick and Thorntree left the room in manifest
indignation! And then, in a few hours, the
fama clamosa
was conveyed to every man, woman and child in all
Woodville
;
and in a few more, to every one in our whole
settlement
!
At first, our community was
dumb!
Yard-sticks were
arrested in admeasurements! Needles stood with thread
in the eye! Wax-ends stuck in awl-holes! Planes,
hammers
,
axes, saws, and other industrious implements ceased
operating! And our folks hurried forth to unite wonders!
Every store became crowded; and every bar-room and
doggery! Knots of wise persons gathered at every
corner
;
and all places were full of winks, shrugs, elevated
eyebrows, puckered mouths, and quivering noses!
It was soon rumoured that Thorntree, a foreign student,
had hired a horse from Liebug, and in an uncontrollable
fit of dudgeons gone home to his father, Major Thorntree.
And then, if our regulators had, like the ass in one of his
phases, been
dumb
, they now imitated him in another; for
no unanimous braying of a herd of donkeys could equal the
hideous outcries of my townsmen!
My store was always a head quarters, for I was a
leading
trustee; beside we were liberal in the nut and apple
line; and also gave, often, third-rate raisins to women and
children, and fragments of lead, or a second rate flint to a
chap. But above all Carltin was the feller to play the
flute and the fiddle, and his ole woman, the body what could
rattle the pianny! For some days, our store was now
jammed with representatives
extra
from all the arts, trades
and professions; yes, and ages and sexes; and I was worn
down with talking and hearing, but without selling a
dollar's
worth. I took some revenge, indeed, by giving away
no goodies, and hinting to some of the most violent and
abusive a settlement of accounts.
SPECIMENS OF TALK.
I say, Mr. Carltin, ain't you goin to put the fellers
out?
Put out! why?
Why!why it's plain enuf they've gone on like
'ristecrats
and
won't it take away a poor man's livin?
Just the other way, if all was understood
Didn't Thorntree get boots of me?
Yesand cakes and candy at our shop?
And what's more to the pint, Carltin, won't the Major
go agin us next legislatur?
Wellarter all, what did the studints do? only break a
dd Yankee reg'lashin for five minits or so?
Yesand the master down our settlemint says he never
heern tell of sich a rule; and he's sentimentally of opinion
it's a robbin a boy of his money by keepin him out a school
for nothun no how
I tell you what, I heern Bob say he expects Squire
Brompton is goin agin 'emClarinse and all
That's my sentiments, 'cos Major Thorntree
Nothat's not the why; but Bob thinks the Squire
won't sell his lots to them what's to be new comers
Have the gentlemen given up the bargain?
Well, I don't know as they has; but Bob says he
expects
the Squire will think so
What's Sylvan say, Carltin?
I have not heard him say any thing.
You ain't! well, Jake says ole man Hazel told his son's
wife, that the doctor tell him the Fakilty had been too
quick
I do not believe it; for the Faculty acted with the
utmost
deliberation, and
Yesyou always stick to thar side; but darn my
leggins
,
if I ain't powerful glad they did something to turn
them out.
Why?
Bekase they're sectarians and rats; and its high time
the rest on us had a chance. `Rotashin in offus,' as old
Hickery Face says`rotashin for ever!'
Pick my flint! if
I
didn't always say they'd do some
high-hand something some day, as soon as Clarinse made
Polly's step-son bring excusis on paper in hand-rite!
Joe Patchin, is Crabstick and Thorntree goin to come
backdid you a sort a hear?
Crabstick is, maybebut not tother.
Why?
'Cos he said to Liebug when he hired his hoss, says
he, `I hope I may be rowed up Salt River if ever I cum
back agin to school any more, if the trustees don't turn out
Clarinse and Harwood!'
And so, Mr. Carltin your Board's a goin to meet!
Yes, the Major is here with his son, and they insist on
a meeting to see who is to blame
Bust my rifle! we'll dog out the rats now!
Yes, Ned, but if the Faculty have done right
Carltin!you're a honest sort a fellerbut bust my
rifle! if I ever run up a 'count agin in your 'are store, if
you vote for the fakilty-fellers.
Ned!I'm sorry you would bribe me to do wrong;
but, Ned, a man's bribe is not very powerful, as long as his
old account is not paid
You needn't a be a hintin round that a way, Carltin.
I'll pay you now, if you'll take all tradeand bust my rifle!
if I'll ever buy a pound a lead in this 'ere store agin, no
how!
Such are selections from our many long, boisterous, and
angry dialogues. But pass we to the next chapter, which
narrates the meeting of our Board.
Vol. II.9.
CHAPTER LI.
Vox Populi
!
Look, as I blow this feather from my face,
And, as the air blows it to me again,
Obeying with my wind when I do blow,
And yielding to another when it blows,
Commanded always by the greater gust;
Such is the likeness of your common men!
Major Thorntree
having come a wearisome journey,
from a love of justice and to promote the welfare of
Woodville
,(and
so he always insisted)our Board could but
consent to a meeting; especially when the Major expressed
his fears that certain statesmen
[34]
[34]
The Major was himself a member of the Legislature; and hence
had fair opportunites of knowing.
might unhappily influence
the next Legislature to remove the College, unless the
Faculty were better watched and governed. Beside, from
the report of his son, who was a very honest boy and never
said anything to a person's prejudice, and from what had
been stated to himself since his arrival, by some worthy
citizens of Woodville, the Major really believed,(so he
said)that there had been gross mismanagement in general
by the Faculty, and much shameless partiality, and at the
expense of his son particularly. He thought, too, his son's
punishment was for a very trivial offence, and had been
rash, and perhaps, malicious; at all events, it was excesive
and arbitrary, aristocratic and unconstitutional; hence, such
things must be crushed and resisted now, or there would
be a speedy union of church and state.
We, therefore, met. And, first, were canvassed and
rejected
many propositions suggested to us by different ones
of our numerous lobby-members. Among these proposals
were some remarkable for boldness, simplicity and
ingenuity
;
such as turn 'em rite out!send 'em packin!
pay 'em and have done with 'em!don't pay 'em no
how!sue for damejis! But it was finally determined
by our honourable
visitor
, the Major, that we should
summon
the Faculty and
hear their defence!
Nayhe was
even willing to have a trial; as he said witnesses were in
attendance from the citizens, and he thought it proper also
to call on all the students for their opinion and testimony!
This was adopted, Mr. Carlton crying out in the
negative
;
and
so
, likewise, would have done Dr. Sylvan; but
unfortunately
just at the time of our meeting, the Doctor
was
forced
to go and mix medicines and then to visit a
patient in a remote part of the county!
About the same time, Charles Clarence was employed
in castle building; or what was the same sort of
architecture
in the Purchasein College building; being seated
on a cloud capt tower of sublime and solemn view!
But awaked by the braying discord of Woodville, he started
from his dream! and spite of all past experience he was
momentarily amazed! He had caught a new glimpse of a
many headed-monster! and its enormous tail! He became
sick at heart; and the warm blood of generous
self-devotion
in his heart congealed! He seemed in a
vacuum
as if all the air was blowing from around him! Yet, soon
he recalled important truths, such ascease from man,
whose
breath
is in his nostrils!put not your trust in
princes!
And when the first bitterness of the soul was past, he
remembered his Divine Master; who did good to the
wicked
and thankless! yea, to enemies! And he thought the
very folly and ignorance and malice and idleness of a
community
,
were the very things Christ's servants must strive
to enlighten, remove, correct, instruct! Ashamed then of
his momentary alarm, he recalled the noble saying of an
ancient statesman and warrior, who builded a wall in
troublesome
times; and he resolved to imitate, and like him
said,What! shall such a man as I flee!
Meanwhile, rumour had been tramping about with her
crescit eund;
and, long before the Faculty received our
Scytala, they had heard her cryThe Board has told
Major Thorntree, the Faculty shall be tried and turned
right out, and shall be sued for damages done the school
and the State, and
Woodville
, by their unconstitutional,
high-hand, big-buggish, aristocratic yankee notions!!
The accused had nearly a mile to walk to the place of
execution; and along the path were strewed the sovereign
people to see the fellers go along to git it! Yet instead
of beholding two fellers sneaking along, like
office-holders
trembling about their bread and butter, they saw
two gentlemen proceeding with a slow and somewhat
studied gait, with heads erect, countenances serene, and
not rarely illuminated with smiles of mingled pity and
contempt
,
benevolence and indignation! Sneers, therefore,
ready to curl on noses, and looks of vulgar triumph, with
which
intended to greet their victims, were changed
into remarks and looks of vexed admiration; for barbarians
of all kinds pay involuntary honour to calm and fearless
conduct in those destined to the torture. Indeed, the
crowd to-day, was at a loss to say, whether the Faculty
were going up town to be tried; or as lords and judges to
give and interpret the laws.
On entering the court our gentlemen bowed, and then
took stations where such could be found; for all the stools,
backless chairs, and even bedsides of Dr. Sylvan's room,
where we had convened, were filled; and like all ultra
fashionables at a jam, some of us stood, till politeness, ne
cessity, or whim in those seated and reclined, gave others
a temporary seat.
A dead calm ensued; we, of course, not knowing how
to proceed with our prisoners, as we were in the
predicament
of the Pro-consul, who felt the awkwardness of
sending
a state prisoner to Csar and without any good
accusation
.
But Mr. Clarence himself kindly relieved our
embarrassment
by breaking the ice thus:
Gentlemen
[35]
[35]
Paul himself said, Most noble Felix; and so gentleman is
often a title of office.
We are here, though not as delinquents.
We come, however, not merely willing, but even desirous
that our whole official conduct may be subjected to the
most rigorous and minute investigation. We are confident,
if popular clamour be disregarded, and improper
interference
be disallowed, we are confident we can
make
the
College; and, if it must be a reason for the aid or silence
of some, we can
make
the town. We are ready then, to
give ample and minute explanations to the Board; or
answer
any question of any of its members about our plans,
rules, maximsin short-our whole discipline; and are
sure that the more
Here the Major and without rising broke inthis is all
very fair, Mr Clarence, but the Board(the Major was
no
member)think you have been hasty and partial; and
I
myself, think, as my son has been unjustly used, you ought
to give some satisfaction
I question, your right, Major Thorntree, rejoined
Clarence, to speak
thus
in the Board; but we waive our
objection; and if it will satisfy
you
or the Board, we
submit
to what you may be pleased to call and consider a
trial.
Well, sir, will you allow the students to appear as
witnesses?
Willingly even
that!
And yet I know not that such
a request ought to surprise us more than all the proceedings.
Yes, call in all the studentslet them say what is true
we invite the truth.
Some one here asked if the boys should take an oath!!
No, sir! no, sir! no!said Clarenceby no means
every consideration is against it! No! let them speak
on honour what they know or even believe to be truth!
And beside, we pledge our honour that we will never
remember
to their prejudice whatever disparaging things may
be said by them as witnesses.
A whisper of approbation began to buzz around our
lobbies
;
which sussurration reaching the People without, was
answered by a gentle hurrah! for the Fakilty! At
this the Major was a
leetle
disconcerted. But as he had
a little modesty that was natural. He, then, remarked:
You seem in good spirits, gentlemen,(Clarence and
Harwood,)yet if I am allowed to bring in
all
the
testimony
,
your confidence may be weaker. But how shall
the boys give their testimony, sir?
I will tell you, sir, replied Clarence: place a chair
there:now call in every boy, without exception, and in
any order deemed satisfactorydo not omit even the two
suspended boys. Then, let the boy in the chair for the
time, first tell an uninterrupted story; then let the Major,
or any member of the Board, ask any questions, leading or
otherwise, that he may wish; and then let Professor
Harwood
and myself have the same privilege, and
That's fair! if it ain't, bust my rifle!was heard
from without, manifesting a change in favour of the right.
And that, as was always the case, had a corresponding
effect on matters within. Hence I ventured now on no
injudicious interference. The Major, too, was evidently
awed by this voice of
his
masters: and, perhaps, certain
of our young folks were thus aided in speaking the truth,
or at least not suppressing it. Whether Clarence designed
to be so politic is not for me to say;but we lived in a
log-rolling
countryand even the best of men will
manage
in
emergencies. Indeed, our Board and its Major, only
wanted the
vox populi:
and Clarence only contrived to
make
their
god speakass though it often be.
The students, introduced one by one into the chair,
(with a few exceptions,) gave a united testimony in favour
of the Faculty: and even young Crabstick said nothing
against them, save that, they ought not to have suspended
himand yet, as it was over, he said, he intended to return
to school! The other sprout, Thorntree, refused to appear.
The Major, thus far disappointed, now proposed to call
in the citizens as witness, as wrong
had
been done by
the Faculty! but that boys stood naturally in awe of their
teachers!! and, therefore, they did not like to tell all they
knew!!!
Clarence then remarked:Had not our amazement all
been used up, gentlemen, we should certainly be aghast at
this!but, be it solet our fellow-citizens all come in;
and
without an oath! We know ten thousand idle rumours
are afloat:but, if every honest man will honourably and
fearlessly, like a backwoodsman, state exactly, and neither
more nor less than what he himself personally has seen,
heard, and knows about Mr. Harwood and myself, in all
our dealings and intercourse with them as citizens, as men,
as teachers, as ChristiansI say, call them incall them
inwe are ready
(
Outside
.)
Pick my flintif I know any thing agin the
fakiltymen
arter all
Nor me nutherbust my rifle if I do!
Wellall I know, I heern Patchin's ole-womun
a-say-in'
she heerd say they was powerful ristocratty
I'm sentimentally of opinyin, Ned, thare ain't no use
a-goin' in, if a feller doesn't know nothun of himself.
Bust my rifle, if we're quite sich fools!
Agreedthem's my sentiments!
Me too!
This thunder on the proper side from the politicians'
god, was operating to the immediate and honourable
discharge
of our prisoners; and, perhaps, with an apology for
the trouble caused them; when the Major announced one
citizen as ready to state on his own knowledge, things
adverse
to the Faculty.
Who is it, sir? demanded Clarence.
Mendax Liebug.
Mr. Liebug! and does Major Thorntree ask this
honourable Board to believe
without
an oath, a person not
admissible in yonder court-house as a witness even
with
an oath? No Atheist shall ever testify semi-judicially
either for or against me: and I trust, gentlemen, this will
not be permittedbut, if otherwise, be the consequences
what they may, the instant Mr. Liebug enters
that
door as
a witness, I take my departure out of
this
.
Several members of the Board expressed approbation
of Clarence's sentiments: and the people, led by the
Hoosier that swore by his rifle, all allowed it would be
most powerful onfair to ask folks to believe any body
without
swearin', who couldn't take a legal affidavy. And
Mr. Mendax Liebug was not admitted.
As a last attempt to demolish the Faculty, the Major
said he would rest the whole on one question and answer,
if Mr. Clarence was willing.
I am willing, sir,said Clarence,proceed.
The people crowded to hear, won by our Principal's
candour and readinesstwo things all potent with genuine
woodsmen:and then the Major, with a triumphant
flourish
,
went on:
Mr. Clarence, you are a preacher; and the Bible
directs us to do to others as we would be done by:well,
sir, recall your boyish days, and put yourself in my son's
place; and, how would you have acted, in view of what
you deemed small laws, and how would you have regarded
a Faculty, that had acted as you have just acted towards
my son?
Why, sir, said Clarence, in reply, I should have
acted just as thoughtlessly as your son has acted, and as
most young men every where occasionally act:I should,
then, probably have broken the laws and abused a Faculty;
and, of course, merited and received what your son merited
and receiveddiscipline. Thus I thought and should
have done when `a child;' but having become a man, I
have put away childish things, and have dealt with your
son now, as
men
ought to have dealt with me then.
Hah! haw!perttee powerful smart feller! if that
ain't a fair answer, bust my rifle! Come, boys, let's be
offI allow Clarinse and t'other fakilty-man kin manudge
collige better nor us. Who's goin' squirrillin'--no use
wastin' time here no longer no how!
And so away went the people; and away went the
Trustees; and away went the Faculty. But the Major
and they first shook hands, in sign of forgiveness and amity:
yet young Thorntree was not sent back to school, and the
Major was ever more suspected as an enemy, than loved
as a friend.
The next day, honest Rifle-bust walked into my store,
and began as follows:
Wellbust my rifle, Carltin, if I wa'rn't most
teetotally
and sentimentally wrong 'bout that fakilty thing.
Here, I've brung a dozen squirl for your ole-womanand
I want the worth on 'em in lead. I'll not settle our whole
'count nowbut next week I'll get that hoss-beast for you,
and in sang time I'll likkefy all
Oh! no odds, Ned! I didn't fear an honest man:
9*
only use your own eyes and ears, and you'll do people
justicehere's your lead. Now just step in and see Mrs.
Carlton, and she'll play you a tune.
Accordingly, in went Ned; and directly up struck the
pianonot with any of your new-fangled fandangos, but
with those primitive movementsPolly put the Kettle
onandGo to the D and shake yourself, and
so forth: and soon could be plainly heard Ned kicking to
pieces my rag carpet, in what he called a dance; and
then Mrs. Carlton's merry laugh, as Ned gave a
vernacular
version of the rumpus 'tween Clarinse and the Major
and t'other fakilty-man, and ended with his sentimentul
opinyin that the Majur was most teetotally
discumflisticutted
,
and near about as good as chaw'd up.
Our Board, after this disturbance, met and enacted a
code of laws for the guidance of the Faculty, and ordained,
among other matters, that for a
first offence
, should be
private admonition:
for the second, public admonition;
and for the third, suspension! This beautiful gradation
had been mentioned in some venerable old woman's Prize
Essay on Education; and was supposed to embody the
quintescence of all experience in the art of government.
It was not, indeed, stated whether the
same
offence was to
be committed three times; or three
different
offences; or
if the
same
must be done by
three
different pupils in
succession
,
or by
one
three times, to secure the benefits of
suspension. Nor was any thing said about the age, the
understanding, the knowledge, the temptations, the
aggravations
of an offender and offence. And no notice was
taken of looks, words, gestures, &c. &c.any or all of
which often accompany
one
offence, and make it equal to
three
ay, to three times three!
Hence our skilful application of patent
gum and gammon
for the teaching of teachers, wrought as the Faculty
predicted
two
offences of the same kind were repeatedly
committed
by the boys collectively and individually, and
private
and public admonitions were as plenty as beach-nuts;
while the
ingenuous
youth instead of doing an old sin once
more, did a new one twice! Indeed, nothing was more
sport than to get admonition No. 2; for the fellows had
come to see plain enough that the Faculty were not really
masters unless the pupils should be silly enough to give
them that advantage.
In this state of affairs, a relative of Liebug's entered the
school and
purposely
committed offence No. 1. Now No. 1
had been
twice
committed by other boys, and had been duly
rebukedand so No. 1 was decided by the Faculty in this
case, owing to the great effrontery of young Brass, to be
really No. 3. And, therefore, Mr. Brass, jun. was
promptly
suspended for one week.
Immediately Mr. Brass, sen. determined to have a
meeting of our Board. But we, now convinced that the old
woman's or the impertinent Mr. Boston's
patent-twaddlerules
,
could not be made to measure into all the sinuosities
and around all the angles of behaviour in merry and cunning
lads; and that after all, well qualified teachers were as
competent to judge of things as pert writers or Taylorian
lecturers, or persons that have conducted infant-schools,
or short-hand schools, or steam schools of ever so many
horse powerwe now refused to be called. Whereupon
Mr. Brass, sen. in order to spite the rats, went and
established
a Sunday-school in his own house, and taught there
gratuitously male and female Owenism! And not
satisfied
with this revenge, he once, in my store, tried to
overcome
professor Harwood in an argument on the truth of
the Christian religion; but in this attempt he was utterly
discomfited, and to the amusement of the auditors seated
on my counters. Wherefore, Mr. Brass, sen., advanced
to where Mr. Harwood reclined, and calling up the late
suspension of young Brass, he said he had now a powerful
d mind to thrash him for it.
This was quite a favourite mode of arguing in the
Purchase
and required much bodily strength and agility. How
learned men of slender bodies, pale faces, small hands and
green spectacles would have felt, in prospect of rencontre
with such a bear, is doubtful; but our professor,
although dressed in store cloth and rather dandy-looking,
betrayed no emotion, and never altered his half-recumbent
attitude. Yet plain was it, from the flash of his grey eyes,
and the hard compression of his lips, he was ready to ward
off his antagonistperhaps, even to spring on the
threatening
brute. This Bruin Brass perceived; and when Mr.
H. cooly replied very well, sir; try itbut maybe you'll
find your mistake in
that
argument, as quick as you did in
the other,he affected to laugh the whole off as a joke!
And happy! if he valued sound bones; for my friend
Harwood was a fine square built muscular young
Kentuckian
,
from early life used to every feat of strength and
agility, and able now to lift a barrel of flour in his unaided
arms, and carry it before him and without trip or pause
full fifty honest yards!
Even the Spiritual Church
may
put defensive and carnal
weapons into her children's hands to keep at a distance
the sanctimonious assassins and murderous snivellers of a
canting and unholy apostacy; and so cases do arise, where
scholars may and ought to repel club logic with
knockdown
argument. Yea and nay, an atheistic bear when
about to use violence must be, if possible, resisted with
physics
, even as the veritable shaggy-coat himself;
metaphysics
,
here,
may
come
afterwards
.
My friend Harwood had conducted the debate as a
Christian and a gentleman; and the double rebuke given
the atheist, while it had no tendency to change his heart,
quelled his beastly spirit and controlled its ferocity; and
ever after our Faculty were free from all fear of Mr. Brass,
sen., and all trouble from Mr. Brass, jun.
CHAPTER LII.
You'd scarce expect one of my age,
To speak in public, on the stage;
And should I chance to fall below
Demosthenes, or Cicero,
Don't view me with a critic's eye,
But pass my imperfections by.
A general
truce and cessation of arms had taken place,
and our Faculty began to drill the quiescent pupils for a
grand exhibition to come off this fall.
This was to be, as is everywhere usual, of speeches,
debates and compositions. Amendments may be
necessary
;
but all experience and reason itself favour generous
emulation and honest rivalry in schools; and nothing
better
prepares for the stormy conflicts of life than the literary
sham fights of college societies. It is preposterous to
train children for a world of romance, or for a state
possible
,
IF all were good. Beside, manly competition is
intrinsically
right; and is promotive of many virtuesand
all ought early to be inured to arduous and noble contests
for masteries. The opposite doctrine is hateful for its
puling
effeminacy; and at war with our nature (as God made
it,) and with the Scriptures. Thus thought our Faculty;
and so they actedalthough evils incident to their course,
as to all other excellences in this life, were not wanting.
In due time then, came the week of examinations and
exhibition; and all was turned into bustle and merriment
in fitting our Court-house for the great occasion!
How joyous such times to boysay to men who retain
the fresh and healthy feelings of boyhood! But to our
half-reclaimed young savagesoh! it was a time of exu
berant joy in all its phases of fun, frolic, raillery, joke, and
expectation!
And soon all Woodville caught the infection; and all
were desirous of sharing the work and speculating on its
progress. As for Carlton, he
could
not tend store;
and so leaving his boys to sell what they could, and devour
the remnant of the raisins and candy, away went our
dignified
author, and soon contrived to be elected by the boys
Grand Master of Ceremonies in general, and Stage Fixings
in particular! Then what a hauling of boards, and planks!
What a streaming over to the Court-house of rag-carpets,
and calico window curtains! Oh! the clatter of
candlesticks
!the
pitching of these and other articles on pounds
of tallow candles done up in brown paper and tow strings!
Gemini! the thundering of plank a-throwing down from
two boys' shoulders, or a-upsetting from a cart! Cancer!
the whacking! the pounding and nailing! the sawing and
hammering and jerking! the talking! laughing!
screeching
!
tearing! stamping! quizzing! It was a glorious
chaos!
Soon, however, from confusion, came order; and in less
than two whole days, all was ready! a short time
considering
;
for though we were thirty persons, only half worked,
the rest being occupied in making the fun and hindering.
The work was, first, the stage. This was erected
between
the doors of entrance into the court-room and
opposite
the forum or judges' seatthat honourable place being
transformed into an orchestra, our music
being
to be three
fiddles and one triangle. The stage-floor was spread with
rag-carpets, and the boxing of the stairs ascending each
from a door to the second story
[36]
[36]
Vid. Vol. I.
was adorned with calico
curtains tastefully festoonedthe special performance of
some young ladies just returned from
being finished
in a
boarding school of the far East! Front of the stage, in a
row were candles in appropriate stands; the tallest candles
at the ends, and the shortest in the centre, thus presenting
a graceful curve of light! And all the stands were
decorated
with fancy papers curled and cut and frissled most
fantastically;the work of Miss Emily Glenville's
boarding-school
misses!
Under the calico festooning stood
Windsor
chairs for the
Faculty and the two rival societies! And near Professor
Harwood's seat, was a cow-bell of a very soft and
mournful
voice, whose use was to ring out signals for the fiddles
and the trianglenot a classic signal truly, yet one to
which our musicians were accustomed, and not wholly at
variance with the harmonies produced. Indeed, even to
our own cultivated ears never came sounds so delicious as
those of a cow-bell, which once ravished me with its
sudden
tinkle when lost in the woods! Hence as associations
like utilities render things pleasant, our cow-bell signal
was not unacceptable to our woodsmen. It was, also, a
peculiar link connecting rough and softened life; and it
forcibly reminded us of the
milk
of human kindness!
Our seats. These were of doubled planks, resting on
joist, logs, benches, or other planks placed edgeways. Of
these, not one cracked, split, or tumbled over during the
exhibition: hence, considering their loads and the
stamping
they endured in the applauses,and
every
thing was
applauded,we have proof that our work was well done,
if not expeditiously.
On the evening preceding the exhibition, the Rev.
Principal
Clarence entered my store to obtain a pair of pumps,
wishing to tread the stage in elastic style; and nothing so
conduces to this ease and grace as a handsome stocking
and a becoming shoe. Yet, in vain, was every drawer,
trunk, or box containing either shoe or shoe-leather
rummaged
and re-rummaged, no pump turned up: and the
gentleman
was about to withdraw and make up his mind to
walk the boards in a shapeless two-soled pair of calf-skin
boots. But just then I had mechanically opened a drawer
of female shoes; when some very large and coarse moroccos
appeared, with straps to be joined by a steel buckle, and
Clarence exclaimed:
Stop! Carlton, the very thing!
Where?
Why, those machines of the softer sex.
Ha! ha! he!what! wear a woman's shoe?
Certainlyif I can find any
small
enough
Buckle and all?
Oh! no: my wife will razee the straps, and then the
affairs will look masculine enough; and we can tie them
with ribbon, pump-fashion.
That will answer, I
do
believe: sit down and try.
A pair was selected, yet perversely bent on spreading
sideways, when pressed with the foot; but that tendency,
it was hoped, would be corrected by the new mode of
tieing
:
and hence the man of learning departed with his
bargain. That night the shoes were cropped; and the
Principal, by way of rehearsal, was walking in them in his
parlour, when in came several senior pupils to make some
inquiry about the exhibition. In a moment the transmuted
articles caught their eyes, and so captivated their fancy
that they must ask whence were procured shoes so light
and tasteful? On learning, and being taught how the sex
could be so readily changed, off set they for my store:
and the consequence was, that soon all the students came
for morocco non-descripts, and we sold during the next
day about thirty pairs! Hence I became a more
decided
friend of the college than ever. Yes, academies
are
useful!
I cleared by this one speculation just thirty dollars! True,
I lost about five dollars by not charging the usual New
Purchase per centage: but then we must sacrifice
something
for the advancement of learning, and virtue is not
always
profitable!
The grand evening came at last: and long ere candle
light, our young gentlemen(
gentlemen
, surely, when about
to speak in
ladies
' shoes)could be seen running into and
out of and around the court-house, busy as bees, and with
sundry bundles and packages. For, rain being threatened,
it had been concluded to dress and put on the fine shoes
up stairs, one society occupying the jury room, the other
the council chamber.
Finally, the signal for assembling was given by the school
bell, half a mile distant, and by a tin horn in the centre of
Woodville, being the sacred trumpet lately blown to
convoke
us to the exhibitions at the camp-meeting: and then
in rushed all Woodville to fill the
vacant
seats. But strange!
the vacant seats had been filled an hour before; enough
girls and young ladies having been smuggled in by the
gallant students and a few Woodville bucks. And among
the number there sat the ladies of the Professors' families
and all the girls of Miss Glenville's establishmentand
that important personage herselfand Mrs. Carltonand
even Aunt Kitty Littleton herself, done up in a bran new
crimped cap and pink ribbon!
As to Mr. Carlton, in consideration of his
superintendance
and his musical penchant, he was honoured with a
windsor chair in the orchestra, and adjacent to the fiddles
and triangles! Indeed, Dan Scrape had invited Mr. C. to
play: although the honour had been declined, first, because
J. Glenville, who had borrowed our flute and fiddle, had
come over to the exhibition and forgotten to bring back the
instruments!(
sub rosa
, he left them behind purposely)
secondly, Mr. C. could not play any instruments but his
own; and thirdly, Mr. C. was afraid, as he had never
practiced
with Dan, that he could not keep up, and so on. When
we and the fiddles and triangles entered a little late and
through a back window, behold! a dozen of the rabble
were crowded into our sacred enclosure!(Notice here,
in public places all that cannot get into
seats
are
rabble
.)
However, after I had squeezed into my windsor chair, along
side the leading fiddle, Dan whispered for my consolation,
and with a smile and a winkNever-a mind, Mister
Carltin, we'll fix it afore long.
As if by magic, at a private signal, forth blazed the
candles in front of the stage; and some two dozen others
stuck to the walls by double pronged forks: and then to us
was displayed the whole audience, and to them the stage
and its fixins. In some points this audience was similar to
others; but it contained more gems in unpolished and dull
caskets than
some
eastern congregations. Hoosiers,
Woolverines
,
Buckeyes, and the like, were present, and of the
most unbrushed, unpomatumed, unadulterated sortspurer
than are there now: for, like the red aborigines, the white
and brown sorts are fast disappearing! Poor fellows! that
very night they witnessed the entrance of what would
become
their ruin!
Unused to the glory of polished candlesticks, and cut and
frizzled papers, all eyes momentarily gazed upon the stage
in silent wonder! In the next instant, and with one
consent
,
burst such a hurrah, as cracked the ears of the
groundlings
yea!
shook the glass in the windows! It did seem
the very walls would be split! Nor was it a mere hurrah;
for many an Indian fighter was present that night; and these
sent out such yells and war cries as made one
instinctively
clap his hand to his head to ascertain if the scalp
was safe!
Following the uproar came the modest buzz of individual
wonderments and critiques, such as:Look at that yallur
one, Joe!Most powerful shiney them are!Ain't
them are red things rity-dity poseys?Law! no Dick,
them's paper fixins!Well, I never?I say, Jake,
ain't them danglins up there like Carltin's ole woman's
curtins!Pick my flint!Darn my legginsits
powerful
big-buggy!How'd them lite so quick?Dipt
in tarpentinedon't you smell it? But in the midst
appeared
descending, the rival societies, each by separate
stairs: each headed by a Professor; and entering
simultaneously
each at oppposite parts of the stage! And when
all were seated, the Faculty in the centre, and the students
right and left, the smallest next and the largest at the
extremities
;
all in new suits of store cloth, and with
appropriate
badges gracefully inserted through button holes, and
waving triumphantly from their arms also; all in starched
collars and black neck ribbons; and all in female slippers,
and so altered as to pass for malesthe yells of greeting
were absolutely terrific!
Professor Harwood was now seen shaking the cow bell:
but though its mellow tinkle was inaudible, the fiddles and
triangles, seeing the pendulum motion, knew what was
needed: and hence they essayed to strike up Hail
Columbia
!
Still nothing of a tune could be heard; although
from the bewildering activity of
bows
and
elbows
, it was
manifest something nice was doing; till by dint of sight in
some, and bawlings out of Silence! by others, the
audience
in the pit became quiescent. In the interm, we of the
orchestra began to have more room: for most of the rabble
near the fiddlers, especially near Dan, the Primo, had got
hints to make room, in the form of hits, some in the stomach,
some in the face and eyes, and some under the lugsall of
course naturally required by the laws of motion and
melody
!
Indeed, it was plain enough that there was more
danger in standing so near good fiddlers than folks had ever
imagined! And, therefore, our uninvited soon compressed
into one corner; and from a sincere wish not to incommode
the music! And thus, by the kindness of Dan, whose
wink and smile were now understood and his mode of
fixin it, I enjoyed my windsor chair in ampler space; at
least while tunes were
executed
.
For this kindness, and because our executioners were so
essential to the exhibition, we shall hand them down in
history
they
shall be immortalized!
Dan Scrape, the fiddle primo, was by far the prince of
the New Purchase catgut and horsehair men. Like
Paganini
,
he could play on
one
string, if not an entire tune, yet
parts of nearly two dozen tuneshis whole stock! And
like that maestro, he played without notes, and with endless
variations and embellishments! Ay! and he played no
worse on one shift or position than another! Still, Dan
differed from the Italian in some things; for instance, he
held his fiddle against his breast, (perhaps out of
affection
,)
and his bow in the middle, and like a cart-whip;
things enabling him, however, the more effectually to flog
his instrument when rebellious; and the afflicted creature
would scream right out in agony! Indeed his Scremonah
bore marks of premature old ageits finger-board being
indented
with little pits, and its stomach, (vulgarly, in the East,
the belly,) was frightfully incrusted with rosin and other
gummy things, till it looked as dark and care-worn as
Methusaleh
!
Dan was, truly, no niggard of rosum, for he
greased, as he termed it, between his tunes every time!
and then at his first few vigorous jerks, fell a shower of
dust on the agitated bosom of his instrument, calling out in
vain for mercy under the cruel punishment!
Dan's main difference from Paganini was in using his
left hand to bow. And yet this better enabled him to make
room; for persons going to the left for safety, met the
accidental
hits where lest expected,like Ehud, who not
noticing
the left hand of Shamgar, got what English bullies
call his gruel, from the wrong quarter!
Let us not, however, do Dan injustice. He certainly
did, out of benevolence, administer some wilful and hard
blows, and yet keep an unconscious phiz; but when Dan
was fairly possessed with the spirit of fiddling, he never
even dreamed he had an elbow! Then his arm was all
elbow! The way it jumped up and down! and darted
back and forth!the velocity was too dizzy to look at!
But then, if a spectator valued his eyes, let him stand clear
of the bow's end!not the point, that was always safe
enough on the stringsbut the heel or slide end, which
never visiting the fiddle, was ever flourishing about almost
invisible, with reckless indifference and the force of a
bullet
!
In truth, Dan always fiddled like a race-horse; and
if he got one bar's start, I defy any body to have ever
over-taken
him! But some favourite tunes he played like a
tornado
;
such as the Irish Washerwoman,and above all,
that satanic rondo, the D. among the T's. And I know
this is not exaggeration; for once on my asking Hunting
Shirt Andy, who was a good judge, what he thought of
Dan's playing, he unhesitating declared that Dan Scrape
played the fiddle like the very devil!
The second fiddle was a pupil of Dan's. And the
master
had evidently taken great pains with hisfinger-board,
it being crossed with white paint to guide the pupil's
fingers
,
who still usually hit wide of the mark in his haste to
overtake his teacher! He is called second fiddle, not
because
he did alto or tenor, but because he was usually
behind
the first fiddle in time; nay, he was sometimes so
utterly lost, that Dan would tell him to stop, and start in
when the tune kim round agin!
Some may think these defects made discords; but then
this was compensated by the two fiddles never being tuned
alike, accuracy of stop being thus rendered less important;
and above all, because the exquisite triangle completely
obliterated, filled up, and jingled into one all mistakes,
vacancies
,
and discords!
I shall only further remark, that the professor of the
triangle
was actually
self-taught!
and yet he could outjingle
any thing of the sort I ever heard, even if aided by the
cymbals and musical bells!
But what of the third fiddle?
Let Dan answer, who, after the execution of Hail
Columbia
,
thus whispered me:Tim Scratch know'd better
nor to come! he's not sick no howit's all possum!
He's
no fiddler! I kin out fiddle him if he lives for ever and a
day longerand plays on Sundays!
And so it was: and neither Mr. Carlton nor any other
man who values reputation ought to play with Dan Scrape.
The Reverend Principal Clarence now arose, and in
pumps and silk stockings advanced and made something
like the following address:
Ladies and gentlemen(a kind of
don't-gentleman-me-look
of certain hearers, made him add)and my
respected
fellow-citizens, we rejoice to meet so large an
assembly and so full of good spirits, come to attend our first
exhibition. It is natural you should be here: it is your
own school, and these are your own sons and relatives, who
are now to show before you their improvement to-night.
We are here, fellow-citizens, to witness what Western
boys can do; and let me say, that while far from
perfection
,
our boys, if not embarrassed, will not disgrace our
wooden country. We say embarrassed; for any confusion
or noise accidentally made by our respected fellow citizens
present, in time of a speech or other exercise, will hinder
our unpractised speakers from doing themselves justice.
We depend, of course, on the honour of our hearers, not
giving any order on the subject, or making even a request,
as is often necessary in the East; because here, in the free
West, where all do as they please, Backwoodsmen
naturally
behave according to the maxims of good sense.
(Bust my rifle! if that ain't the truth, interrupted Ned,
we'll show 'em how to behave, Mr. Fakilty!)Just as
I said, stranger,resumed Clarenceand, therefore,
we shall say no more, but will instantly proceed with the
exercises.
This was ferociously clapped and stamped; and then the
exercises proceeded, the cow bell being duly rung, first for
the music to begin and then for it to cease. In the latter
case the bell owed its efficiency to Mr. Carlton, as Dan was
always more ready to begin than to finish a tune. And
hence, and as the orchestra was louder than the bell, we went
by sight; but Dan never could see the wag of the bell, till
Mr. C. gave him a hunch on the off-side; and then his
Scremonah
hushed up, like a cholicy child that had screeched
itself to sleep! Had Mr. Carlton been on the bow-side, he
must have poked Dan with a stick, or met something
tragical
;
but like the fox in sop, he had learned from the hits
of others.
It is unnecessary to detail the events of that memorable
night. All the students were applauded; and not a few
with the admixture of Indian yells, so like the savage-savage,
that the animals could, like the ass-lion, be detected only by
the skin! Certain speeches, too, political in their nature,
and admirably delivered, caused the audience to lose sight
of the exhibition, and hurrah for Jackson or Clay as on the
election ground. And these speakers, with one exception,
became politicians, and are even yet, most of them, figuring
before the world. The people generally behaved as Ned
Stanley, (our friend Rifle-Bust) promised, and as Western
folks always
do
behave, if one shows a disposition to
conciliate
and will employ a little innocent flattery; not that they
are deceived
by such, but that they take it as a sign of your
desiring to please and put them on honour.
Let, however, a self-complacent gentleman, full of city
importance and strut essay, in a dictatorial way, to manage
a free and wild assembly in the world of woods and prairies
and if he is not shut up in a manner that shall clean
wipe the conceit out of him, then is my opinion a mistake.
He may order a hackman, or a porter, or a quill-driver, or
a sawyerbut if he dare
order
freemen of the forests and
the meadows, they will ride him on a rail; and, in spite
of his stocks, brick houses, fine equipage, whiskers and
curled hair!
The speeches, excepting a few humourous ones, were
all original; and equal to the best in our schools and
colleges
concocted from the living and the dead. Generally
the young men of a New Purchase are superior to the
young gentlemen of old settlements, in both scholarship
and elocution; and for the following reasons:
1. The young men come to learning as a novelty. It is
opposite to the monotony of woods, cabins, pork, corn, and
axes. Hence nothing exceeds their interest and curiosity;
and it is long, under a judicious teacher, before the novelty
ceases; and afterwards the habit of hard studying supplies
the place.
2. The young men regard learning as the lever to
elevate
themor by which the New World may cope more
fairly with the Old. Hence, day and night, they work
vi et armis
at the machine; until they even get higher
than the young gentlemen who work lazily and feebly.
3. The young men have more energy than the young
gentlemen; and this directed by enthusiastic masters in
learning produces great results.
4. New Purchases have few temptations to idleness
and dissipation. Indeed, as war among the Spartans, so
Colleges there are to the young men recreations, and more
delightful than anything else.
5. Ten dollars a yearthe tuition feewas too hard
for our young men to obtain, lightly to be squandered.
And ten dollars with us would buy ten acres nearly; hence
they who value land as a great
earthly
good, spend not a
small farm once a year for the privilege of being idle.
Young gentlemen often waste two such a year on sugar
candy!
6. Young men are inquisitive like yankees; and hence,
they ask endless questions not contained in Parley-books.
And by this method of
torturing professors
, more is often
extracted than by
torturing nature
.
7. Young men out there are in more immediate contact
with professors; hence, if the professors be themselves
men
, the advantages of the old Roman way of education
may be combined with the modern ways.
We have seven more reasons, which, however, we shall
not inflict in the
First
edition; but to fortify the seven and
to conclude the exhibition, we shall present minute accounts
of two young men, who were among our stars. And as
these stars still shine, the one fixed, the other wandering,
in the political firmament, we may only designate them as
the George and the Henry.
George possessed not uncommon talents; unless
perseverance
be a talent, and that he did possess in so great a
degree as to make it a substitute for genius. He is our
fixed star. Many knew of his untiring patience and
plodding
diligence, and were impressed with a belief he would,
after all, make something; but none expected him to shine
forth to night a star of the first magnitude. Not only was
he great compared with himself, but with all others; and
his composition on the life, character, and writings of Cicero
was admirably written and most happily spoken. I was
myself amazed, fired, captivated, and even instructed; and,
after the exercises ended, I sought him, for he was one
of my favourites, and said:
Why George! you did nobly! surely that composition
cost you no small labour?
Thank you, Mr. Carlton. As to the piece(I have
no desire to pass for a genius)it did cost me thought and
labour
I carefully studied and re-wrote it thirty-six times
.
Vol. II.10
Well! that was one young
Man
. The other, Henry,
although never among my favourites, will even more
forcibly
sustain our reasons. In a pecuniary sense, he was a
poor boy even for the Purchase; and lived, in homely
phrase, from hand to mouth. Indeed the loss of a day's
job, made his
mouth
that day debtor for its food; and
hand
,
on the next occasion, did double duty. He was, however,
rich in expedient, and hesitated at no job, odd or even;
although, it is to be regretted, he did not sometimes refuse
employments not strictly honourable. And yet even
that
may be palliated. But no apology can ever atone for his
occasional ingratitude and even positive injury to
benefactors
,
when a few dollars were the price gained by his
desertion
of duty and honour.
No sooner, however, had the Seminary been organized,
than Henry determined to obtain a good education. He
had credit enough to procure some decent clothes and
necessary
books; but as five dollars, cash, and in advance,
were to be paid to our Treasurer, Henry was forced to look
for a few lucrative jobs; and hence, he one morning
presented
himself at my store and commenced:
Well, Mr. Carlton, I've got books and clothes; but
I've no silver to pay the session-billkin you give a feller
no job what will bring silver?
Really, Henry, I don't know that I can;but stay!
we've lost our cowwill you take half a dollar a day in
cash to look her up?
Ay! will I;when did she put out?what kind of
a crittur is she?which way, think she went? &c., &c.
Satisfied as far as possible in his inquiries, away went
the lad to the woods. At the end of two days he came
back, cowless, indeed, but after a painful search through
thickets, along creeks, and over hills; and during which,
he had camped out
alone
in the night. Our hero had thus
one dollar of the tuition fee.
About this time we had ceased from digging a well,
after finding no water at twenty-five feet; although we had
employed a great hazel-wizzard; and his rod had
repeatedly
turned down over the spot, and that so hard as to twist
off a little of the bark. Even the diviner was quite at a
loss to account for the failure; insisting yet the water
must be lower, as his rod never twisted so powerful
arnest if they want water
somewhere!
Now Henry was of the same opinion; and, therefore,
bringing Mr. Hum, the wizzard (or witch, there so called)
to me, the two prevailed on me to go only four feet lower
Henry undertaking the job at fifty cents per foot! I
had supposed the boy would have a comrade to work his
windlass; but no, down went Henry alone with the
necessary
implements; and after digging, and breaking, and prying,
and shovelling, up the ladder he came, let down his empty
bucket, descended, filled the bucket, reascended, wound up
his load, and so on, till he had cleared out his diggins!
And away he went again to work with hammer and sledge,
bar, spade, shovel, and bucket; till, within a week, our
well was four feet deeper and Henry two dollars richer!
But although water was somewhere, it had not risen in
our part of the world;the bottom of the pit was still as
dry and comfortable as an oven!
Our hero in similar ways procured the other two cash
dollars; and by the aid of some student's mastering in
private
several elementary studies, he was, at the opening of
the next session, matriculated as something more than a
Freshman. And now, while attending his regular studies,
he still by jobbing maintained his mouth and laid by a few
dollars for books and future tuition fees. He contrived
even to be appointed sub-deputy librarian of the Woodville
Library, adding thus to his information and funds; and, as
if all this were not enough, he one day waited on Mr.
Clarence to ask if the school-laws would permit him to
study law and remain a student!
Study law!Henry?said Clarence.
Yes, sir; lawyer Cravings will find me books; and
thinks in a year or two I can plead before magistrates. If
it is not against the laws
Why, certainly we have no law against that; such a
case was never imagined as probable or possible. Do,
however, not neglect your regular college studies, and then,
it is nobody's business what else you may study or learn.
Our young
man
, sure enough, went to work at the law,
Hooser-fashion indeed, and still attended well to his
regular
studies; and in two weeks before the exhibition, he did
actually defend and win a cause before Squire Snab, and
against and from the redoubtable lawyer Cravings himself
and, with the contingent fee, he paid our treasurer the
tuition price of the next term!
Very good, young
gentlemen!
laugh at all this if you
please. But had you heard Henry, ranking now about
Sophomore, deliver at the exhibition, his Speech on Man,
you would have offered, as is usual in here, a price for it,
in view of your Senior Speech! Come! I will bet you
two dozen racoon skins against a pair of kid gloves, or
even a pot of cold cream, that if you
wrote
your
own
speech,
when you were graduated,
it was not as good as his!
CHAPTER LIII.
Such a noise arose,
As the shrounds make at sea in a stiff tempest;
As loud, and to as many tunes; hats, cloaks,
(Doublets, I think,) flew up;and had their faces
Been loose, this day they had been lost. Such joy
I never saw before.
Some
may wish to know how our Faculty spent vacations
in the woods. As to Clarence, in term time, he preached
twice on Sabbath, and sometimes oftener; beside,
lectures
in the week, and the like,but, in vacations, he
commonly
did
more
. This very vacation, he once walked five
miles in the rain; preached an hour and a half in the open
air; and then walked back the same distance to
Glenville's
new cabin, on the river. Our preacher was, what
is called a laborious minister: and yet his ecclesiastical
stipend, and that in trade, averaged only fifty dollars per
annum! yea! he has even been without a morsel of food
in his house, or a stick of wood for a fireand, in a cold
winter day, lay thus sick and deserted!
Clarence, however, would laugh a little: but, then, for
this
, Carlton was usually to blame. Hence, we do hope
the brethren, when reading this work, will be careful to
condemn the right personand that, not too severely; as
the author, a somewhat ubiquitous man, has had the
pleasure
of hearing Bishops, Priests, and Deacons, as well as
the inferior ministers, preachers, and exhorters, do
secular
laughing, beside making merry with friends, according
to the Scriptures.
Thus our Faculty, in vacations, did often, what classical
people do elsewherenothing! Sometimes, they did next
to nothingsmoking! and very often they did
cutting-up
!
And this last consists in craking nuts and jokes
racing one another, and slamming doorsin upsetting
chairs, and even kicking up carpets! Great wisdom,
however, and art and tact, and gentlemanly feeling, are
requisite for the cut-up; and specially in knowing where
and when to cease: and, of all men, to do the thing right,
Harwood, Clarence, Glenville, and Carlton were just
the dandy! If the affair is not done
up
to the point
it is teasing; if
beyond
it is horse play; but if in
medio
tutissimi
it is the most tickling and exhilatory!better
to provoke laughter than all the jest-books in existence.
The cut-ups were usually in wet weather.
In dry times, our literati strolled into the forests; where
mineralogy, botany, and natural history, suggested by dark
masses of rough rocks, or curious stones and shells, never
before handled by moderns; or by enormous wild flowers,
with cups large enough to hold two thimbles-full of dew;
or by a startled snake, ringing his warning under prostrate
trunks on or near which the learned stood; or, by crackling
brush and whirling leaves, where shone a streak of
bounding
wolf or glancing deerbecame recreations detaining
our friends till dinner was deferred until tea, and tea until
supper, when all were devoured as one! Perhaps the
mind never so marched towards the west, as once when
Clarence
and Harwood, and several visiting literati, were seen
by the Author, all in a line, knee-deep and wading towards
the occidental sun, through the fresh-fallen leaves; and
thus discussing,at one time, the Greek Tragedians,at
another, the Calculus and the Analytical Geometry! It
was the only time the Author ever witnessed the Grand
Abstraction embodied and embattled! And he feels elated
as the White Man who talked(in Judge Hall's Works)
to the very Indian whose great-paternal grandfather had
actually heard of the man whose father had seen the
skeleton
of a Gopher!
Often, too, would I seduce the Faculty into a hunt, by
quoting the Greek of Xenophon, where Cyrus the Elder
inflames his comrades, by descriptions of wild boars that
rushed on the hunter's spear like warriors in battle, and
of deer that leaped  oh! how high! But this
vacation
,
I proposed a party, to visit and explore a cave just
discovered by a hunter in pursuit of a fox, that darted
down a sink-hole and disappeared, in an opening among
some rocks.
In any
village
is it difficult, but especially in a
New-Purchase
one, to keep such intention secret. Soon, then,
was it bruited through Woodville, that Carlton was making
up a party for the cave; when further invitation was
useless
,
our main art now being to keep out some, whose
room was better than their company. And this must be
done without seeming to interfere with people's liberty of
going where they liked. The prevention was partly
accomplished
by fixing on no definite day; and deferring,
till some became weary of waiting and left town, or so
engaged that going would then be impossible. Some,
also, were specially asked; but not before it had been
ascertained that small chance existed of their obtaining
horses. This was the case with the Doolittles; who, as we
rode by the morning of the expedition, answered
somebody's
[37]
[37]
This was young Capers Smileal; who was aware, I fear, how
the matter was. He would do well in here among his relations the
Smootheys and Glibs.
expressions of regret that we should be deprived
of the pleasure of their company, withWell! thank
you all the same for the invitenext time we'll look up
nags and critters a smart chance quicker!
Unexpectedly, one fine morning, the rising sun shedding
horizontals of light and shade over our village, were
revealed
one dozen horses at Carlton's rack, and about an
equal number in other places, accoutred and accoutring
(passively);and, therefore, shortly after sun up where
we could see him, a report was spread that Carlton's party
was going to the cave to-day. But rumour was not long
requisite to advertise; since every man, woman, boy, girl,
and child of the party became, about 8 o'clock, A. M., a
notifier, while our cavalcade dashed through the village,
talking, cantering, whipping, joking, spurring, laughing!
while some screamed, come on, thare, behind! and
some, not so blame fast, thar', in front! and others in
piteous accents, La! if I ain't dropt my ridicul'!
Awh! stop! won't you?This darn'd ole guth's
a-bustin'! Oh! it was a glorious hubbub!
Alas! how dignity forgot decorum that delicious
morning
!
Even our literati, the teachers of proprieties and all
that, even they lost sight of Lord Chesterfield! Why,
reader! they laughed outright like the vulgar! They rode
with one foot only in a stirrup, and let the other dangle!
They jumped down to pick up Polly Logrul's bag as had
her hankichif in! And morethey pelted the girls at a
distance with acorns, beech-nuts, and horse-chesnuts!
switched Hoosier-dandies' horses, to make them kick-up!
rear! run! and what not! And if the grave folks behaved
sowhat did the others?
Ah! dear Precise! does happiness consist in skin-tight
garments? in a hat or bonnet stuck to the pate in a style?
in tying one's limbs to the dull earth by straps under boots?
in moving with a graceful and pointed toe, and fingers
curved and adjusted, and neck arched in magazine fashion?
and in riding horses with trained gaitin smirking, and
simpering, and lisping, by rule? If so: go not to a New
Purchase! Above all, go not with the natives to explore a
cave! Depend on ityou will break your straps! your
corset-string, male or female! and derange your curls!
Solemnlyit will spoil your
looks!
those, at least, your
milliner, and tailor, and perfumer gave you! But if no
regard for
your
makers' reputations deter youI tell you
it will break yournecks!
One may ride a trained horse, handsomely caparisoned,
on macadamised ways, and sit perpendicular and
graceful
,
while the beast does his theatrical starts and plunges
at certain secret pulls, touches, and words: but put the
same rider on the mischievous, unbroken, wild crittur
of the woods, moving in a compound of all gaits, and
starting
,
plunging, kicking, and biting extemporaneously; and
on a saddle that does not fit, and with a girth that will
break; and this in a gully road, a snaggy ravine, an
impeded
trace, or a tangled and pathless woods;and then
if the rider forget not dignity, and grace, and rules, adieu
to his seat! and maybe adieu to whatever brains nature,
or, more likely, Phrenology may have given him!
Situations
occur in both the moral and the natural worlds,
where a man becomes a law unto himselfand such are
often in the west. But this is digression.
Our party was to consist of one dozen adults;(children
are never counted out there, but go, not as shadowsthey
are mere accretions)yet spite of the effort to be exclusive,
our select company swelled to nearly thirty! And this
before
we set out! and then so great was the excitement
produced
,
that some who had abandoned the intention of going,
suddenly resumed it; so, that just after our entering the
woods, a clatter of hoofs and uproar of voices and leaves
were close in the rear! and there was a handsome
addition
to the cave party of some dozen more! Among others,
was a hunting crony of mine, Domore: and behind on his
horse he carried two of the Doolittles! Other horses had
duplex riders too; and when such all got into Indian
file, nothing could be seen except legs on the ground
kicking
10*
dry leaves, and legs in the air kicking horse sides
that being answered instantly by a very venomous switching
of horse tails, and an occasional and extra performance of
horse heels.
Perhaps the increased company was also owing to this:
several affianced lovers were of the party; and rumour,
with more of romance than reality, had said, that more than
two couples were to be married in the cave under ground!
Oh! what a temptationa Hoosier wedding in a new-found
cave! But the sternness of truth forbids; yet the
Talemaquers
must not steal this idea: when I write fiction I
shall make a story out of it myself.
Seven miles from Woodville we reached the cabin of the
hunter, who had discovered the cave. Here we got
ample
directions; not, indeed, from the male hunterhe was
absent
but
from Mrs. Hunter. These are here condensed
for the guidance of the reader, in case he may want to visit
the cave for curiosity or consumption.
DIRECTIONS OF MRS. HUNTER.
Well, stranjurs, I warn't never at that are cave; but I
often heern him tell on it; and I allows I kin a sort a pint
out the course ne'er on about as well as Bill himself kin.
Now, look hereyou must put off ahind the cabin down
the branch till you amost about come to ole Fire-Skin's
trace(an Indian once trading there)and thare a kind a
take off a sort a so like(pointing S. S. West)and that'll
bring you to Hickory Ridge; whare you must keep down
like, but a sort a leetle barin up, till you strike B'ar
Waller
(a
creek)and thare keep rite even on strate ahead
till you gits to Rock-Fordand some wher strate ayond is
near about whare Bill fust seed the wolf or fox, I
disremember
which on 'em 'twasbut no odds no howonly
foller on thare, a turning though left; and a leetle ayond
is the sink holes:and 'twas one on 'em the varmint tuk
intoI dont't know the hole, but it is a powerful big one,
and about as round as a sugar kittle.
In the party were folks that had killed turkeys on
Hickory
;
fought bruins on Bear Wallow; hunted deer around
Rock Ford; yet had we not fortunately encountered Bill
himself, near Fire-Skin's trace, and received directions a
little different, we should, indeed have found the sink holes
but not the cave.
That
was in a sink by itself, half a mile
from the others, in size less than the least, and without
any shape whatevera place none save a fox or a hunter
could ever have found!
But that place, by Bill's directions, was reached. And
now the nature of the next operation being better
understood
,
our exploring party became
small
if not
select
. Some
ten feet down, after
scratching
through briars and bushes,
we espied a rat hole, or to make the most of it, an opening
thirty inches long by eighteen wide; excepting where
sharp points of rock projected and made the aperture an
inch or two less. And this hole was the veritable door of
the cavern! This was manifest from the worn trace of some
kind of beasts; but mainly from Domore's report, who
crawled in backward, and in five minutes crawled out
head foremost, sayingHe backed in a rite smart chance,
yet arter a while he finded he could a kinder sorter stand
upand then he kim out to sartify the kumpine.
Immediately commenced a metaphorical backing out:
most of the ladies declared at once they never
would
crawl
into such a place! Some also refused out of cowardice;
and some were
bound
to refuse by tight corslets and other
bandages. Yet some half dozen, and among them Mrs.
Clarence and Mrs. Carlton, (who usually kept together,)
defying natural and conventional objections, said they would
follow the preacher, as he could exorcise foul spirits;
[38]
[38]
That dirty work is better done now by his Holiness.
and as to other inhabitants, they would leave them to
Domore
and the other brave hunters with us. Some
gentlemen
that wished to go in, had to remain with the recusant
ladies: and some hardy bucks, with rifles, preferred hunting
an hour or two to crawlin on all fours under the airth like
darn'd brute critturs! But this was Possumthese
latter feared to be cut out, and intended to stay above
ground and improve the time in sparking.
One affianced pair were so determined on the descent,
and so resisted all dehortations, that some of the
hide-bound
were tempted to go along with us, under a suspicion that
the lovers, if they went into the cave two, would return
one: curiosity being nearly as strong as corsets!but not
quite.
To all, however, it was strange
poor
Polly Logrul
obstinately
refused to go down; although her sweatheart was
making ready to do so, and her rival, Peggy Ketchim, was
to be of the crawling party! And when all knew Polly was
neither nice nor timid; and would not hesitate to seize a
wolf natural by the ears! But, reader, I was in the secret:
Polly was too large for the aperture! Hog
[39]
[39]
Used here technicallynot vulgarly.
and hominy
had enlarged her physics till poor Polly, who had hitherto
triumphed in her size, now wished herself a more etherial
sprite: for I accidentally saw her, when she supposed all
at a distance, standing near the cave door, and convincing
herself by a total blocking of the aperture by a part only
of her form, that Peggy Ketchim would have Jesseah!
in what unseen part of the underworld, that day, all to
herself
!
At length all was ready. Then we formed in Indian file,
faces outward and backs towards the entrance, and began
slowly to retrograde from the sun-light. Domore
led
the
rear;
then came the braves; then backed in Professor
Harwood, then Mr. Carlton, his wife following
before
him,
and then Principal Clarence, with wife ditto: and then
What then? How did the young ladies and gentlemen
come down?
I could not see beyond Mr. Clarence. It was arranged,
however, that the ladies should come in a line in front of
Mrs. Clarence, and the young gentlemen bring up the van
like going up and down stairs in monuments and steeples
to the east. Doubtless all backed in judiciously, as we
heard no complaints: although there was incessant
laughter
,
screeching, squealing, and the like; and an occasional
exclamation, asYou, Joe!Awh! now Sam, let me
be!
Go awayI don't want none o' your help!
Take that now!which last was followed by a hard
slap on somebody's face, and instantly answered by
Darn it Peg! if you ain't a bustur!
The entrance was the grand difficulty; for on squeezing
down a few yards, the rocks went down like irregular
steps, and our heads began gradually to rise, till by our
torches were seen the rocks above ascending in a similar
way: and in about fifty feet from the aperture we could
stand erect and look round on a vast cavern, widening in
every direction. Here the rear awaited the centre, and
then both, the van; and then all the torches being lighted,
we could see more distinctly this
terra incognita
.
Deep fissures were apparent in the rocks below, into
which one might have fallen in the dark; but we met no
accident, and continued now our advance to the Grand
Saloon, or as Bill had called it, the biggerest cave whare
he couldn't see the top like. On reaching the entry of
this room, we clambered down some rough projecting rocks;
and thence passing along two abreast for fifteen yards, we
all stood safe in the Saloon itself. Here nothing was
remarkable
but the size. It was an apartment about eighty
feet long and from fifteen to forty wide, the height varying
from twenty to sixty feetalthough in some places we
could not discern any roof.
Near one end, however, was a rock not unlike a pulpit,
[40]
[40]
The author is aware of indistinctness herebut that is owing to
the amazing variety in pulpits themselves.
about four feet high and ascended by natural steps and
encircled
by a stony balustrade. The immediate
consecration
was proposed to our lovers. The gentleman, a
store-keeper
of Woodville, readily assented; but the mistress, a
pretty and interesting young lady, positively declared
she was determined never to marry any where, but to die
an old maidsure sign of course, that the day was
fixed; for girls make no such silly and desperate speeches
till either mature years arrive or the marriage is secretly
arranged. When rallied on this point, she took the other
tack and said, if she
did
marry, it should be above the
earth; for she didn't believe a marriage under it was legal;
and for her part, when she could find a fellow worth
having
,
she intended to adhere to him till death!
Well!said Peggy Ketchim,`I'd jist as leef
marry
the man I lov'd down here as notlooking tender at
Jesse, Miss Logrul's beau. Jesse, however, would not
take, being yet vexed at the slap severely done to his face
on the crawl-way; but he very ungallantly replied:
Well, darn it, if I wouldn't like the joke too, if Miss
Logrul had ony kim down
Poll Logrul!(dixit Peggy)what's the use a her
tryin to go through
life
with a feller, whom she couldn't
squeeze into a cave.
Here were plainly symptoms of a squall, which it was
expedient to overwhelm with a storm; hence I proposed
to try the effect of a unanimous and vigorous hurraw!
and to ascertain if the party outside could hear our
shouting
.
This was agreed; and then at the signal we let it
out!and oh! the uproar! inconceivable before,
indescribable
now! And the effect so different from noises in the
world!in a few moments hundreds of bats, hitherto
pertinaciously
adhesive to the rocks, took wing, and flying,
with no discretion, they dashed in panic against our very
faces and open mouths, and speedily extinguished more
than half our torches. Many ladies would have fainted,
and most would have screamed; but ours, knowing that
noise
had brought the evil, remained quiet; and hence the
bats soon withdrew to their clinging, and our torches were
relighted; and
Hark!what's that!?
What?
Listen!
We did, and heard an indistinct and peculiar noise
now like whiningnow like growlingand then it seemed
a pit-pat sound like padded feet! and it then died away, and
we were left to our speculations.
Huh! haw!its them blasted fellers outside a trying to
sker the gals down here.
Who knows if it ain't Bill's fox?
'Spose it was Bill's wolfhey?
At this ingenious suggestion, the ladies all in unaffected
alarm, proposed an immediate retreat. Yet Domore and
Jesse and half a dozen other chaps, said they did want
most powerful bad jist to see into the next room a little
down like, afore goin back; and hence the ladies kindly
agreed to wait in the saloon, with a guard for their return.
The explorers, then, set off; and for a time were heard
their footsteps and merry voices, till all were hushed in the
distance; and we in silence remained striving to catch yet
some faint soundwhen forth on a sudden came the burst
of terrific screams and outcries from the exploring party!
and that soon followed by the noise of feet coming back
quicker by far than they had gone away! And then into
the saloon jumped and tumbled the whole party, a few
laughing and jeering, but most bawling outa Ba'r! a
Ba'r!!
Our ladies, of course, added at first a scream; and there
was some involuntary adhering to husbands' and lovers'
arms; a little earnest entreaty to get out instantly; and
then a rushing towards the egress of the cave, and then a
rushing back, as darkness in that direction became visible,
and bats' wings flapped again into faces; yet in no long
time order was restored, and we listened to the following
account from Domore.
Well! I tell you what naburs! if I warn't about as
most powerful near a treadin on a darn black varmint of a
ba'r, as most folks ever was I allow. You see, as we a
kind a kim to that tother long hole, says I to Jess, Jess
says I, you jist take this here light of mine here, and I'll
go fust a head and feel along till we git's to that 'are room
Bill tells on, whare he seed a crik a runnin across tother
end, says I. Well, so Jess he takes the light and we kim
to whare you a kinder sorter go down a leetle, and I was
je-e-st
agoin so(action)to put down one leg this a way
so, a holdin on so(clinging to the pulpit)above like,
and I sees the rock b'low a most powerful black and dark,
and I thinks as maybe it mought be a deep hole;and
with that says I to Jess, Jess says I, tote along that light a
yournand then I holds it down this a way(using his
torch)whare I was goin to step, and darn my leggins if
the hole didn't seem a movinin and a movinin, till all of a
quick up sprouted a ba'r's head! and his eyes a sort a starin
so(imitating)rite slam smack on mine! Well Jess he
seed him too, and the way he let out his squawk was a
screecher I tell you! And then all them tother fellers
what was ahind, darn em if they didn't squeel as if they
was skulp'd!and put out and make tracks for this here
preachers' room! But you see, I've fit ba'r afore and I
know'd this one warnt agoin to fiteand I seed him a
put-tin
off afore I kim awayand if I'd had one of them chaps
rifles above ground, why you see if we wouldn't a cooked
ba'r meat down here to day thar's no snakes.
But Domore, suppose the bear had made battle?
WellMr. Carltin, 'spose he haddo you see this?
drawing from his jacket a very savage looking scalping
knife.
Yes! yes!Domoreand I would not have asked
you, if I had known you had your knife.
Well, you see, Mr. Carltin, I don't mean no 'fence
but that a sorter shows you don't know all about the woods
yitalbeit you're a powerful feller with the rifle; a hunter
doesen't go into timber without his knife, and never no
how into sich like caves and holes as this here one.
Fears had now abated; and the ladies professed great
confidence in my friend Domore's skill and bravery; still,
it was voted to retire immediately
into
the world, and our
line of retreat was as follows.
1. Nearly all the males, headed by Jesse, who, wishing
to show his spunk and retrieve the disgrace of his
screecher
,
led the van, now in front.
2. All the females.
3. The Faculty and Mr. Carlton.
4. And lastly, Domore as rear guard.
Without memorable accident our van in due time gained
the cave-door and crawled out head foremost; then, aided
by the upper party collected around at the unexpected
egress, they helped out the female incumbents; and then,
amid united congratulations and derisions, we, the last
division were ushered slowly once more into ordinary life.
But where's Domore our rear guard?
Oh! I hear him, or something else, pushing outhe
makes powerful little
head
way tho'maybe he's draggin
a ba'rhe's mighty fussy with something and very
onactive.
By this time our whole party had come around the
aperture
and were with great interest eyeing the spot to greet our
herowhencould it be!the hole was suddenly blocked
up!
Goodness! Mr. Carlton,was it the bear?
Oh! nonono! dear reader, it was the full disk of
Domore's tow-linen posterior inexpressibles! For with
proper regard of self-defence, and yet with this peculiar
breach
of etiquette, he was coming out of the aperture wrong
end foremost!
Aye-yah! you may hold up your fans, and so forth: but
fans themselves would have joined in the universal,
uncontrollable
,
ungenteel, and almost unendable laughter, that for
the first and the last and the only time since its creation,
startled and shook the grim old trees that day! Laughter
like that occurs only once in a life time! And this is said
deliberately, and to enable the judicious critics to remark
The author on page so and so is again guilty of
something
like laughing at his own stories.
Well,said Domore, when, at long last, he made his
apology,well, I know'd it warnt the best manners to
back out like; and it warnt powerful easy ither; but you
see it a sort a couldn't be helped; for, says I to meself,
down thare, 'spose, says I, the darn'd b'ar, or some sich
ugly varmint, was to kim agin a feller, what would be the
use of kickin at 'im? And so I jist sticked my torch in a
hole, and drawed out my knife, and kim out as you see, and
ready to give it to any varmint what mought kim ahind
me.
This was voted satisfactory; and Domore was cheered
as the lion of the New Purchase; showing, too, that the
race of the Putnams is not extinct.
Our pic-nicery was now ready; and we began to
regale
ourselves with keen appetites, when a few drops of
water made us think some one was playing a prank; but
alas! noit was rain! downright rain. And now if I had
the pen of a ready writer, I might tell
how
quick the
eatables
were desertedknives, cups, plates, cloths, all stuffed
and crammed into saddle-bagsshawls pitched on, and off,
toobonnets tied under chinshorses saddledmounted
and we away, away, over Rock Fordup and down
Hickory Ridgeon Fire-Skin's traceand once more
snug and spongy behind Bill's cabin.
Bill and his wife pressed us to stay all night,a
hunter's
heart being always bigger than his cabin,but we all
refused except Domore: and he stayed, not to avoid the
rain, but to talk over the cave affair and the bear scrape.
We took a fresh start, and scampered on fast as ever to
escape now the coming darkness: and in process of time
reached Woodville, a sad reverse of the gay and dry party
of the morning! Yet how we looked none could tell, for it
was then a coal black night; but judging by our own plight,
when standing by the kitchen fire, our whole party must have
been a remarkably shivering and absorporific compound of
mud and water!
Upper class and aristocratic gowns, frocks, hats and
broad cloth and silk in general, had encountered melancholy
accidents; but none so serious as were met by two bran
new second rate Leghorns, ambitiously sported for the first
time to-day by two of our tip-top young ladies. These
big-buggeries were not only soaked and stained with water
and dirt of divers colors, but even torn by briars and
branches: and this utter ruin and loss retarded our
civilization
a full year! it being all that time before the articles
were replaced, and none others presuming to lead our
fashions in this respect except the two pretty, but rather
vain Misses Ladybook.
CHAPTER LIV.
But ye that suffer; who have felt
The destiny of earth,
That death, with shadowy hand hath dealt
Rebuke amid your mirth;
To you this tribute of a
word
,
When other sounds have fled,
Will come like lov'd tones, faintly heard
The memory of the dead.
Mellen
.
Our
family was usually very harmonious: yet the
surface
of our quiescence was occasionally ruffled. For
instance
,
Mr. Carlton believed that Miss Elizabeth Carlton,
now nearly four years old, if she
did
spell, ought to do it
by sounds of the letters: Aunt Kitty insisted it ought to
be in the march of mind wayby pictures of things. And
Aunt Kitty carried the day, affirming that the baby could
learn to spell in six days!Mr. Carlton not caring
whether
she spelled or not, provided she had plenty of air and
sunshine, and played all the time with a kitten or a doll.
But when he obstinately persisted that the little one could
not ever learn to
spell
by pictures, and must do it by
the sounds of separate letters, away flounced Aunt Kitty
after a caricature book; and then flouncing back she said
with a voice of triumph:
There, Mr. Carlton, spell her any where.
Well, dearee, what does
c-o-w
spell?covering at
the same time the figure with the hand.
Cow, said the baby in an instant.
There! Mr. Carltonnow sir!
dixit
Aunt Kitty.
How do you know, dearee, that it spells cow?said
Mr. C.
I sees thelegs!replied baby.
Aunt Kitty put out; while echo maliciously repeated
There! Mr. Carltonnow sir!
Dear one! that was true learning Aunt Kitty gave
you daily from the Word of God. She did, indeed, by her
living voice, teach in figures about heaven! even as the
blessed word itself. And it was to that heaven, dearest!
you went not many months after; when death so strangely
quenched the light of those sweetly soft blue eyes!
Parents! have you children in heaven? The author
hopes he has five. And shall we not strive to rejoin the
loved ones, where day-dreams are no more; and all is
glorious, satisfying, unending reality?
CHAPTER LV.
There was a sound of revelry by night,
And Belgium's capital had gathered then
Her beauty and her chivalry; and bright
The lamps shone o'er fair women and brave men:
A thousand hearts beat happily; and when
Music arose with its voluptuous swell,
Soft eyes looked love to eyes which spake again,
And all went merry as a
marriage
bell
But hush! hark! a deep sound strikes like a rising knell?
We
shall conclude this year with a wedding.
Who is to be married?
John Glenville.
That old bachelor?
The same.
To whom?
Pardon me, I may not tell. The courtship, however,
had been speedy. On
his
side an affair of the heartnot
I fear, on
hers
. He certainly married not for
money;
she
but she is in her forest grave nowand let her memory,
like her body, rot. Happy if
another
at the wedding had
diedthat
one
can
never
die so peaceful now! The
serpents
of our woods were fatalyet they gave warning
thou wast and art a more deadly snakeand
warned
not!
Traitor! the world will not understand this; and may
deem it fictionthou wilt understand and sooner or later
tremble! God save thee, however, the horrors of a death
bed!
The society of Woodville was not yet refined as it might
have been; although steps for the sublimating process had
been taken by our gentry, and with some success. Such
attempts, however, by many, were regarded with jealousy,
and by not a few with feelings of rancorous hostility.
Sometimes, too, every attempt had failed, and that owing
to the galls: for these insisted on mixing with our
parties
,
and also on taking seats at table; or if not present, it
was owning to management, and not a tame surrender of
the helpers' rights. Not unfrequently had an embryo lady,
or one emerging from the grub and hoosiery form, been
compelled by the discontent of her help, who had detected
the artifice of her mistress, to soothe the young lady by
saying before the company:
Betty, child, I do wish you would sit down and a sort
a pour out, while I run out and bake the rest of the cakes.
Once a very select party of prospective gentry had
assembled
at Mrs. Roughsmoothe's, and had become
talkative
and lively; when the gall-help, wishing to increase
the fun, suddenly descended from the loft, into our
company
,
and paraded over the room in her lady's husband's
brother's
old buckskin breeches!
To aid the polishing of society, after long discussions
among the ladies, not those only connected with the bride
elect, but others intimate with our several families, it was
determined to have a sample wedding. To this, indeed,
the gentlemen all had objections; but the
weaker
sex, as
is always in such affairs the case, proved the
stronger:
and so away to work went all hands for the grand display.
And, now, the truth of political economy became
manifest
,
that extravagance benefits mechanics, storekeepers,
and the like; for we sold broadcloth, and trimmings, and
silks, and satinsin short, all things for wedding-suits,
dresses and decorations; and every mantua-maker, milliner,
tailor, and shoemaker was in immediate requisition.
Superfine
flour, too, was neededthe best teas and coffees
the best loaf sugarthe best, in a word, of all persons and
things from the beginning to the end of Woodville. Nay,
many articles were required from the Ohio River. Hence,
so many messages were sent, and so many packages
brought, by waggoners and travellers, to and from, that
long before the eventful day, half the State was advertised
of the coming ceremony. Indeed, not a few at that time
came into Woodville from adjoining counties: which
accounts
for the curious external celebration that
accompanied
the internal one.
Nor were only selling and buying promoted by the affair
it increased borrowing and lending. Many, who allowed
they would be asked, had agreed to lend one another
suitable apparel, from caps and curls upwards, to shoes and
stockings downwards: and our bride's folks, not having
domestic means enough, had borrowed far and wide every
article in the shape of china, proper and mock, and silver,
German and real. Consequently, the whole settlement
was more or less interested in our wedding: and it was
clear as sunshine, we should have as fine a gathering of
hoosiers, in all stages of refinement, both inside and
outside
the house, as the heart of man could desire.
The wedding week had now arrived; and notes,
prepared
in the best style, were sent round by Wooley Ben, the
negro barber, hired as waiter and to discharge a dozen
other offices and duties. Additional waiters would have been
employed; but this was the only respectable
black
nigger
in town: and as to hiring a native, white, red, or
brown, you might as easily have hired the Governor.
Indeed
,
nobody had, either little enough brains, or sufficient
temerity, to make the experiment:a hundred to one, we
should have either been
jawed
or, more likely, got our own
jaws
slapped.
Well, the grand evening came at last; and about
sun-down
the wedding guests arrived, and were formally
ushered
into the parlour; which, for the first, saw ladies enter
without bonnets, and
with
headssome profusely, but
many tastefullydecorated with flowers and curls,
artificial
and real. And never had that room been so full of
seats, varying from sofa to stool, or of so many yards of
silk, thread-lace, and bobinette! It had the honour of
sustaining the first fashionable jam ever known in the
Purchase
!
Across the entry, was a dining room; which was now
devoted to the supper-table, and its fixins. The supper
differed, however, in no important point from an eastern
affairexcept, it was twice as abundant. But our
furniture
was very different. Things went, indeed, by usual
names; yet the
plate
and the plates were very unlike
modern articles: and they were different from themselves!
All were antique vases, goblets, spoons, and so forth, the
relics of broken and by-gone sets; and gathered, not
merely from all parts of the Union, but from France,
England
,
Nova-Scotia, Scotland, and Wales. China and
silver
representatives were on that table, of all the grand
old-fashioned
dignity once pertaining to the ancestry of the
Woodville grandees; and whose pretensions to gentility
thus shone forth in a dumb show! Not a bit of plate,
pretended or genuine, but what had been borrowed, and
several pieces had even been sent voluntarily; so that
Ned, one of the company without, very properly said, in
his vernacular:
Well! bust my rifle, if I allowed thare was sich a
powerful
heap of silver and chanery in these here diggins! I
tell you what, Domore! wouldn't them wot-you-callums
buy up ne'er about all Uncle Sam's land in these parts?
It has been said, the incipient attempts to sublimate and
crystalize society, were viewed by many with enmity:
and hence the male clarifiers had opposed any grand
doings
now, as the whole might irritate, excite great
prejudice
,
and even
retard
the desired improvements. That
such fears were not groundless, will appear in the sequel:
but an episode is here necessary.
In many places of the Far West, in those days, was
prevalent a custom derived from the Canadians, called
Chevrarai
;
or, as pronounced by us in the Purchase, and
spelled by Mr. Nonpareil Primer, our College printer
Shver-ree
. And that looks and sounds as much like the
thing as its echo. Hence we shall follow nature, or Mr.
Primer, (who was very natural in spelling,) and call the
thing Shver-ree. The Shver-reeing was done by a
collection
of all physical bodies capable of emitting sounds from
a sugar kettle to a horse-shoe; and from the hoarsest bass
of the toughest hoosier, to the most acute treble of the
tenderest hoosierineand all, at a signal, let off at once
under the windows, and in the very doors, of the marriage
house.
Commonly fun
only
was designed; and the serenaders
good humouredly retired after a dram of some alcoholic
liquor. Still, a little frolicsome mischief was sometimes
added. For instance, the Shver-ree-ers would insist on
seeing the bridegroom; and the moment he appeared, he
would be transported to their shoulders, and paraded round
a few hundred yards, and in the very centre of the music;
after which, he would be restored to his anxious bride, and
Vol. II.11
the revellers, giving three cheers, would retire. The
bridegroom would, indeed, sometimes be kept too long; as
was the case with the young store-keeper, who had been
of our cave party: for, the Shver-ree folks, having, by a
very cunning stratagem, caught this bridegroom, contrived
to carry him away, and keep him locked up in the
jury-room
of the Court-house till near day-break, when he was
liberated! And, all this, without his being able to identify
one of his persecutors!
But the Shver-ree was used, also, to annoy any
unpopular
person or family. And, then, not even double or
quadruple drams could purchase peace. The moment
always chosen to begin the concert, was when the parties
stood before the parson. Then the power of his voice,
the patience of the groom, and the nerves of the bride,
were all fairly tested. The solemnization was as publicly,
and loudly announced as by the roar of artillery at royal
celebrations. The art within was to elude the vigilance
of the party without: in which attempt, however, to the
best of my recollection, the party within was always
preeminently
unsuccessfulit being not possible that any
movement could escape a dozen practised eyes and ears
watching for signs, and usually
aided
by treachery within
the house.
Well, to-night, with all experience against us, and
although
notified, by ominous sounds of rehearsal, that the
musicians were ready, we tried the usual ways of eluding
such as dropping the curtains, appointing sentinels for
doors and crevices, and specially by keeping up no small
noise ourselves, laughing, talking, and screaming, up to the
instant when Mr. Clarence suddenly rose and met the
bridal party, entering from an adjoining apartment.
Without
delay, he began with the notice, that, by virtue of a
license in his hand, he appeared to unite in marriage the
parties named therein, viz.John Glenville, of Guzzleton,
and Evelina B, of B: and, as the profoundest
stillness yet prevailed without, we began to exchange
smiles of triumph, that, for once, Argus had been beguiled.
Even the preacher proceeded, with unwonted confidence,
and said,
pro formul
if any one present knows reason
why the parties ought not to be united in the bands of
wedlock, let such an one now
speak
. If any body
inside answered, the voice was unheard in the horrid din
from without, that interrupted and replied to the Reverend
Gentleman's inquisitorial formula.
What the din resembled, the reader, if poetic and fond
of music, may imagine, when we run over the instruments
of that extra-transcendental quavering, quivering, shivering
and roaring uproar!viz. two corn baskets full of
cow-bells
tied to saplings;a score and a half of frying pans
beat with mush sticks;two and thirty Dutch oven and
skillet lids clashed as cymbals;fifty-three horse shoes,
played as triangles;ten large wash-tubs and seven small
barrels drummed with fists and corn-cobs;one hundred
and ninety-five quills, prepared and blown as clarionets;
forty-three tin-whistles and baby-trumpets, blown till they
all cracked;two small and one large military drums with
six fifes, blown on D in alt., or
thereabouts;
add imitations
of scalp and war cries;and inhuman yells, screams,
shrieks and hisses, of the most eminent vocalists!
The
human
performers were estimated from two hundred
and fifty to three hundred and fifty! there being about two
hundred extra volunteers from other counties:the whole
mammoth-rabble-rouse being got up to do special dishonour
to dd 'ristocraticul and powerful grand big-bug doins!
There were also
super
-human vocalists!--of these
directly
.
Temperance had advocates ready to
shoot
, but not be
shot
for her, in our party; hence when the ceremony was
supposed to be ended, by the parson's being seen kissing the
wife, out started the two groomsmen and several volunteers
with buckets, pitchers, and cups, to
molify
the drinking
part of the serenaders. But when the customary doses
were administered, not only did the musicians not retire
with the complimentary cheers, but remained and calling
for big-bug winefit for gentlemen! and letting off at
each repetition of the demand peals of shver-ree; till
finding
after all no wine forthcoming, they manifested
symptoms
of more serious riot and abuse.
This awakened an angry spirit in the bridal party, and
threats from without were answered by menace from
within
,
while inquiries were made of our host what arms could
be furnished for the defence of the castle. At this instant
a window sash behind the Miss Ladybooks was cautiously
raised from without, and before I could step thither to hold
down the sash, in leaped a musiciana
four
footed swine,
some six months of age, and weighing some fifty pounds!
Master Grunter had evidently entered unwillingly: and
although
in his descent he availed himself of one lady's
shoulder, and another's lap, he trod elastically as an
essenced
exquisite, and scarcely deranged a collar or soiled
a frock!
The feat was cheered by piggy's associates; and the
more, as our ladies in avoiding the unclean gentleman, had
sprung upon chairs, sofas, and even tables, where their
alarmed countenances were visible above the curtains to
the bipedalic hogs without. Young Squeal, however,
behaved
himself just like a pig in a parlourhe sneaked with
a tight-twisted tail and a vulgar grunt under the grand
bridal sofa: and thence, I forget how, he was
unceremoniously
turned out among his former friends, where he felt
himself more at home.
Virginia and Kentucky blood was now approaching the
boiling point; and a rush was made by some of us towards
the doorbut there Dr. Sylvan had, with great wisdom,
already taken post to prevent if possible, either ingress or
egress. Still the door could not be kept wholly closed;
and we thus caught glimpses of performers mounted on the
backs of performersthe
super
-human ones being large
four-footed hogs, which were held on human backs, by
their front legs, advanced hugging fashion, each side a
human neck! As the
rational
creatures capered up and
down with their riders, those
irrational
ones, in terror and
fierce indignation, were sending forth those long, woful,
keen, nerve-shaking appeals for release, that we in
simplicity
had till now imagined masterly imitations of some
squeaking even better than piggy himself! Nothing like
the true hog after all!
Meanwhile, two thus doing piggy-back in reverse order,
had gradually advanced to the door; when the horse-pig
essayed to force a wider aperture, intending to incline
forward
and thus allow the mounted animal to leap into the
entry, and thence into the dining room to upset and
demolish
the table with its goodies and silver. But no sooner
had the hog-ridden serenader thrust his hand into the
aperture
than Dr. S. aided by Harwood, forced the door against
the member, and so held the gentleman that he cried out
not wholly unlike Mr. Snout but a moment before on his
back, yet now let fall! It is wonderful how hard a fellow
can pull when his hand is thus caught! Why, spite of all
the force against him, he did jerk his hand outand left
nothing behind except the skin of a thumb with a nail
attached
!a
scalp for the victors!
At the instant word came to the author, that his darling
little girl had gone into fits from fright! And when I
beheld
the blood gushing from her nose, and her face pale
and death-like* * *yes, I rushed out bare-headed
and weaponless, followed by a few bold friends with lights,
Dr. S. having left the door to attend to the babe! Our design
was to catch some in the act of riot, and make them answer
at a legal tribunal. Aware of this, the rabble fled as our
lights advanced: but soon rallying in a dark corner, they
began to salute us with groans, hisses and stones--and
then rose the cry, Knock 'em down!drag the big-bug
yankees through the creek! And so our situation was
momentarily becoming more and more critical, when a
well-known voice thus arose in our behalf:
Bust my rifle!if I'm goin to stand by and see that
ither, I say, or my name's not Ned Stanleyno! no! I
tell'd you to put off a hour ago, when me and Domore
kim up, arter they give us the fust dram. Them folks ain't
to my idee, no how, but they've got rites as well as the
best on usand I ain't agoin for to see 'em trampled on no
furthur no how. I say Bob Carltin's a powerful clever
feller, arter all, albeit he's thick with big-bugsand, bust
my rifle, if any man knocks him down to-night, or drags
him in the water, till he tries hisself fust on Ned Stanley!
Them's my idees, Ned,responded the well known
voice of Domore,and it tain't us Woodill fellers no
how, what's carried it so furits them darn'd blasted chaps
from the Licks and Nobs. And I'm not goin ither to go
agin a man what was with us in Bill's caveand if that
leetle gal a hissin is gone in a fit, I'm most powerful
teetotal
sorry I had any thing to do with the fun any how.
Come, come, darn my leggins, let's make ourselves skerse
come, fellers, let's be off!
Mobs, like other flocks and herds, follow their leaders
by instinct. After all Virgil's poetical great man's power
to smoothe down popular swells, this night showed he could
have done nothing that way in the Purchase
[41]
[41]
Unless he had a cart whip like a priestand drove
tame
jackasses
ours were
wild
ones.
For though
the grave and reverend Clarence was with us, no
subsidence
in the boiling sea was visible, till Ned and Domore
rose in their majesty; and while two or more
schoolmasters
were abroad in the land that night, the quelling of riot
and preventing of violence and bloodshed, was by radical
leaders destitute of learning and gravity, but full of
courage
,
manly feeling and muscular power!
Man
may be known from books, but
men
and
boys
are
different matters; and the phases of the genus Homo in
the Purchase were then different from the phases
elsewhere
.
Even a genuine Hoosier mob is totally unlike a
scum mob in an Atlantic city: generosity may be found in
the former,
none
in the latter. The first loves rather the
fun
, the latter, the
plunder and blood
, of a riot. Fear of
the military scatters the city mob, an appeal to manliness
disperses the Hoosier one.
Our retreat was left, of course, unimpeded; nor was the
annoyance renewed. Yet the spirit of frolic was up; and
aided by the spirit of the still. Hence, away rolled the
tumult
to the forest; where the prowling panther and other
denizens of the lairs, were appalled by a tempest of sounds,
such as never before had disturbed the solemnities of the
grand old shades. And the orgies of the drunken-god
were celebrated as in primitive times, when Orpheus was
hired to lead home the raving wives and daughters of his
townsmen.
Next day, Dr. Sylvan and others dreading future results
of the Shver-ree made inquisition for leading rioters. None,
of course, could be identified, save the man without the
thumb-skin; and he, taking the alarm, became so skerse
as never again to be seen in Woodville. For a while,
therefore, the Shver-ree was disused; but by degrees it
was again introduced, and when we left the Purchase it
was there as popular and noisy as ever.
SIXTH YEAR.
CHAPTER LVI.
Mar
. Alas my lord I have but killed a
Fly!
Tit
. But how, if that fly had a father and mother?
How would he hang his slender gilded wings,
And buzz lamenting doings in the air?
Poor harmless fly!
That with his pretty buzzing melody,
Came here to make us merry
And thou hast killed him!
By
a recent charter of our college, it was appointed that
the Faculty should oversee the Students; the Trustees,
oversee the Faculty; the Board of Visitors, the Trustees;
and the Legislature the Visitors;the people in general
engaging to oversee the Legislature, and the people of
Woodville, the entire whole! The cause of education was,
then, well
overseen!
And yet our circle was as vicious as
that of the Church Militant and Insultant; which keeps its
antagonist foundations in perpetual somersettop and
bottom
being always at bottom and topand yet so
circumferential
as to be alike destitute of top or bottom, or bottom
or topand bound by its infallibility to roll on for ever in its
absurdities!
And now was to be found the
rara avis
the white crow
a good President. Distant and learned gentlemen had
answered our first inquiries, by an earnest recommendation
of Mr. Clarence; but so widely did that personage differ in
opinion, that he suppressed a letter written to himself
urging
him by all means to be a candidate. He plead his
youth; and his wish to remain in a subordinate post to
perfect himself in his favourite studies,languages, history,
and mathematics. He insisted, also that good professors
were as important as a good president; and with a little
allowable
vanity, he added, if he should make so good a
president
,
as his friends' partiality led them to suppose, it
would be quite a loss to deprive the college of so good a
professor! He, therefore, did,(unwisely as
Mr. Carlton
thinks)decline a nomination, and earnestly
entreat
the
Board to look out for
an older man!
Professor Harwood then suggested the Reverend
Constant
Bloduplex, D. D., of Wheelabout; and a committee
was appointed to open a correspondence with that
gentleman
.
But as his reply was not received till after my
return
from collecting certain debts, &c., we shall for the
present
,
take our reader on an excursion.
Fortunately, for the last forty-eight hours were
collecting
reverend gentlemen at Woodville to form a
travelling
party towards the south to a famous council, of which
Clarence was also a member; and I was furnished with
the most agreeable associates. Regalists may sneer at
dissenting and republican clergy; but I repeat, what can
never
be repeated too often, that such clergy, when
evangelical
and intelligent, aside from a
spice
of sectarianism
(and a man without a
spice
is no
man
, but a sneaking
time-server
)are
the most benevolent, instructive, entertaining,
cheerful, and
liberal
of men. They condense and
concentrate
most qualities, too, essential to good fellowship. Ay!
they are usually men of the greatest courage. And when
and where
duty
calls, whether into jeopardy of property,
or character, or ease, or limb, or life itself, no men more
fearlessly or resolutely encounter it. A good man fears
Godand that absorbs or counteracts all other fears.
Exceptions occur; yet of intelligent and learned folks
the true clergy can and do, most easily and naturally,
accommodate
themselves to opposite lives; and, not to
acquire
fame or money or power, or do penancebut to do
good. Influence is, indeed, thus acquired, yet not more
11*
than is right and desirable. Far from my beloved land be
that hour, when her own republican ministers shall have no
literary, moral and spiritual influence! God shield her
from the Egyptian darkness threatening from yonder
ominous cloud rising above the distant horizonshaped not
like a man's
hand
, and pregnant with refreshing rains, but
like a man's
toe
portending contempt, spurning, overthrow
and subjugation. But I smell faggots!and I court not
martyrdomand none can tell what Hugheous attempts may
next be made nor when! Sneer on! antipuritan! if
you
fear not for us, it is high time, as Cato told Csar in the
Roman Senate, we should fear for ourselves!
Bow
your
own base neckwe will
never
bow ours!
Our party was increased at every ferry and cross path
till it numbered twenty-two; enough to hold meeting on
horseback. The time was mid Spring; and the old woods
were glorying in the sylvan splendours of new dresses and
decorations. The sun was, indeed, ardent, and rejoicing
like one to run a race; but then the dense foliage spread a
screen over the pathway, while the balmy breath of
zephyrs, rich with perfume of wild flower and blossom,
fanned our faces and sported with the forest leaf and spray.
Beauteous birds and tribes of unseen animals and insects
from every branch, and every bushy lair or cavern, were
pouring forth choral symphonies of praise.
Was it wonderful, then, that Christians going to a
spiritual
congress, should be unable to restrain hymns of praise?
Out upon rationalism, or any pseudo-ism that makes men
dumb
likelikebeasts? No; insects? No;
these in the woods God planted and nurtured for ages are
vocal. Like what then? Like a German or a French
Atheist.
Hymns then, as we rode, were sung; and, with heart
and voice, in the solemn and joyous words of king David.
God was felt to be there! His grand temple was around
us! How like sons and daughters going home rejoicing!
How like the Church in the wilderness! We have before
said, what in religion begins in poetry often ends in prose;
and so would be the result now, if
fanaticism
should get
up a
system
of protracted and locomotive meetings on
horse-back
!
The poetry belongs only to the accidental occurrence.
Arrived in due time at the place of the council, I was
induced
to remain a day and witness its proceedings. The
weather being favourable, and no cabin being large enough
to accommodate the hundreds of spectators, many of whom
had come more than a hundred miles, it was arranged to
hold the sessions in the woods. Among the accommodations
was a large wagon body placed on suitable timbers, to serve
for a pulpit; and here, during the religious exercises, were
seated all the clerical membersmaking with their aggregate
weight a half a ton of theologians, if not of divinity. Here,
also, during the secular business, was seated the President,
and supported by his scribes on the right and left.
But I was soon hurried from this Nice council, by the
stress of worldly business; and that accomplished, it was
necessary for me to return alone to Woodville, and by a
route then very rarely taken by any person, and never
before
nor since by myself.
On my first day, I was fortunately overtaken by a large
company, unlike my religious friends, and yet by no means
unacceptable comrades in the vast wilderness I had just
entered. It was a Surveyor and his assistants, going to
run some line, or lay out some road. In genuine Western
style they welcomed me not only to ride with them, but to
participate their dough-biscuits and jerked venison. We
beguiled the way, of course, with anecdote and story of
adventures and mishaps till tired of telling and hearing;
and then, recreation came on wings, in the shape of
horse-flies
!
The tame or civilized horse-fly of the Atlantic States, is
well enough as to size; and, when half starved, can bite
reasonably well;but the ill-bred, barbarian horse-fly, or
rather flies, for the sorts are countless,can't
they
bite!
Like all hoosiery and woolverine things, they are
regardless
of dignities; and hence suck blood from the rider as
well as the horse! They even make no distinction
between
merchants
[42]
[42]
Perhaps they regard such as
shop-keepers
.
and men! or between the brethren and
the misters!! Very probably they would suck blood
from the President of the United States!the greatest of
all earthly potentates(in breeches, of course!) Ay!
from Uncle Sam, and Brother Jonathan:although their
blood so much excels that of the Russian Bear, or John
Bull! Nothing like the
Great-Grand-North-American-Re-publican
Horse-Fly!
Except the Great-Grand Humbugs, and other buzzing fooleries,
of our country.
ten of them can kill a dandy!
Now, a
man
can endure a single fly: but a cloud
pitching at once on him and his horse, requires some
patience
and no small activity and diligence. The best
antidote
is a duck's bill. This, however, is inconvenient to
administer, as it requires a cessation of motion and a
recumbent
posture. Indeed, to be fully benefitted, one must lie
down, as we saw a cow to-day at a squatter's cabin, and
permit, as she did, six active ducks and one drake, to
traverse the whole body, and gobble up and down the flies
at the instant of alighting, and make repeated successful
snaps at them on the wing!
The best defensive armour would doubtless be to have
one's whole skin tanned(leatherwise):and next, are
boots and leggins, as far as they go: but summer coat and
inexpressibles are as good asnothing. Some advantage
is found by inserting tops of broken bushes into every
crevice
of the horse-trappings; into the hat-band and button
holes; and at the tops of boots and leggins: yet, with all
these, will be lots of work both for the man's hands and
the horse's tail.
I do wish Mrs. Trollope had been with us to-day. If
she
had seen nothing to amuse and interest her, I am
certain
we
shouldalthough we had enough as it was. To a
student of nature, how interesting our appearanceall
bestuck
with bushesa grove on horse-back! whence issued
human hands slapping hard, as a Catholic self-inflicting
penance! Then the madness of a bushman missing a fly!
and his triumph and malicious joy in mashing one! The
horses, now stopping with one side to stamp and bite!
now springing away, to rub off the torment in the bushes!
and then their tails!it did seem they would, sooner or
later, switch and swing loose, and fall off!
The grand exhibition, however, was by a poor brute of
a horse, with a short tail and a tipsy rider. As to the tail,
that had been partly amputated by some barbarian(there
being a fashion in horse-tails as in whiskers)and, added
to that inhumanity, was the inconsiderate behaviour of a
silly colt, into whose
mouth
the tail-stump had fallenthe
hair being all eaten away by the said colt, till the denuded
thing stuck out six inches only, like a wooden article of
the same name, glued to a toy-horse, to show which end
is not the head. Think!to be with such a make-believe
tail, in a flock of horse-flies! And the drunken rider had
arranged no grove of bush-tops!!
Had the flies infested the human beast! but these
sagacious
flocks knew what was for their health, and, therefore,
stuck
to the horse; thus causing the animal to endure a
thousand fold for the sin of his master. In vain, then, did he
wag that stump of a naked tail! in vain halt to stamp, bite,
and kick! in vain vibrate his hide and the tip of the ears, till
he seemed all over like a church full of moving fans!
there stuck the flies! At every halt, the rider kicked and
basted; but never moved the horse away till convinced
halting, and biting, and kicking could not dislodge his foes,
and then he moved to be surebut not ahead. He did it
sideways, till he reached some tree or bush, along which
he rubbed, crushing and sweeping off the flies; and often,
very much to our inward delight, barking the skin from his
vile master's legs!
At last, the flies, understanding the brevity of the tail,
and the defenceless state of the nag, attacked his quarters,
head and rear, covering, but not protecting, his entire
flanks! What could he do? He reiterated his stamp
bitevibration; he sidled against trees, rubbing and
kicking
;
and then, under the combined attacks of whip, heels
and flies, seizing the bit between his teeth, he, on a
sudden
,
darted away as if borne on wings himself! Pencil of
Hogarth! paint that sight! Set forth the trembling
spicebushes
divided, broken, crushed, by a tornado borne on
horse-heels! Draw that nag emerging, ever and anon,
from thickets of thorn and briar!a human leg, despoiled
of leggin, rising horizontal, this side now, now that, and
instinctively
,
like the scales of justice, keeping the
equilibrium
of a body recumbent, with head nodding and jerking,
amid the dishevelled and raggy mane of a horse-neck!
hands therein clenched! Depict the flocks of surviving
flies hanging over in the air, and waiting for the race to
end! And, oh! last, yet not least, though so very little,
do that tail!
It had played its part before; now it was worked with
more than one-horse power! It spun round as on a patent
gudgeon! It multiplied itselfnow, a dozen tailsnow,
no tail at all!nothing appearing, save a white
circumference
,
a streak made by the bone where the article had
been amputated! Its motion was no longer to switch
away flies; it was instinctive, and to steer by: yet
whether
it failed as a helm, or steered as was designed, on
our galloping up, there was the fly-bitten pony, wallowing
pig-like in a delicious stream of spring water; and the
rider wading out about ankle deep, and dripping! And so
ends about the
tail
.
The tender-hearted will rejoice to know, however, that
upon this poetical justice administered by the horse, the
master, now a cold-water man and sobered, kept a whole
wilderness of bushes about both; and, that he abstained,
that day at least, from his whiskey bottlepartly, I believe
though, because it was broken in the fall.
Shortly after this, I left the Surveyor's company, and,
pursuing a solitary trace, reached, late in the evening, my
lodging place; where I learned I had yet forty miles to
travel to reach Woodville.
Stranjer,said my hostit's a most powerful woody
country, and without no road, nor even blind trace worth
namingit being, a sort a kiver'd with ole leaves; and
thar's no cabin nearer nor King'sand that's more nor 15
miles. Howse'er, I'll set you over the river afore sun-up
and if you don't
miss
the trace, then you kin git to King's
for breakfust.
Almost devoured by flies, and then frightfully flea-bitten
in bed, my dreams were naturally fantastic; and I had
visions of howling wildernesses, tangled thickets, prowling
panthers, and great swollen fiery serpents. Woodsmen,
also, I knew had been lost in that unsettled region; and
even last summer two persons had wandered about three
days. Yet, I longed to be on my journey, and to know the
worst; and, with a hope my case would be different.
Beside
,
I had a secret ambition to appear well as a
woodsman
in Domore's and Ned's eyes; and I was aware Sylvan
would even think better of me, if I crossed such a
wilderness
alone. It was something of a task with such men.
Accordingly, by early dawn, I was ferried over, the
river, and sat in my saddle, while my host, standing in
his scow and ready to pole back, thus issued his final
directions
:
Ride strate up-bank whare you bethen keep spang
a-head, across the bottim, without no turn at all, and, in a
short quarter, you'll strike the d'sarted cabin. It's burnt
nowbut the logs are some on 'em a-layin' in a heap
that's whare the poor squatter was murdered and skulp'd
in the war time, by the Injins. Wellarter you git thare,
ride round to the west ind of the ole clerein, and you'll
find the trace, sich as it is, if it ain't kiveredand, if you
get once fair on itI sort a think you'll go safe enough to
King's.
That said, good byes were shouted; while the scow
swung from the shore, and my noble creature ascended the
bank; and we began to go a-head for the burnt cabin.
Some declination was, indeed, necessary to get round
unleapable
logs, impassable thickets, and the like; yet, prior
to such deviations, having placed myself in a line with
several
objects before and behind, I easily regained my
course, and, in a short time, came to the cabin ruins.
Here we paused an instant, to contemplate the sceneso
like what I had pictured in reading border tales! But,
haste and anxiety allowed only short delay, and I rode
quickly round to the west of the clearing; where, after a
narrow search along the edge of the forest I discerned the
only semblance of a trace; and, into this, dashing with
trembling confidence, I was soon hid in the shades of a true
wilderness.
However romantic such a wild may be in print, my
thoughts in the wilderness itself, were all concentrated on
one objectthe path. And long what seemed the path,
dim always and sometimes obliterated, as it led far away
into the gloom of impervious shades, now turning almost
back to skirt an impassable thicket, now tumbling almost
perpendicularly into a deep ravine, and now scaling its
opposite
side, then mounting a ridge, then circling a pond o
dark and dangerous looking water, and then vanishing for
a few moments as of necessity it passed through patches of
weeds and briarslong time this trace occupied all my
meditations and excited my intensest watchings and kept
me asking in a mental and often an audible voiceI
do
wonder, if this
is
the way? To which, as nobody else
replied
,
I would answer myselfWell, I guess it
must
be
if this is
not
, I'm sure I don't see any
other!
And then, as though poor Kate shared my anxiety, would
I say Come! Kate!cheer up, you shall soon have your
breakfastlet's hurry on to King's! When gaily tossing
her fine head, and shaking her flowing mane, she would
with her hoofs redouble the echoes; and away, away, with
thrilling hearts, we ever bounded onward and onward and
farther and farther into the solemn grandeur of those
primitive
wilds!
In some two hours the trace, owing to the nature of the
ground, became better defined and less interrupted; hence,
waxing confident we indulged in a colloquy,
self-congratulatory
and maybe self-laudatory, thus:
Well, we're safe after
all
, Kate, I
do
believe!wonder
what
Ned
will say?
hey?
To this Kate switched an answer with her magnificent
tail, and evinced increased eagerness to be going ahead;
and so with a real hurraw' my noble Kate?hurraw!
on my part, and an additional snort on hers, we were
streaking on at the rate now of seven miles to the hour!
And then, in about four hours from the burnt cabin, we
caught sight of King's cabin, crowning a mound on the far
side of a small stream.
Advancing to bespeak refreshments, I was met at the
door by a portly lady, who proved to be that King's wife;
and though no queen, was large enough for two queen
patterns
of the Victoria-Albert size.
Is this Mr. King's, ma'am?
Well, I allow so; but my ole man's from homehe's
went to a rasin two miles off
You keep public, don't you, Ma'am?
Well, I allow so; but King's tuk the bakun with him to
the rasin
Ay?can't I get something for my nag?
Well, I allow so; jist go round to yan crib, and git
what cawn you like.
This done, and Kate left to enjoy as much corn as was
wholesome, I entered the cabin and our conversation was
renewed.
Well, but Mrs. King, ain't you got nothing at all a
hungry fellow can eat?
StranjurI'm powerful sorrybut we're teetotally out
he tuk every bit of food with him
What's thatup there?
Law, bless you, stranjur! that's a piece of most
powerful
rusty flitchtain't fit for a dog to eat
Oh! ma'am, let's have itwhy I can eat your dog
himselfI'm
so
hungry.
He! ha!well you ain't proud like the Fakilty
big-bugs
across thar at Wood'ill, that's sarten. How I do wish
King hadn't a tuk the food! But you ain't in arnest about
the yaller flitch are you?
To be sure!clap on your skillet, Mrs. King!
WellI do sentimentally wish it was better like. Let's
see, here's a handful of meal in the bag arter alland I'd
a got it afore, only I allowed you was proud like. But I
see you're none of that 'are sort'spose I do the meal?
Thank you, ma'am! I know you would give me the
best if Mr. King hadn't gone to the raising.
The skillet was soon hot; and then received as many
slices as could lie in comfort on the bottom. The colour of
the dainty had been originally amber, the fat being
then
semi-transparent, as it was
mast
fed, i. e. fed on acorns
and beech nuts. Time, however, fatal to beauty, had
incrusted
the flitch with an oxide of wonderful thickness and
peculiar dirt colour, and turned its lovely amber
transparency
into a decided and opaque yellow. Something of the kind
I had often seen in cot-days; when, on being importunate
for buckwheat cakes in the kitchen, Betty often threatened
my face with the griddle-greaser!
Mrs. King had shaken her bag into a large wooden bowl;
and the deposit was, one pint of second chop meal,
minus
half a gill something else, and a few horse hairs; for, bags
in attending mill are used as saddles, and pommelled
between
inexpressibles and perspiring horsebacks. Water
then was poured into the compound; and the lady after
handling
the mixture
without gloves
, produced a handful
of good chicken-feed. Then the hissing flitch being
hastily
turned into a pewter plate with a damaged
circumference
,
the feed was splashed in, like mortar into chinking,
to be converted into corn bread. This transmigration over,
the bread was associated with the flitch on the cloudy
pewter
,
Mrs. King remarking that, her man had tuk the crokry
to the rasin; and then, after wiping each thumb on her
woollen petticoat, she invited me with the formula, Well
come! set up.
I was soon seated on my rickety stool at the board, or
rather
boards
, (as the table was of two such and a piece,)
and began to flourish my blade,the knife belonging to that
irascible class that had flown off the handle,and, also, I
began to look for its partner, the fork. But that had flown
off
with
the handle, for, said
she
He
tuk all thar knives
and forks but this poor bit of a thing, and that was left 'cos
it had no handle!but, Stranjur, continued she, jeest
lend me that a minit, and I'll git you a fork.
Out, then, darted Mrs. King; and soon returned
manufacturing
as she came a fork, and saying thus: Thar,
stranjur, this 'ere I split off a rail, and cut down a sort a so
to a pint, 'ill do for a fork better nor your fingersalbeit,
I'm powerful sorry for our poor fixins.
Thank you, ma'am! all the sameyou've a kind
heart; and that's meat and drink in this world of ours,
sometimes
.
Yet these and other speeches were continually
interrupted
by the rapid ingress of lumps of flitch and balls of bread.
I regret to record, however, that while I used my fork to
pin down the fat till its reduction to mouthfuls, I was
compelled
to eat, like a democrat, with my knife! I made,
indeed
,
some amends to a violated good-breeding, by sopping
my gravy with bread in my left hand,like a gentleman
eating
fish and other things, with a leaky silver fork. Singular!
how the extremes of refinement and hoosierism do meet!
Dialogue Continued
.
Well, I'm powerful rite down glad you kin eat sich
like food! what mought your name beif it's no offence!
Carlton, ma'am, I live in Woodville
Wellthat's what I suspish'nd. Ned Stanley was
out here last winter a huntin, and I heerd him tell on you
as how you was a powerful clever felleralbeit a
leetle
of
a big-bug. But
I'll
take your part arter thisand
King
shill too.
Oh! Mrs. King if we were all better acquainted with
one another, we'd all think better of our friends and
neighbours
.
But I must be offwhat's the damage?
Bless me! Mr. Carltin, I don't take nuthin for sich a
meal! Put up that puss, if you want to be friendsI'm
powerful sorry King's awaycall here next time, sir, and
I allow, you'll git somethin good enough for a white man.
Thank you! Mrs. King, thank you. Wellplease
give me directionsI'm not much of a woodsman.
Well, you're comin on. Howsever you've kim the
wust ind of the trace, and wont find no diffikilty till about
fifteen miles on at the next settlement, Ike Chuff'swhere
you mought foller a cow pathand so you'd better stop thar
and axe.
In due time, and after a hard ride of thirty miles from the
burnt cabin, we came in sight of Ike Chuffs clearing. As
the trace ran plain and broad round the fence and across a
small ravine, I was unwilling to waste time with needless
inquiries, and, therefore, followed the line of path with
undiminished
confidence.
The trace, indeed, narrowedit once or twice vanished
all that was no novelty; but at last we seemed to reach
the vanishing point, for now, after the last vanish, the path
never re-appeared! In place of the one, however, were
seen four! and those running in as many different directions
and evidently, like Gay's roadto no places at all! And so,
for the neglect of inquiring, Kate and I had been
judiciously
following a cow-path!
Why not steer by the sun?
That is easy enough, my friend, in a country where
there is a sun. I had, indeed, seen little of that Great
Shine all day; and for the last two hours nothing, a rain
having then commenced which lasted till our reaching
Woodville.
What
did
you do then?
Trusted to Kate to find the way back to Chuff's;as
we had hardly gone two miles astrayand that she did in
fifteen minutes.
What then?
You shall hear for yourselfHilloo! the house!
Wellhilloo! what's wantin!
The trace to WoodvilleI missed it just now.
Sorter allowed so, when I seed you take the cow-path
to the licks
Well, my friend, why didn't you hollow to me?
'Cos I allowed you mought a ax'd if you ain't a wood a
manand if you be, you know'd the way to the licks as
well as me.
Thank you, sir; will you show me now?
Take the path tother ind of the fence.
Neighbour Chuff's settlement differs, you see, in suavity
from King's. Still, the Hoosier's direction was right; and
with nothing more romantic than our
feed
in the morning,
we arrived pretty much used up to a late dinner in the
evening at Woodvillehaving done more than forty
wilderness
miles in about twelve hours! For the whole,
however
,
I was rewarded, when Dr. Sylvan that night called
at our house and said with an approving smile:
Pretty
well
done! pretty well
done!
After this I
think we may dubb you a backwoodsman.
CHAPTER LVII.
Ha! ha! ha! D'ye think I did not know you, Hal?
Dr. Sylvan's
visit was to announce the favourable
reply
of Dr. Bloduplex to the letter of the committee. But
the people were in a new tumult; and a petition to the
next Assembly was circulating for signatures, praying that
the Trustees be ordered to expel either Clarence or
Harwood
,
or both; and that while Bloduplex should be elected
as President, the professors should be taken each out of
different sects. For, reader, the two existing members of
the Faculty were both Rats; and Dr. Bloduplex was of
the same denomination! This, however, was
then
[43]
[43]
Learning and talents
now
are not necessary in teachers; for there
are
many first-rate teachers without. Owing to the iproved era.
the
natural result of circumstancesthat sect being twenty-five
years since pre-eminent in learning, talent and enterprise.
And this I am bound as a true historian to declare, although
Dr. Bloduplex and myself do not belong to the same sect!
an impartiality to be remembered to my credit hereafter.
I perceive we have thoughtlessly given a clue to the
sect meant. For when it is found by the reader what sect
twenty-five years ago, was pre-eminent in the respects
named, my secret so nicely kept is outhe has discovered
the Rats! But if such sect cannot be found, then among
the
fictitious
things of this book will, I fear, be placed our
worthy President, the Rev. Constant Bloduplex.
In this emergency, it occurred, that another petition in
aid apparently of the other, and yet subversive, by reducing
its principles to an absurdity, should be sent to the
Legislature
,
as the proper way for Hoosier to fight Hoosier.
Something must be done, because our magnates at the
Capitol would certainly essay something disastrous to the
college. Hence, the suggestion meeting Dr. Sylvan's
approbation
,
the framing of said petition was committed to
Mr. Carlton; when in a few days the following
able
paper
(hem)was submitted, corrected, approved, and adopted
by our friends:
To the Honorable the Representatives of  in General
Assembly convened at Timberopolis, this petition of the
People of Woodville and the New Purchase generally,
is respectfully submitted:
First, that the existing Faculty of
our
College be
requested
to resign before the election of a President, that
all denominations may have a fair and equal chance for
places:
Secondly, that, there being nine religious sects in our
state, and three of philosophers, viz:the Deistical, the
Atheistical, and the Fanny-wright-dale-owen-istical,three
members of Faculty be annually elected out of each and
every of these twelve sects and bodieseach set of three
to serve one month, till the year ends, and then to
recommence
with other sets of three, and so on till the end of
time.
Among many unanswerable reasons for this petition,
we urge only four:
1. It is the true Anti-federal Democratical and Pure
Republican course, founded on rotation; for it is useless
to assert that all have a right to become Professors, unless
it can be shown possible and practicable:
2. It will promote learning: for, when manifest that
every body, in turn, can be Professor, every body will go
to studying to get enough to last him at least a month:
3. It is said, confidently, by some sectarian leaders,
that if they were in, their sects would each send one
hundred
students to College! Hence, all sects doing the
sameas
all
will when
one
doesour College flourishes
at once with twelve hundred students!!
4. The amazing cheapness of the plan. It will cost
nothing, except travelling expenses! Your petitioners
have been repeatedly informed, that no Democratical
Republican
and patriotic Citizen will charge a dollar for his one
month's professional services!but that all will serve for
the honour! and hence our Transmontane Commonwealth
shall show to the Whole Admiring World, the noble sight
of the Greatest, Most Wonderful, Most Powerful Free
School System in the Universe!!!!
This petition, and reasons, are respectfully submitted,
and your petitionersall, at least, that acknowledge a
Supreme
Beingwill ever pray, &c.
This petition was copied by James Sylvan, the Doctor's
nephew; who, being a
talented
young man, the paper was
generally attributed to him. When circulated, it soon had
the proper number of signaturesa few signing with a full
understanding of its nature, and
not
a few believing it
auxiliary
to the other, and already signed by them! These
latter thought, if one petition would do good, two would do
more.
Sorry am I to say, both Ned and Domore signed both
papers! Yet, afterwards, Ned insisted, with the most
awful busts of his rifle! that he had signed the first
only to please his neighbours! and then ours, to
counteract
the other's evil tendency!! Ned had a little of the
Falstaff in himand Shakspeare drew from life.
Well, the petition was forwarded about Christmas: and
a waggish member, who affected to be a very Adams in
defence
of the right of petition, contrived to present our paper
before the appearance of its enemy. And the effect,
they
say, was such on the risibles of our grave and reverend
seigniors, that Insidias Cutswell, Esq., who had charge
of the other paper, did himself join heartily in the laugh,
(he always laughed if the
majority
indulged)and never
took the true people's-people's petition from his pocket!
In justice must it be said, that, while that petition had
been drawn up by himself
ad hoosierandum
, he was
secretly
glad to have it defeated. Still, he condoled with
the signers, by lamenting and condemning the unhappy
state of indecorum at the time too prevalent in the House,
which rendered it unadvisable to submit grave and
important
matters to their consideration!
Vol. II.12
CHAPTER LVIII.
In vain, alas! in vain, ye gallant few!
From rank to rank your vollied thunder flew!
Campbell
.
never did I hear
Such gallant chiding, for, besides the groves,
The skies, the fountains, every region near
Seem'd all one mutual cry!
This
autumn was remarkable for wild pigeons. The
mast
had failed elsewhere; while with us, the oak, the
beech, and all other nut trees, had never borne more
abundant
crops. The woods, therefore, teemed with hogs,
squirrels, and all other nut-crackers, that, like the primitive
men of poetry, preferred this acorn-life.
How many swine were slaughtered this fall, I never
learned: but, within six weeks, our upper and lower
regiments
of hunters, and simply by shooting occasionally
around their clearings, on counting, at the muster, their
squirrel scalps, found the sum more than 30,000!!
As to pigeons, the first large flocks attracted no unusual
notice: and, yet, were they mere scouting parties from the
grand army! For, within a week, that army began to
arrive, as though flocks had never before been seen! and
all the birds under the whole heavens, had been
congregated
into one company! Had the leaves of our trees all
been changed into birds, the number could have been no
greater!
With a friend, I stood in an open space in the woods,
two miles east of Woodville, from 10 o'clock A. M. to 3
o'clock, P. M.five hoursduring which, with scarcely
thirty seconds intermission, a stream of pigeons, about two
hundred yards wide, and averaging two layers, flowed
above us, and with the rapidity of thought! It was an
endless hurricane on wings, rushing innoxious, yet with
such an uproar as seemed to be prostrating the forests:
and the deep reverberating thunder, in the distant wilds,
seemed to announce the fall of their ponderous and ancient
trees! Never had I felt the awe and solemnity of sound
thus; even in beholding the wind-tempest pass over the
same wilds, bowing the submissive woods, and bearing
onward their wide tops, as if mown off with an angel's
scythe!
It will readily be thought, our hunters and
sportsmen
were in all places firing away at the living torrent:
and yet, with but small loss to the pigeons. Rifles are
useless in firing at very distant and flying troops; and we
had not more than a dozen Leather-stockings in the
Purchase
,
able to single out and kill a bird at a time.
Why not use shot-guns? What a question! Well
but why? Why, first and foremost, that toy could not
be found in twenty houses in the whole Purchase.
Secondly
,
our
men
could hardly be coaxed to use the thing,
both out of contempt, and, what may seem strange, out of a
little fear; for, as Ned said, the spiteful critter kick'd so
powerful. Beside, it is unfavourable to rifle-shooting to
acquire the dodge taught by a shot-gun. But, lastly, the
pigeons usually flew twenty yards above
our
treesand
that rendered the Mantons, or any best shot-guns, as
efficacious
nearly
asa quill and a slice of potato.
However, all the shot-guns and horse-pistols were sought
and fixed, so feverish became the excitement, and since there
were half-cut backwoodsmen enough, and some degenerate
natives to use them. But here was the next difficulty;
powder was plenty,yet, who had shot? In our store
was not a pound; and it was the same almost in the others.
Still, a few pounds were ferretted from lurking places, and
readily sold at thirty-seven and half cents for a scant
pound:whence was proved, that a pound of lead in
shot-shape
,
is not even as
heavy
as a pound of feathers!the
air-pump to the contrary notwithstanding.
With immense persuasion, Ned and Domore consented
to shoot horse-pistols: but they both utterly refused to
fire off store-shot. And, like some others, they
hammered
bullets into bars; which were then cut into cubes
and triangles, this being a sort a-shootin bullets, and no
inkuridjment to store-keepers to bring out their blasted
baby shot!
In justice to my own manhood, it must be told, I stooped
not to the shot concern till after several days' failure in
hitting with my rifle, a single bird, at 140 yards, and
moving
as near like the greased lightning as possible: nor
then, before the following accident showed there may be
danger in firing a rifle as well as a shot-gun. Satisfied
that the rifle must be fired now by the doctrine of chances,
and not of the sights; and that the chance with one
bullet was a slim chance, it seemed better to multiply
chances, and load with two balls instead of one. And yet
the spaces between the flying birds were as plentiful as
birds; and, into these spaces the two balls chanced to go
when they parted company, or, if they stuck together, it
was, after all, but one chance. Therefore, we at last
ventured
on
patching
the balls separately; and then, indeed,
the effect was considerably different; not, however, upon
the pigeons, but at my end of the gun: for, at the flash, I
was suddenly driven partly around, and with a tingling in
the fingers supporting the barrel, while about me, for
several
yards, lay the silver mounting and ornaments of my
rifle!
What was the matter?
The piece had burst; and the stock was shattered up
to the spot sustained by my left hand! and, yet, had I
received
no material injury! On the same day, and from
the same cause,(air intercepted between the patched
balls)another rifle burst; and, although the owner
remained
with its butt only in his hand, he too was unharmed
midst the scattered fragments of wood and iron. Ned's
remark about the accidents, was paradoxical, for he
Bust
his rifle, if he allowed a rifle would a-
busted
no how!
After this, I descended to the shot-gun. But, while I
took my station in the opening already named, and,
furnished
with two and a half theoretic pounds of different
sized shot, fired away till all was expended, I was
rewarded
with only two pigeonsthese being from a small
cloud that, by some accident, flew a few yards below the
tree-tops, and both killed at one fire.
One evening, shortly after sunset, Ned Stanley brought
a report into the village, that the pigeons were forming an
encampment for the night somewhere to the south-east.
And, not long after, this was confirmed by Domore, who
had surprised an out-post, nestling in the woods within a
mile and a half of Woodville.
Had a scout brought intelligence of a hostile Indian
band, our town could not have been more effectually roused
and speedily armed. And now, verily, shot-guns and shot
rose a thousand per cent.like caterpillars' eggs in the
mulberry fever: and every where
some
body met
any
body
and
every
body, legs and all, full tilt in search of the
article
!
Turkeys, sang, coon-skins, ven's'n-hams, and even
cash
(hoarded to buy land!)were offered for guns, pistols,
and shot!and, all round, could be seen and heard men
and boys hammering, rolling, and cutting shot! Indeed,
many intended to fire this extemporaneous shot out of
rifles! And when hunters, or even semi-hunters, can so
demean thesethe temptation and excitement must be
prodigious!
Some could not procure even rifles; and these persons,
by the aid of Vulcanus Allheart and his boys, had old pistol
and gun barrels hastily mounted on rude stocks, to be fired
in partnership, one holding the matchlock, and the other
touching
her
off with an ignited stick or cigar.
What was all this stir about? Why, for a
night
attack
on the Grand Roosting Encampment! For, since
the Purchase became a purchase, never, in the memory of
our oldest and most respectable squatters, had such an
occurrence
happened, as for the pigeons to roost so near
Woodville! Now, some had read in Ornithology, and
others had been told by people from Kentuckyoh! such
wonders about roosts and encampments! how pigeons
covered all the branches; and then perched on one
another
,
till the trees became living pyramids of feathers!
And how, then, all tumbled down and killed themselves,
till the ground was covered with dead pigeons, oh! as
much as two feet!like quails round the Israelitish camp!
Yes! and the pigeons slept so sound, and were so averse to
flying in the dark, that you could walk up and gather birds
from trees like wild-plums in a prairie! Ay! and the
farmers
used to camp near a roost, with droves of hogs;
which, (after the farmers had barrelled up enough birds for
winter,) were driven in every morning to be fattened on
dead pigeons!
Did
you
believe all that, Mr. Carlton?
WellI was but mortalbeside, every body said it
would be such a most mighty powerful smart chance to
get such a heap of pigeons! I did not, indeed, go as far
as some; for I never expected to find them two feet high,
already dead, and, maybe, picked and ready for the skillet.
Beside, I
wanted
to go, and who knows, says I to
myself
,
if there mightn't be some truth in the account after
all. Hence, after five minutes cogitation, I hurried down
after Clarence and Harwoodbut, mark it, reader, I was
met
by those learned gentlemen, hastening up to Carlton's
store, to consult on the same subject! For these persons,
living in the edge of the forest, knew well enough that the
pigeons were camping, from the thunderings, like the deep
and solemn mutter of an earthquake, (although the nearest
point of the camp proved nearly three miles distant,) and
hence, quite as excited and credulous as we small fry, they
were posting up town to join a party:
Which way? Which way? neighbours!
Coming up to your store,are you going down to
College
?
I wasdid you hear what Domore and Ned say?
Nobut, hark! don't you hear them?
What!is that the pigeons?
To be sure!Carlton, won't you go?
That's what I was coming down for
That's your sortagreed. Going to take a gun?
Noguess not: all Woodville is out with guns
pistols
riflesmatch-locksand
big keys, with touch-holes
filed inlet's only take things to carry back birds in.
Agreedthey say you can pick a barrel under a tree
what shall we take?
Bags?
Yesand a long string to tie them by the legs, and
carry back on a pole!
Ready now, Carlton?
Yesyesyes! let's keep on.
Well, stop at my house, said Clarence, and there
we'll fix a bag and some twine, and so lose no time.
All was done quick as a squirrel's jump. Then guided
by the sound, we put out, regardless of a course, and
unable
to discern objects dubious in the dim light of a waning
moon, and partly obscured by clouds. We were in Indian
file,now trotting, now running, and occasionally walking,
here stumbling over logsthere scrambling up and down
gulliesthen diving into sink-holesthen ripping through
briar swamps! The conversation was monosyllabic and
suggestive, performed with no little blowing and
palpitation
,
and broken abruptly by exclamation, thus:
Hark!
Ye-e-s!
Likeooh!thun-der!hey!
Ve-ry! Gotbag?
Ooh!yes! Youooh!gotstring?
Oho!
ouch!
no! he's got itooh!
What now? oho!
ouch!
bad briars here! &c. &c.
In about two miles, even this laconic dialect was
difficult
to use, being lost in the roar of pigeon-thunder
mingling
with which was heard, however, the artillery, the
outcries and shouts of our gallant village troops!
Yes! hark!they're pelting away! Come! come
on!
Get that
bag
readypull out those
strings
hurraw
!
And yet it was curiouswe had come to no outposts!
had caught no drowsy sentinel pigeons on their roosts!
What on earth made the thunder so late at night? How
could pigeons, packed on one another, and with heads
comfortably stuck under wings, keep up such an awful
noise? Was it snoring? Ay! maybe it was the noise of
pigeons tumbling down, and trees breaking
Hark! a storm rushes this way! How sudden the
moon is hid! Is that a cloud? Yes, reader, it was a
stormbut of pigeons rushing on countless wings! It was
a cloudbut of careering and feathered squadrons! The
moon was hidand by a world of startled birds!
In vain our search that night for pigeon bearing trees!
In vain our bag and three strings! We might have filled
a bolster with feathers; but no bird living or dead
burdened
either our sack or lines! The myriad hosts for miles
and miles were on their wings! and guns were flashing
away in hopeless vengeance and idle wrath! Neither
shot nor ball could reach that world of wild fowl safe mid
the free air of Heaven! Pitiful our bag and string!
pitiful
our very selves! and all Woodville gazing from the
dark depths of the woods upward on that boundless canopy
of sounding, black, and rushing pinions!
To remain was worse than uselessit was hazardous;
at every flash of gunpowder, showers of shot foreign and
domestic fell like hail on the leaves around usand we
fancied rifles cracked as if speeding balls, and that we heard
the peculiar whistling of their death dealing music! And
we turned to go home. But the way thither had now
become
a question. That we were about three miles distant
was probable; yet after turnings and windings in the dark,
our puzzle was no wonder. Besides the moon, as if unable
to penetrate the cloud of wings, had never re-appeared;
and clouds of another kind had succeeded, whence heavy
and frequent rain-drops now pattered on us!
At last we decided our course by instinct; in which we
satisfactorily learned that human instinct is inferior to brute:
for after a trot of ten minutes, sudden torchlights crossed
our way at right angles, and a voice from one carrier thus
hailed
Hilloo! whar're you a travellin?
To Woodvillewhose that?
To Woodville!bust my rifle if you ain't a goin a
powerful strate course on it
Why Ned, is that you?
That's the very feller; why Mr. Carltin if you keep
that course, you'll reach the licks about sun-up!why
this here's the wayfoller our trail.
Ha! ha! Ned, I thought I was a better woodsman
keep a-head, we'll follow.
Well, you're puttee smart in the day-light, Mr. Carltin
but it's raythur more hardish to strike the course of a dark
night.
12*
Where's Domore, Ned?
Foller'd arter the d pigins
Don't swear, Ned, the preacher's here. Did you get
any?
Git any! Nobody didn't git none. Bust my rifle if
this ain't a judjmint on the settlemint for firing shot guns
and shot out a rifles!
I think myself, Ned, shot guns had something to do in
scaring the birds so. But how far yet to Woodville?
Well, I can't jist about say sartinlyit taint more nor
four miles no how'spose we a sorter stop talkingit
hinders runnin; and here goes for a fresh start.
And start fresh did Ned and his party, and at a rate
extremely
prejudicial to easy conversation, and giving us
genteel
folks work enough to keep in sight of the torches. In
little more than an hour, however, we stood in the edge of
the clearings; when our course being pointed out by Ned,
the parties separated, and I went with Harwood and Clarence
to take supper at the house of the latter,a supper ready
to greet our arrival with a bag and string of pigeons!
I acknowledge itthis is a very tame and spiritless end
of our pigeon talea very bad dove-tailing! Yet is it as
natural as our flat and unprofitable feelings, when we sat
down about twelve o'clock that night at Clarence's to an
overdone, burnt up, tasteless supperour poetry and
romance
all flown away with the pigeons, and washed out by
the rain! However, we may add, that many followed the
pigeons all night; and once or twice small flocks were
found settled on trees where about one hundred in all were
killedbut the grand body was never overtaken. It
continued
,
perhaps, on the wing till a favourite roosting place
some hundred miles south was reached, that being their
direction. Domore got back at eight o'clock next morning,
having done twenty-five miles and obtained twenty-two
pigeons, with his hand, however, much injured by the recoil
or bursting of his horse pistol. Hence shot guns were in
worse odour than ever and no light curses heaped on all
sich spiteful bird skerers and them what made and shot
em!
Domore, indeed, soon recovered: when his first
rifle-shot
afterward was so melancholy in its consequence, as to
make him abstain from his favourite weapon and hunting
for many months. With that account we conclude this
chapter.
He went out several hours before day-break and lay in
wait at a salt-lick for a deer. Here he waited patiently till
the dawn; and then opposite his station his keen eyes
discovered
in the bushes the cautious approach of an animal,
and soon he caught a glimpse of its body. To flash his
eye through the sights and to touch the trigger was
instinctive
and
then came the cry not of a wounded deer or bear,
but of human agony! Domore flew to the spot; and what
was his horror there to see bleeding on the ground and
apparently
dying, poor Jesse Hardy, his intimate friend, and
the honest fellow who had been with us in the cave!
He, too, had come to watch the lick; and had Domore
been later than Hardy, their fates, perhaps, had been
reversed
!
Generally great precaution is employed by our
hunters to prevent such mishaps, yet sometimes with all,
they do occur. Happily in the present case the wound,
though severe, was not mortal, and Hardy in a few
minutes
so recovered as to speak; when Domore, after doing
what seemed proper, left his friend for fifteen minutes,
and then was again on the spot with the assistance of a
neighbouring family. The wounded man was carefully
removed
to the cabin; and Domore mounting a horse darted
away full speed for Dr. Sylvan. The Doctor came; and
being a skilful surgeon, as he had in that capacity served
in the war a regiment of mounted riflemen, he used the best
means of cure; and in two months, by the divine favour,
poor Jess was able to return to his domestic duties.
During
this confinement Domore did all he could for his friend,
and also for the widow-mother, supplying as far as possible
the place of a son; and although after Jess recovered,
Domore
hunted again with his rifle, he never again, while we
were in the Purchase, went out to watch a lick.
CHAPTER LIX.
Like other tyrants death delights to smite,
What, smitten, most proclaims the pride of power
And arbitrary nod. His joy supreme
To bid the wretch survive the fortunate;
The feeble wrap the athletic in his shroud
And weeping fathers build their children's tomb.
Scarcely
had the gloom from the late melancholy
occurrence
been dispelled before our settlements were
trembling
at reports of a coming, resistless, unpitying,
destructive
foethe Asiatic Cholera!
Innumerable were our schemes to turn aside, evade, or
counteract, this fell disease; and all fear of other sickness
and death was absorbed in fear of this! As if God had
only one minister of vengeance, or of chastisement! As if
He was to be dreaded in the thunder and tempest, and
forgotten
in the calmness and sunshine! Indeed, that only
dreaded death
then
came not;God sent another
messenger
of terror and of mercyThe Scarlet Fever!
This disease appeared first and without apparent cause
in the family of Dr. Sylvan. Thence, in a few weeks, it
spread carrying death and mourning into most of our
habitations
.
It followed no known law, sometimes yielding and
then refusing to yield to the same treatment and in the
same as well as different families: and often in other
places resisting the established, or different, or even
opposite
treatment, and sweeping all into the grave! The
cholera then had no alarms! The King of Terrors was
among us in forms as frightful and destructive!
Then was it, dear one! after days and nights of
ceaseless
and anxious watchings, and after fitful alternations of
hope and fear, we saw those eyes, so soft and yet so
brilliant
,
suddenly and strangely quenchedas though life had
retreated thither to a last refuge and death, having long
before triumphed o'er thy dear,
dear
form, did there, as a
last act, put out that most precious light!
What didst thou mean by those mysterious words in the
dying strife?Father! father! how tired I am! Was
it so hard to die? * * Didst thou hear, in answer,
the wailings of bitterest anguish?or feel on thy cold
cheek the last kisseswhile tears wet that face, changing
and passing for ever? * * * Sleep, dear babe! in thy
bed under the forest leaves, amid those lone graveswe
shall meet, and,
never
to partno! never!
Clarence had buried two children in the far East: he
was now called to lay another in the far West. That
Sabbath
morning can never be forgot! Among others, who
suffered most, was our fellow-citizen Mr. Harlen. His
four chidren were all deaf-mutes. Two of these had died
in succession, at an interval of eight days: and, when the
second lay in its little coffin, in front of the pulpit in the
Methodist Chapel, the third, a fine boy, nine years old,
distressed at some supposed error, stole from his weeping
parents in the church, and, advancing to the coffin of his
dead brother, placed the bier as to him seemed suitable
and decorous! Poor darling one! on the next Sabbath,
he lay in his own coffin on that same bier, and before that
same pulpit! And another coffin, and another bier, were
thereand the chief mourner was Clarence! The
heart-broken
parents of the mutes(ay! mute, indeed, now!)
had entreated him to pray for themselves, if possible,
that day in public! He did so. And over the coffins of
their dead children, he spoke to others and himself too,
words of consolation; and offered prayer to Him that can
and did bind up the broken in heart, and raise up them that
were bowed down!
Mournful train! The vision is before me everas it
emerges from the house of God! It slowly ascends the
hill!the two coffins!the two stricken households!
the False One between friends at that double burial!
The train is entering the Forest Sanctuary! They are
separating, some to lay the deaf one with his kinsome
to see the stranger lay his babe near my buried one!
Reader! I now write many things in playfulness
none in maliceyet, years of my life passed, when
sadness
only was in my heart; and words and thoughts of
pleasantness were impossible! Ay! the gloom of hell, if
not its despair, possessed my soul! But, I have found
religion not inconsistent with great and habitual
cheerfulness
.
Nay, thoughts of death, judgment, and eternity, may
be ever present and ever dominant in a mind taught by
many sorrows to make light of the things of time and
sense!
How do these solemn words and things sort with
thy
cheerfulness? For, remember, by the agreement or
disagreement
,
your
character is:
and that thine most
certainly
,
as mine, areDeathJudgmentEternity!
SEVENTH YEAR.
CHAPTER LX.
While he from one side to the other turning,
Bareheaded, lower than his proud steed's neck,
Bespake them thus:
I thank you, countrymen:
And thus still doing, thus he pass'd along.
Smooth runs the water, where the brook is deep,
And in his simple show he harbours treason.
Cheer
up! reader, only one and a half year more in
the Purchase! In this time, we lived, also, very fast, and
were so occupied with great matters as to overlook little
things; therefore, we shall not be tedious. Beside, I am
tired riding about; and hence, you will be dragged no more
through the wooden world, except to the Guzzleton
Barbecue
.
We now introduce a very uncommon personage, a most
powerful prodigious great man, the first of the sort beheld
in the New Purchasethe very Reverend Constant
Bloduplex
,
D. D.in all the unfathomable depths of those
mystic letters! And this character,
supposed
to be
invented
for the purpose, will be an important study to the
literati
,
whether
branded
on the head or the tail, D. D. or d. d.
P. or p.: and who aspire to dictate
ex cathedra
. All
such strong-headed men can here receive important hints
and directions, and have examples how best to discharge
their official duties. We can now show a thing or two:
and some never seen or heard of in the East! Yea! some
which the wise Solomon himself never did or imagined in
all his experiments, drunk or sober!
Indeed! go on then, sir.
Well, the Reverend Gentleman had lately written, to
state his acceptance of the Presidency; although it would
compel him to resign much more eligible stations, and
make very unpleasant interruptions in his domestic
comforts
:
and also, that he would be ready to set out for his
new home in the early spring. In due season, followed a
letter, naming the time his journey would be commenced,
and when and where he might be met on the river.
Then should you have been at Woodville, to see our
folks hop about! All, at least, favourable to the conduct
of the Board. However, some, opposed to rats, agreed to
suspend hostilities; being persuaded by Dr. Sylvan, Mr.
Clarence, and specially Mr. Harwood, that our President
was a man of uncommon worth, talents, patriotism, and
enterprise. Yet, a few honest, but perhaps mistaken,
persons
,
from a sincere love of their own sectarianism,
remained
our opponents, if not our enemies. At present,
we were the decided majority, and therefore the people's
people: and so we determined to do things in style. Out
of reverence,
then
,
[44]
[44]
Adverb of time. Vide Murrayor some of his pilferers.
to the man, and regard for his station,
we resolved to meet him with an escort; to honour him
with a procession, an illumination, and a feast! And all
this was by and with the consent and advice, and under
the superintendence, and at the expense mainly, of
Clarence
and Harwood, aided by Sylvan and Carlton. Hence,
nemine contradicente
, it was ordered:
1. That Mr. Carlton, Sen'r, and James Sylvan, Jun'r, be
the escort from the river:
2. That the students prepare an illumination of the
Colleges
:
3. That Mrs. Clarence, and a dozen other feminine
citizens
,
fix
the President's house, and prepare his first
supper
:
and
4. That Mr. Clarence be as ubiquitous as possible, and
see that every thing was as straight asa shingle.
At the proper day, the escort started. On passing
through villages and loggages, we so fired up the citizens,
that in many places, it was promised to meet our Great
Man with inferior processions, like an ovationthe Grand
Triumphal being to be at Woodville. In one town, with a
Jewish name, we met no encouragementnot from want
of good-will in the inhabitants, but simply because there
were no inhabitants there. Like Goldsmith's village, it
was desertedthe inhabitants having all been shaken out
by the ague: although we could not say, as some one of
Ireland, in it snakes are there none.
Finally, after an uncommon abrasion of
inexpressible-seats
,
and green baize leggins(for, like Gilpin, we rode,
if not for a wager, yet for a President)we dismounted
and tied our horses at the Ohio.
(N. B. The MS. here was so blotted, the Editor could
not read it.)
and   but the steamer was now seen
descending on the swollen bosom of the waters, belching
fire and smoke as if in labour, and longing to be delivered
of the great weight of character and influence she was
painfully bearing to our inland wildsapt likeness, too, of
Man of Puffs! Oh! the exciting moment! Now! we
shall see a Man!we shall have the honour of riding
before
himof showing him to the natives, as Boswell
showed Johnson to the Scotchmen! and
(Here my friend Mr. C. seems to have been so
nervous that his MS. defies my powers to decipher
several
pages, therefore, are necessarily omitted.
Editor
.)
when, then, do we set off, Mr. Carlton?
To-morrow morning, Doctor. We will now cross the
river, and join your family on the New Purchase side.
Is this our skiff?
Yes, sir. Well, since we are afloat, Doctor, how do
you think you will like our wooden country?
Don't name it, sir. I already repent my precipitancy:
if all could be recalled, I should be better pleased.
You surprise me, Dr. Bloduplex!
Yes, sir, I have been hasty: I would gladly be in my
former place.
But, our College
Mr. Carlton,
plague
me not about the collegeI shall
have plenty of that when I get to Woodville.
Conversation, where one is ardent and the other cold,
becomes
sissee or zizzy
:a dialogue between cold water
and hot iron. Our escort had too much at stake in the
success
of the institution, not to feel now something like a
damper on his spirits; and he, therefore, remained in a
ruminating
way the rest of the passagenay, during the
eveningyea, when he got into bed. In vain chastised he
his own zeal, as too zealousin vain apologised for the
President's want of firmness and lack of interest in
Woodville
mattersit did still occur that the good Doctor should
have counted the cost, and been
absorbed
in the great
enterprise for which he had willingly and joyfully
sacrificed
himself? Had he not left riches, and honours, and
glories of the Wheelabout country deliberately and
conscientiously
and
ought he not to have had a little patience
with an escort that had paid the postage of a horse, and
nearly ruined a pair of green leggins and a pair of blue
unmentionables
?
And then sneaked in remembrances of
conversations
with certain Brethren, intimately acquainted
with the President's remarkable life and history
conversations
once attributed to envy, and jealousy, and
odium
theologicum
and
yet so cognate to the late behaviourthat
battle the suspicion as he would, it did seem, as they
said
,
we should soon find out and be bitterly disappointed with
Dr. Bloduplexthat he was no safe confidantand if we
slighted warning, we should in the end find a person that
could blow hot and cold with the same breath.
However, we resolved to make the inland journey
pleasant
,
and honourably to do the escortorial duties, and boldly
throw away all suspicions and uncharitable inferencesyet
to be guarded. When, therefore, next day the President
showed a phase different from the one in the boat, the
author
,
after listening now to an enthusiastic sermon on
Colleges
,
Woodville, the Far West in general, the Mississippi
valley in particular, and the nobleness of doing good for
goodness' sakeaway packing sent he his base and
injurious
suspicions, and began, in the amiable weakness of his
nature, to look up to the Doctor with even greater
admiration
,
and no small admixture of filial reverence! And then
in his turnbeing
of course
all the time on his
guard!
Mr. C. opened his budget, and told about Woodville, and
the peoples, and the Trustees, and Harwood, and Clarence,
and Allheart, and Domore, and Ned, and all!
That was indiscreet, Mr. Carlton.
Granted: but we felt
then
like a son with a fatherwere
anxious to make amends for our mental injuryand beside,
this
leaky
state of our mind seemed so to interest the good
Doctorand he condescended to ask so many leading
questionsand laughed and cried so easy and naturally at
various narrations. Indeed, he
innocently
started fresh
leaks in a vessel that never held well at the bestbut like
Robert Hall's, the noble Baptist, used to pour out at the
slightest excitements: or, to change the figure, the Doctor
finding water increasing in the hold, managed the pumps so
adroitly and incessantly as to empty the whole
chest
or
some such place in the body corporate, where secrets are
contained.
Still, sir, you were too much of a gossip.
Ah! but consider, dear reader, we had nothing else to
talk about. Moreover, I only gave story for story: and
whenever I told any thing about Woodville, he matched it
with something about Wheelabout. And in these he
contrived
to anticipate and answer all inquiries that perchance
might be some day instituted concerning History, in that
regiontill I looked on him as a hero, statesman and saint,
basely maligned, persecuted and driven(for
driven
it
seemed he had been)away by cruel foes and unjust
popularity.
What did he tell you?
Excuse me:I
can
tellbut that would betray what
was told in
confidence!
And I am not so great a man as
Dr. Bloduplex, and must not look so high for an example,
although twelve months after this ride the Doctor
did
remember
all my gossip, things said playfully and idly, and
some seriously, and did narrate and comment on them, and
draw inferences from them, and that before discontented
students
,
collected at his housebefore Dr. Sylvan alone
before the Board of Trustees convened as a court of trial!
Ay! and so full to overflowing was his remarkable
memory
,
that he recollected what Mr. Carlton should have
told him!but which Mr. Carlton never did tell him!
However, let us get back to Woodville. On the way,
before arriving at a village, James Sylvan, Jun., would hasten
forward to announce our approach; when, by previous
arrangement
,
we were met half a mile south of each clearing,
and honoured with the
ovation:
immediately after which we
usually had another in the shape of
eggs
and bacon. At
Melchisede cville our couriera little waggishlysimply
announced the President! In the course of the evening
our hotel was duly visited by some democrats in shirt
sleeves, and some without a shirtto see that old
character
President
Hickory-Face! They saw, however, a
hero with a much smoother phiz, of softer words, but in all
probability of a tougher conscience.
By the end of the third day, we could hear the cow-bells
jingling homeward towards Woodville. The cows, a little
in advance, were hurried forward by our courier, in a long
line, with unwonted speed, unusual clamour, great
mud-splashings
and tail lashings; from all which it was
conjectured
by the look-outs in the edge of the Woodville
clearing, that
something
was coming! Indeed, as
nothing
else could have produced such commotion and uproar,
Professor
Harwood mounted into the crotch of the great old
Beech at the Spring, and peering thence into the forest,
he soon exclaimed:
Fall in! fall
in!
Sylvan's
behind
the cows! I see
his handkerchief waving on his whip! Fall in! the
President
is coming?
Hence when we came within a few rods of the clearing,
there sure enough they all stood in double file
What! the cows!
Pshaw! nobut Harwood, and the students, and the
citizensall in their Sunday clothes! And then taking off
their hatsall, I mean, that had anythey gave us, as we
passed between the opened lines, three or four most terrific
cheers!
How the President felt I know notbut I, fondly hoping
our college and town were both madeI was fairly lifted
above my horse! and stood in the stirrups! I rejoiced as
for my own honour,thinking, too, I foresaw the rapid and
lasting growth of learning, and science, and civilization,
and religion. That Clarence rejoiced also, I well know
it was for this he had voluntarily stood aside and made
room for an
elder
, I did not say, a
better
soldier! That
Harwood rejoiced likewise, I well knownay, without
Harwood's suggestions and after efforts, Bloduplex had yet
been in the
peacefulness
of his earlier warsthe
triumph
of
his first victories over the incautious and open hearted!
And yet that Harwood was soon hurled from his own office
his living taken awayhis reputation!but stay, we
must not write faster than we lived, although
very
fast did
we now live, if a large experience of evil constitute fast
living!
We omit the supper, and pass to the illumination.
Pause we, however, to state that, in addition to Little
College
and Big College, we boasted now a third edifice,
which may properly here be styled Biggest College. Some
time since our Board had ordered the erection of a new
building, and appointed a Committee to carry the order into
effect; who, being carpenters and masons, lost no time, but
taking the contract themselves, went immediately to work.
Hence, one morning was very unexpectedly seen a
surveyor
running a line across the Campus, driving down
stakes, &c.and also several labourers digging a
foundation
!
Professor Harwood accidentally passing, asked in
surprise what was meant: and he was answered, it's for
the New College!
College!!why we have no plan yet.
Plan!why it is to be like the Court-Houseand aint
that
big
enough?
The next moment Harwood was at my store; and out of
breath began:
I say, Carlton!do you know what's going on our
way?
No: what?
Why they're digging away at the foundation of the new
College
No! you're quizzing
Quizzing!yes, quiz it will be on a large scale: they
are actually going to put up a building the express size and
pattern of that odious Court House!
`Impossible!let's go down and stop it.
And, sure enough, there was a foundation marked off for
a building exactly square, about 50 feet to the side!
Happily
we had some influence, and some trustees had some
shame: and hence, while the work could not be stopped, the
contracts having been secretly disposed of and shared
among our own trustees and their friends, an order was
procured
for an enlargement of the affair, making the house 30
feet longer; and instead of two, three stories high! And
this is the true history, although Dr. Bloduplex prided
himself
with having suggested in his letters the just
proportions
:
the proportions, just or unjust, were wholly
accidental
,
and owing to the cupidity of the contractors, and not
to the love of classical or unclassical architecture.
Well, on the memorable night of the President's arrival,
Little and Big Colleges were very tastefully illuminated in
the eastern way; but on Biggest College, then incomplete,
had been raised above the roof a pole perpendicular to the
apex. The upper end of said pole, passed through the
centre
of radiating pieces bounded by a circumference, and
continued
to rise yet a few feet. Near its top crossed a bar at
right angles; and at each end of the bar a candle
represented
a Professora very large candle on the extremity
of the pole itself personated the President. The Students
stood in other candles around the circle below, and just
described; so that the Greater and Lesser Lights of the
Purchase glimmered forth to night, in all the glory and
effulgence
of cotton wick and beef-tallow.
It was a proud night! and not undelightful our emotions
and anticipations, as we stood in the edge of the wilderness,
late the lurking place of the Indian, and yet concealing the
bear, the wolf, the panther, and gazed on those symbolical
tapers! It did seem that Mind in its march had halted and
erected her standard! But even while we gazed, those
tapers
became oddly extinguished! First, one after another,
died away the lights of the circle!then the lights at the
extreme ends of the bar, first Clarence, then Harwood!
while the light topping the pole was left, feebly burning,
indeed
,
and spluttering, yet triumphant and alone!
Was that ominous of what follows?
So Aunt Kitty insists. Beside, she fortified her
superstition
by a dream! She dreamed that very night! that
Mr. Clarence was seated in his great rocking chair, on the
top of Biggest College, and that a wind, insidious,
noiseless
,
and yet resistless, came like a double-blowing
tornado
,
and hurled him to the earth!
Events soon happened strangely corroborative of the old
lady's ideas and misgivingsand we can only
account
for
those things, as Southey for the
unaccountables
, in Wesley's
lifethere are more things in heaven, &c. Some said
the Top Candle burnt and smoked the longest, because it
contained the largest amount of gross animal matter, and
was most
wick
-ed; but still that, you know, does not
account
satisfactorily for Aunt Kitty's dream, does it?
CHAPTER LXI.
Trust not those cunning waters of his eyes,
For villainy is not without such rheum:
And he, long traded in it, makes it seem
Like rivers of remorse, and innocency.
President Bloduplex
was, as is usual, the son of his
father and mother, being born in very early life, at an
uncertain
moment of a certain day or night, near Wheelabout.
His talents were good; his acquirements respectable
especially in Classics, Antiquities, History, and Literature
in general;still they were not uncommon. In
Mathematics
and Sciences, we cannot state his attainments; and
simply because we never discovered themyet he must
have got beyond arithmetic, since Clarence, in return for
aid in Greek, did gratefully assist the Doctor in Algebra.
Harwood, indeed, thought the President's attainments in
such matters inconsiderable; but then Harwood was
Professor
of Mathematics and may have expected too much.
At all events the President set no great value on these
matters
,
making himself merry at Clarence's expense, on
accidentally discovering that this gentleman was studying
Mathematics under the guidance of his friend Harwood,
while Harwood read Latin and Greek with Clarence.
As a companion, no man
could
be more agreeable than
our President. It was this led our young Professors to
unbosom in his presenceand even when, in an unguarded
moment, the President remarkedfriendship is a word I
have blotted from my vocabulary!they thought he
suspected
other men only and not themselves. But before
long it was found he had confidence in nobody; and that
he looked on all men as enemies, to be managed, resisted,
counteracted, circumvented. This was his
proton pseudos
,
to imagine all sorts of wickedness and chicanery in all
others; and then to combat all with such weapons as he
fancied they were using or would use against him! Hence
said Harwood once,depend on it, when Bloduplex
tells us of the meanness, and duplicity, and falsehood, and
machinations of Doctor Red and others in Wheelabout,
towards
himself, he has used the same towards them. But
Harwood was a young man, and may have been
mistaken
.
Doctor B. was an excellent preacher, and a still better
lecturer, whether is regarded the matter or the manner:
Vol. II.13
and some of his pulpit exhibitions were surpassingly fine.
His theological opinions, like the Oxford Tracts, were for
the Times: his only decided opinion in theology being
that there were worse men in hell than Judas Iscariot.
Like King David, our President, but in a different sense,
had been a man of war from his youth; and in some
adroit way(
he
attributed it partly to his elocution)he
had usually worsted his enemies and even his friends, too,
in ecclesiastical combats before the clerical courts!
Indeed
,
so thoroughly had he devoured things as to have
used himself up! One demolished brother in the
middle
east attributed the victory over himself to the Doctor's
peculiar memory, which had no tenacity in things that
made against himself, but retained all and more too of such
as were in his own favor. But that was the fault of his
Phrenological organization; and he only acted in obedience
to the laws of his nature.
My own opinion is, President B. owed most of his
victories
and
some of his defeatsto his Wonderful Religious
Experience! which in the stereotyped crying places
always
when
first
heard inclined
weak
believers to his
side! I well know the peril of meddling with this
Experience
;
since the Doctor soberly arraigned both Clarence
and Harwood for
sniggering
when they heard its third or
fourth repetitionalthough the Judges would not condemn
the accused, inasmuch as a moiety of said Judges did
snigger and sneer a little themselves when the Experience
was enacted for them!
Ay! the Player did sometimes so overdo this part as
not only to look excessively silly, but to see in other men's
faces that he had been making a special fool of himself!
A donkey,says sopboasting descent from a
generous
race horse, failed, however, in a certain race; when,
humbled and ear-fallen, he had a shadowy recollection of
his fatheran A S S. A dim remembrance of that
donkey's
true progenitor, very respectfully named in more than
one solemn court and conclave, and as an accompaniment
to the Religious Experience, may enable our worthy
Divine
,
if he still live, to see one reason why, (if, he failed
not often to destroy his foes,) he has so completely
destroyed
himself.
Yesbut, by your own account, he
did
overthrow both
Clarence and Harwood.
Readera double-cone seems to be rolling up hill, on
its inclined planes: and yet is it all the time really going
down hill! According to his threat, he did trample both
Trustees and Faculty under his feet;but it has proved
to himself only a rolling up-hill downwards!
Some will think we are manufacturing a character: and,
maybe, crities will say it is a very poor one after all, and
that any second rate genius could have invented a much
better. Well, honesty is the best policy; and, although it
may affect the sale of the book one way or the other, we
must say that Bloduplex is really a fictitious character!
CHAPTER LXII.
Contention, like a horse
Full of high feeding, madly hath broke loose,
And bears down all before him.
Such
being our Fictitious Bloduplex, can any critic say,
a priori
, what will be suitable action? Perhaps, the
popular
inductive method had better been followed, and the
ascent to the character taken place from the actions
a
posteriori
:
and that would have sorted with our President's
favourite English use of that backsided logical phrase.
Let none, here, exclaim, Mystery! We live in a
mysterious
age. Is it not the era of Animal Magnetism?of
Phreno, or Phrensy-magnetism?of Transubstantiation?
Repudiation?Wax Candles?Holy Vestments? Is
there not a laying, all through the pomps and vanities of
the world, clear up to heaven, a Spiritual Rail Way, by
which a vile sinner, touched and started by the proper
persons
,
or their deputies and proxies, shall be in glory in a
jiffey?and that whether puritanically converted and
sanctified
or not! But
Dislike was, in due time, expressed by the President
for his Cabinet, conjectured to spring from1. His
jealousy
of equals, and suspicious and untrustful temper:
2. His determination for a very low grade of studies
especially
in Mathematics, and even in Classics,he being
resolved
to level down and not up: 3. His love of ease, and
wish to get along with a relaxed, or rather no discipline:
4. His using discipline as an instrument of avenging
himself
on students disliked by him: 5. His domineering and
tyrannical temper: 6. His prying disposition, by which
he was led to have spies in the professors' classes, and to
watch when they came and went to and from duties, &c.:
7. His desire to make room for former pupils and relatives:
8. His erroneous theology.
Hence, without consulting his peers, nay, contrary to
the known wishes and earnest remonstrances, he tried to
discipline students at will, and to suspend and dismiss; he
permitted some to be graduated, and who now hold
imperfect
diplomas, signed with his sole name: and he
commanded
what the Professors should and should not do,
and what teach, and how, answering their arguments with
insult and derision, and threatening to stamp them and the
trustees also under his feet! He pretended to think, and
dared to assert, that the discipline of a College was of
right a President's special duty,and teaching, the
Professors'
.
And, therefore, he rudely, on several occasions,
contradicted his Faculty in public, and aimed to consider
and treat them as boys! Nay, once, after permitting a
young
gentleman
openly and grossly to insult a member of
the Faculty, he stated in public, that unless that member
and that pupil could make it up! the student or Professor
must
leave the College!! He was the master of the
school,his Professors mere ushers! He arbitrarily
prescribed
first,
their duties, and then,
dared
enter their
recitation
rooms to ascertain in person if they were
competent
and faithful teachers: where, after asking questions
of the students, showing always his impertinence and
insolence
,
and not rarely his ignorance of the subjects, he
said to those pupils, and in the very presence of their
Professors
,
that if not fully satisfied with the teachers'
explanations
and instructions, they would come to his study, he
would supply the deficiencies!!!
Mr. Carlton!  were your Professors men? Why,
Professor Spunk, of our place, would have kicked him
out!
Softly: Clarence was a Clergyman, and Harwood good
natured. For a while, too, amazement kept them speechless:
and after that they were inclined to take, as a perpetual
apology for the President's rudeness, what he once offered
as such to the students themselves, for a hasty act of
discipline
,
viz.:that his nerves had been disordered by a
cup of strong tea the night before, taken incautiously with
a guest, and that in such cases he was sometimes
forgetful
and hasty!
Clarence, indeed, always insisted that the poor Doctor
was, at times, partially deranged; and
that
, even after
receiving
the following anonymous letter:
(
Note:
The Editor is unwilling to print the letter, and
so he always told Mr. C.)
This letter, Clarence, on opening his pocket Virgil, left
as usual on the mantel of his recitation room, found in the
book: and, not suspecting its character, he thought he
would run it over before commencing the lesson. The
hand-writing being apparently the President's, Clarence,
conceiving that his master had chosen this way to lecture
for some over-sight, looked for no signature. And,
therefore
,
he read till the ending, when the absence of all
signature
so perturbed him, that he got through with the
recitation
mechanically and by instinct!
Great was his distress:could it be that Bloduplex was
so
cowardly and vile to write such a letter! ordering him
to resign, and threatening if he would not! Yet, his was
the hand-writing!the style!the very expressions!
the every thing!but the signature, and that was wanting!
When this letter was thus found, it was a time of restored
peace and renovated confidencefor, Clarence, being
then
a man of implicit faith and trustfulness of spirit(having
faith in man! according to the modern doctrine of
Lyceums
)had,
child-like, looked over the past, and hoped
afresh for the future; * * * Down went he, after
recitation,
as usual
, to the Doctor's studybut,
accidentally
,
the door was locked! Then called he Harwood
from his room, and, without uttering a word, put the letter
into his hand. That gentleman read, and trembled as he
read,and, when Clarence asked
Who do you think wrote it? he answered
I am afraid to say! but it seems like the Doctor,the
stylethe hand-writingthe expressionsare so like
his!
Hastening home, Clarence handed the letter to his wife,
and without word or comment. She read; but, soon
bursting
into tears, she voluntarily exclaimed
Oh! Charles!the Doctor must have written this!
Harwood had now joined them: when the anonymous
letter was compared with several letters written by
Bloduplex
to Clarence, and the most remarkable similarity, as to
the handthe stylethe wordsthe expressionswas
apparent: nay, in some things, was an identity. And
all this, even Dr. Sylvan afterwards acknowledged;
although
with characteristic caution, he expressed no
opinion
as to the authorship.
Do not resign
I must, Harwood: external enemies and mistaken
men, I could and can resist, and face;but
this
domestic
traitor
Perhaps, after all, it is not he.
Perhaps so; yet, I cannot endure the
suspicion
. And,
suppose he learns or guesses our suspicionmutual
confidence
can
never
be again after
that
. No. I am now
awake: and let me say, dear Harwood, that that man has
some plan for you when he is rid of me.
Oh! you are too much alarmedhe cannot be
meditating
that;we shall be too strong for him
Depend on it, I am right. What we have heard of his
character
is
true: and he that has, by indirect means,
gained victories over ecclesiastical courts, will, by the
same, gain them over us. I must and will resign.
At least, see the Doctor first.
I willbut I know the result:it will end in my
resignation
,
and in
your
final overthrow.
Clarence accordingly, taking the letter, waited on the
President, who, meeting him at the door of his dwelling,
did himself thus begin:
You received an anonymous letter, Mr. Clarence, I
hear?(Who told him?)
Yes, sir; and I have come to you for advice.
Let us walk up the lane. Have you the letter with
you?
Here it is.
The letter was taken by the President, but
not read all
carefully and indignantly over
, as by the others! And yet,
at a glance, he learned all its items, and that so well, as
to talk and comment on them! But still, after what he
designed
should pass for a searching scrutiny, in a moment
he exclaimed,I
know
the hand writingit is
Smith's!
How you relieve me, Doctor Bloduplex, said
Clarence
;
Harwood was right to prevent me from sending
in my resignation.I shall continue
Mr. Clarence, replied the President, Smith,
I
know,
is your bitter enemy; and I am
told
you have many more,
and especially among the
young gentlemen
that came with
me: now, this letter shows a state of great unpopularity,
and
I do candidly advise, all things considered, that you
had better resign!!
Doctor, pardon me, my first belief is returnedI know
the author of this letter, and it is
not
Smith.
Who then, sir?
Come with me, Dr. Bloduplex, and I will satisfy you
in my study.
I cannot now, sir, but will call in the course of the
day.
After a while the President called, when Clarence,
conducting
him into the study, said:
Dr. Bloduplex, from my inmost soul I do hope you
may remove my suspicion;but I much fear that you
yourself are the author of this letter!
I!the author! how could you ever entertain so
unjust
a suspicion?
God grant, sir, it be unjustbut I will now give you
the grounds of my suspicion.
Name them, sir,I am curious and patient.
Here Clarence went over all that the reader has been
told, but to a much wider extent, and with many arguments
and inferences not now narrated; and then spread out the
Doctor's own letters, to be compared with the anonymous
one. Upon which the Doctor said:
Well, Mr. Clarence, there is no resemblance between
them, or but very little.
But is there not
some?
Has not the writer tried to
imitate your handyour styleyour very grammatical
peculiarities
?
It does, maybe, seem a little so
It does, indeed, Doctor Bloduplex; and now look
here!
the seal is stamped with the key of your desk!
Here the President coloured; of course in virtuous
indignation
and surprise at such roguery, and in some little
confusion exclaimed:
The wicked dogs! they have
stolen
the
key
of my
desk!
Clarence was here affected to tears; that one the other
day almost loved and trusted as a father could be by
him
no
longer so regarded. Ay, hoping against hope that the man
could not be so fallen from high honour, and looking towards
him with streaming eyes, he said:
Only assure me, Doctor, on your word of honour and
as a Christian that
you
did not do this base action, and even
now will I burn this letter in this very fire(it was a cold
day)before your face.
Mr. Clarence, said he I solemnly declare I did not
write the letter; but stay, do not burn itlet me have it
and I will try and find the writer.
The worthy President then carried away the letter and
retained it three days in his surtout pocket; after which
he returned the paperbut alas! the friction of the pocket,
or something else, had so worn away the seal that the
impression
of the
desk-key
was no longer visible!
Of course, then, the letter was
not
written by the
Reverend
Constant Bloduplex, d. d.for he had the best right
to know; and he
said
, solemnly, that it was not. Yet
13*
Clarence, all things considered, did that very week send
his resignation to Dr. Sylvan; offering, however, to remain
till the meeting of the Board. At that the Board offered
him nearly double salary to remain some months longer till
a suitable successor could be found; to which proposal
Clarence acceded. When that gentleman leaves the stage,
our history, dear reader, is concluded.
Meanwhile pass we to the next chapter and refresh
ourselves
with the Guzzleton Barbecue.
CHAPTER LXIII.
I'll give thrice so much land
To any well-deserving friend:
But in the way of
bargain
, mark ye me,
I'll cavil on the ninth part of a hair.
Now, my co-mates, and brothers in exile,
Hath not old custom made this life more sweet
Than that of painted pomp?
Before
his marriage, John Glenville had located on the
river; where, being part owner of a tract of land, it was
determined
to make the village of Guzzleton. And of all
places in the world this was aplace. It abounded in
wood and water, and was convenient to the river, orcould
be so; the county road went within half a mile, and if
desired
would, no doubt, come right through the town; and
there might be rail-roads and canals across it, in every
direction. Nay, all the advantages of Paperville itself
would in due time concentrate in Guzzleton! Yea, it would
eclipse Woodville! Ay, and if some folks did not look
sharp, the Legislature would remove to Guzzleton the State
College, or at least create there a branch College!
Hence, in the tremendous excitement, lots at the first sale,
were
bid
off at fine prices, to be
paid
afterwards; and then
the settlers began to pour in and build! But after
Glenville's
own dwelling and store-house, Tom Beecher's
tannery
,
and two cabins, one for a cobbler and the other for a
tailor, had been erected, the rage for improvement ceased;
and as yet the place was only Little Guzzleton!
The Patroons, however, thought if a Fourth of July could
be got up and the place become a centre for
stump-speeching
,
electioneering, horse-jockeying and other democratical
excellences, a fresh start would be given to its growth,
and the town become Great Guzzleton. Hence this
summer
,
on the Fourth, was to be there a grand Barbecue,
with the reading of the Declaration of Independence, and
great speeches from Robert Carlton of Woodville, and other
fellow-citizens!
On the third of July, Harwood and myself went over to
indulge in a prefatory cut up with Glenville, and to
witness
the arrangements for the Barbecue. And as such an
affair may be novel to some, we shall confine ourselves to
that; taking for granted most have once or twice heard
the Declaration and also the patriotic orations of the season.
The spot for the Barbecue was an enchanting plateau
below the cliff on which Guzzleton stood, and yet
sufficiently
above the river, to be considered table land. It was
about one hundred yards long by fifty yards wide, and
covered
with fine and luxuriant grass, usually cropped by cows
and horses, but now smoothly and evenly mown with
scythes. The hackberry, the buckeye, the sycamore, and
other trees, less abundant than elsewhere, were, yet,
plentiful
enough for ornament and shade; and this had led to
the selection.
Near the centre of this sylvan saloon was the table. This
was eminent for strength more than elegance; but still for
the place, the occasion, and the company, was the very
table. Cabinet work would have sorted poorly with the
wildness
.
The table was one hundred and fifty feet long; and
consisted of two-inch planks in double layers, resting every
ten feet on horizontal pieces of saplings; which in turn
were supported by strong forked saplings planted several
feet in the earth. Neither nail of iron, nor peg of wood,
confined the planksthey reposed by their own gravity.
Yet an unphilosophical arrangement of fixins, or an undue
resting of plebeian arms and elbows did, now and then,
disturb
the
gravity
of the table in places; and that disturbing
the
gravy
upset also the
gravity
of the companyspecially
the
ungreased
portion.
Seats differed from the table in being lower and not so
wide. They ran pretty near parallel with its sides; and
were low enough, that our mouths be as near the food as
possibleso that if the legs were judiciously disposed
under
the table, and the head properly inclined above, the
contents of one's plate could be shovelled into the
masticating
aperture with amazing dexterity and grace.
On each side of the table, ten feet distant and at intervals
of five feet, were planted in the earth small trees with all
their green and branching tops; and these tops, forced
together
and tied with bark-twines over the table, formed a
romantic arcade seemingly of living trees evoked by the
wand of enchantment to adorn and shade!
Far as possible from the arcade, was the place of the
Barbecue Proper. And that was a truly gigantic affair!
It was no contemptible smoke-jack, steam-spit,
rotary-stove
contraption to cook a morsel of meat and a half a peck
of potatoes with an apron of chips! or two hands full of
saw-dust! or a quart of charcoal! It contemplated no
fricasee for two or three guests beside the family! No!
no! it was to do whole pigs! whole sheep! whole calves!
whole turkeys! whole chickens! and for a whole
settlement
and
all other settlements invited as guests!
A trench was cut in the ground some twenty feet long,
four wide and three deep! And that trench was full of
logs lying on brushwood, all to be set on fire that night,
that a mine of living coals be ready for the morning's
cookery
!
On the Fourth, about day-light, fresh logs and brush
were added; and thus in due time this whole kitchen was
a glowing and burning mass!
Strips of nice white hickory were, at cooking time, laid
at intervals across the fiery trench; their ends resting on
stones or green logs along the edges of the range, and thus
constituting a clean, simple, and most gigantic
wooden
gridiron
.
And then the beasts and birds, properly cleaned,
skewered, peppered, salted and so on, were all and at once,
spread out
whole
over the mammoth hickory iron; each
creature being divided longitudinally on its
bosom
side!
And each was kept spread out by hickory pieces or
stretchers
,
and seasonably turned by two men, on opposite sides,
with long hickory forks and pokers! Never such a
cooking
!
It seemed as all the edible creatures of the Purchase
had taken an odd fit to come and be barbecued for the mere
fun of it!
Nor was this wholesale barbecuing deemed sufficient!
During the evening of the third, and early on the fourth,
backwoodswomen were hourly arriving with boiled hams,
loaves of wheat, pones, pies, tarts, sorrel-pies, Irish
potato-pies
and
things unknown to fashionable gourmands and
confectioners;also, meal in bags, and baskets, till
provisions
were piled in kitchen, and arbours, and carts like
oh! likeeverything!
Our Fourth was ushered by the roar of Hoosier artillery
log-guns done by boring solid trunks with a two-inch augur.
These filled with powder, and stopped with a
wooden
plug, were fired by means of an ernormous squib, or
slow match; and made a very reasonable noise
considering
they could rarely be fired more than once, being
wonderfully
addicted to bursting! The day itself was bright and
cloudless; and during the greatest heat we were so
sheltered
under the grand old trees, and our enchanted
arcade
,
as not to be oppressed; while the river flowed below,
its waters now smooth and deep, now leaping and rustling
over shoals, and now whirling in eddies around the trunks of
fallen trees! its pure white sands looking like granulated
snowstill the very sight was refreshing!
At last, three beech cannon, our signal guns, were fired
and burst; when the procession was formed on the cliff
and in the very centre of Guzzleton
in posse;
and this
(the procession, not the
posse
)consisted, not only of
menbodies
,
but of womenbodies also; since true woodsmen
wish their ladies to share in all that is pleasant and
patriotic
.
Then headed by a drum and fife, aided by the triangle
already celebrated, and with as many flags flying as were
pocket-handkerchiefs to spread out and wave on poles, we
took up the line of march; we, the
leading
citizens, who
were to read and speak; and then the common and
uncommon
citizens; and then certain independent ladies: and
then young ladies with escorts; and then the boys; and
then finally the rabble. After showing ourselves in the
woods and bushes along the future streets of Great
Guzzleton
,
and passing the store, and the tannery, and the two
cabins, we descended the cliff and marched to the
speaker's
scaffold to the tune of Yankee Doodleor something
tolerably like it; although to-day the drum
beat
the other
instruments
hollow!
The literary feast ended, we again formed the
procession
,
and marched to the head of the arcade, while the
music very judiciously played Love and Sausages.
There halted, our lines were separated, and duly
marshaled
each proceeded along its own side of the table; when
at a signal we halted again, and now opposite one another,
to perform the set up. And this delicate manuvre was
very handsomely executed by all that wore trousers; but
the wearers of frocks and petticoats showed want of drill,
making an undue exhibit of white thread stockings and
yarn garters. In some places, however, active and skittish
maids stepped first on to the seat, and then with an
adroit movement of one hand, as in going to milk a cow,
held affairs in a very becoming tuck till the blushing
damsels
were safe between the table and the seat.
We may not recount our jokes, and raillery, and tilting of
tables, and sinking of seats, and spilling of gravy, and
upsetting
of water; only all such were on the same large
scale that best sorted with the inartistical and undisciplined
world around! Tit for tat, and even
butter
for
fat
, was
largely done that dayand in a way to demolish nice bodies.
But never was more good humour! never heartier
fellowship
!
No drunkenness, however, and no profanity! No
breaking of wine glassesno singing of nasty songsno
smoking of cigarsno genteel and polished doings at all.
We were then too far West for refinements!
No reflectionsMr. Carlton. But what did all that
cost and what did you pay for a ticket?
Cost!pay for a ticket! why don't you know? And
yet how should anybody brought up where they sell a
penneth
of salad! and pay a fippenny-bit to walk in a garden
and buy tickets to hear sermons, and eat temperance
dinners
!and
everything costs something, whether to eat, or
drink, or smell, or touch, or look at!everything,
every
thing except
preaching
and
teaching!
Cost! why
nothing
in the sense you mean. All was a contributiona gift
everybody did itand everybody ate and drank that was
invited, and everybody that was
not
invited!
But it was a great labour!
To be sure it was. But what to a woodsman is labour
with the rifle and the axe? A single shot killed each
victim
for the hickoryism; and a few flourishes of the axe
felled trees and saplings for fuel, seats, tables, and arcades.
What's the use of a Barbecue any how?
Well, its uses to Guzzleton may be mentioned in some
other work. But we answer now by asking:Has not a
man, who ranges in a wide forest untrammelled by artificial
forms, an invincible love of freedom?Will not he who
feasts like Homer's heroes despise the meannesses of a
huckster's life?Can he be content to live on alms of broken
meat and filthy crumbs?Is there much hope of subduing
men whose pastimes are to the effeminate, labours!
And, dear reader, out there the noble Declaration of
Independence
itself, when properly read and commented on,
as to-day by John Glenville, has an effect on
backwoodsmen
,
such as is rarely felt
now
in here! Oh! could you
have seen Domore, and Ned Stanley, and old man Ashmore,
and Tom Robinson, rise at one or two places and clench
their rifles convulsivelyand with tearful eyes and
quivering
lips stand intently gazing on the face of that reader!
oh! could you have heard the enthusiastic cries, at the
close, that came warm bursting from the very hearts of our
congregation, men, women and childrenthen would you
have deemed perilous the attempt to put, by force, a yoke
on such necks! Vain the belief that our native woodsmen
can be tamed! Numbers may, perchance, have destroyed
their forest bulwarksbut in the doing, woodsmen and
their foes would all have fallen down slain together!
I only add that notwithstanding the continuous feasting
of many hundreds for four or five hours, large quantities
nay,
heaps
of provisions, were left; and that these in the
spirit of
native
western hospitality, were divided among the
poorer of the guests, who carried away with them food
enough for a week.
The day passed without any important accident or
lasting
anger. It was, indeed, very like the colour and thrill
of visions in my dreaming age! I have pic-nicked in
pretty
places, and with amiable and excellent peopleI have
heard sweet music and merry laughter in the graceful and
dwarfish groves of the eastbut the thrill came not there!
My poor, foolish fancy wanders then far away off to that
wild plateau of the Silver River, and sighs for the sylvan
life of that rude Barbecue!
CHAPTER LXIV.
Eloquar an sileam?
Out with it, sir!
Spectatum admissi risum teneatis?
You won't laugh then?
Clarence's
prediction to Harwood was soon verified.
One member of the Faculty being ingeniously managed
according to the sensitiveness of his temper, the other was
to be dealt with on the first fair opportunity. Our worthy
President aimed now to be the Government; in humble
imitation of dear old President Hicoryfacebut not by the
same means. Hence he now treated Harwood as a child,
and began to represent him as lacking manly judgment;
and secretly, like Ulysses, by asking insidious, ensnaring,
and doubt engendering questions.
At last a noble and ingenuous young man refused to
acquiesce
in an unnecessary and arbitrary change of
arrangement
for an exhibition, having previously received a solemn
pledge from the President that the change should
not
be
made; and that change being, notwithstanding, now made
and,without the consent of the Faculty. On this, the
Government and without any conference with his cabinet,
pronounced
in public
and immediate sentence of dismission
on young Heartly. But in this the Faculty neither could
nor would concur; since the President had first violated a
solemn promise, and then out of revenge wished to inflict
summarily a very disproportionate punishment. Hence,
Harwood not only refused to acquiesce in a hasty decision,
but he
in private
even earnestly remonstrated with the
Doctor; after which Harwood saw Heartly and advised
him not to leave Woodville till regularly and legally
ordered
so to do by the Faculty.
Well, this was just what the worthy President desired;
and he forthwith, both publicly and privately, denounced
usher
Harwood as having
rebelled
against the
Government!
Nay! as guilty of resistance and ingratitude to his father!
And, therefore, Harwood himself must and should leave the
College! He declared, and in no measured terms, that it
was High Treason in Mr. H. to visit a dismissed student;
and thenthe President himself, that very day, did visit
the same dismissed student, and implore him to remain,
saying he never would have suspended him had he not
been secretly advised so to do by Harwood himself!
This placed our learned men in what is called
hot water;
and gave us a beautiful illustration of the scriptural
sentiment
,
how beautiful a thing it is for brethren to dwell
together
in unity!
Harwood as yet believed no plan was laid for his
over-throw
.
He thought the Doctor was sorry for his haste, as he
both in public and private, professed to be, himself attributing
his own rashness and forgetfulness to the disordered state of
his nerves; and, as young Heartly had by the Doctor's
own decree, been reinstated. Still rumors were afloat that
mischief was brewing. Harwood, however, uttered no
threat and laid no plans either of attack or defence, but
was, as usual, wholly and laboriously busy with the duties
of his office. He rarely, in truth, taught less than five
hours a day, and oftener more than six!
On the contrary, the President true to his favourite rule,
that
his
main duty was to watch and administer the
discipline
,
rarely taught more than One Hour a day; and
that, sometimes, on horseback! Hence he had abundant
leisure to exercise, as he termed it, parental care and
government
over
all!
The extent and mode of this care and government may
be understood by what was afterwards called in the
Purchase
the Celebrated Saturday.
On that day Harwood, just before the bell for morning
exercises in College, when all the Students and all the
Faculty statedly assembled for certain duties, knocked at
the door of Little College, and thus, in evident
perturbation
,
addressed Mr. Clarence:
Clarence! something
is
brewing, I
do
believe
Why?
The Doctor has sent for eight or ten Students for a
body guard!
A body guard!against what?
I can't imagine: the Manton's were askedand
Bloduplex
told them he was in fear of some violence, and asked
their aid in protecting him. One brother went; the other
declined, and has just now given me the information.
What
can
the man be about?
Your ruin! But why does so large and able bodied a
man ask for a guard, and in addition to his sword-cane? or
why does he not apply to the civil authority? Hark!
there's the bell
Yes! and see!there, sure enough, is Bloduplex
coming
not only with his sword-cane, but with at least
twelve of the Students around him! What
is
he driving
at?
Let us gowe shall soon find out?
All now entered the Hall and took their places. The
Faculty as usual ascended the Rostrum; where the
Government
took his customary central seat, between
Clarence
on his right and Harwood on his left. And then,
immediately after
Prayer!
solemnly and
tearfully
done by
the venerable Pedagogue, that curious personage
commenced
as follows:
My
dear
(mellow voice)children:For I
must
call
you children,I shall not pursue the ordinary course of
our duties to day. Instead of that I design to go into a full
explanation of the nature and propriety of my government.
But as some things, by certain persons, have been said
against that government, I beg leave to read to you first,
my
dear
children, a few out of very many papers and
testimonials
in my possession, to shew you what
good
judges
in other places have thought about me as a President, and
what they do yet think.(Here the President read his
certificates, consisting of official dismissions from sundry
ecclesiastical and literary bodies, and several highly
laudatory
letters and notes from former pupils; and among them
a very eulogistic one from the Hon. Stulty Pistolpop, who
probably admired the Clergyman's
sword-cane-propensities
:
the effect of all which documents being very happy
on the Judgesthe Students now seated below as a court
of appealsand making them, for a time, think their
Father
the Government was really as great and good a man
as he was cracked up to be,)And so you see my
dear
children(voice very tender)may I not consider myself
after all this competent to the government of this college?
But I wish now to say that my system is wholly
parental
.
It is not regulated by printed or written rules and
laws, or by the precedents of
other
colleges, where
some
people have imbibed
arbitrary
notions: no, the parental
system is that of a father in governing his familyit
depends
on circumstancesit differs with cases. Some
Faculties
govern
only
by rulesrebuking, suspending,
expelling
,
according to the letter. They will take no pains to
discriminate; they fix the iron bed and stretch out and lop
off till every one is made to fit.
Is
that right, my DEAR
children?(Several of the Court of Appeals cried out
`No! it is not.')No, indeed, it is not: and persons that
thus govern are not fit to governare they?(No!from
the tribunal below.)Deeply do I regret to say that the
worthy gentlemen of the Faculty seated on my right and
left do not agree with me in these views; for instance,
Professor
Clarence would have urged me to discipline Mr.
Smith according to rule
Here Mr. C. interrupted
Doctor Bloduplex I cannot submit to this public insult
and injustice
Sit down, sirdon't interrupt me, sir!
I will
not
sit down till I explain
Mr. Clarence you may speak when I am done.
Well, sir, go on; but do not endeavour to prejudice the
minds of these young men against me.
The
reverend
President went on; and, although he
alluded
repeatedly to Mr. C. and named many private and
confidential matters to his prejudice, that gentleman
concluded
to let the personage have rope enough to hang
himself
metaphorically or,
otherwise
.
Well now, my dear children,(voice thrilling)let
me imagine a case of parental government, and propose it
for your consideration and vote. Suppose a young man,
rash and without judgment, was to pursue a rebellious
course against a President and Father of a college; and
that after every means of private rebukeyes!(voice
sobby)after earnest and affectionate entreaty;(voice
breaking)yes! and suppose after(sob)his Father
(sob,sob,)had even shed tears over him;(Here
irrepressible
sobs and tears for a few moments choked the
Government; and many of the judges wept out audibly)
`Suppose the poor rebel's Father should drop on his knees
before the ungrateful boy, as I now kneel before you!
(The Government now dropped on both knees on the floor
of the rostrum, in open view of all the students)and
should weep before him!(Here a gush of many tears
burst from the
wretched
manand weeping was audible,
all over the court below)And should, with his hands
imploringly clasped thus(action to word)entreat and
beseech that poor rebellious child!And suppose that
child, while his Father was thus on his knees!thus
imploring
!thus
weeping!oh! suppose that child should
spit in his Father's face!ought not that wicked child to
be instantly cut off from college and expelled from it
forever
?
Yes! yes! he ought, he ought!was answered by
many, if not all the Students: upon which the
Government
,
still kneeling and with hands in an imploring attitude,
cried out with great tenderness and gratitude, thus:
Thank you, my dear
children
thank you!Then
rising from his knees, the miserable Government sank back
exhausted with his exercises(and they were pretty
severe
)into
his central seat, and hiding his face(properly
enough)in his hands, he remained thus some moments,
sobbing and recovering; perhaps considering the next act.
Hence, taking advantage of this pause
between
the acts, we
will enlighten the reader as to some matters.
Be it known then, that the rebellious and wicked young
dog represented by our Grand Actor, was intended to be
Professor Harwood! But none of the tender scene had
ever occurred in private; although the Actor wished the
audience to think so. On the contrary, when our
Professors
respectfully yet earnestly had remonstrated against the
haste and illegality of Mr. Heartly's dismission by the sole
act of the President, Doctor Bloduplex had fallen into an
outrageous fit of anger: nay, raising his clenched fist, he
had stamped with fury on the floor of his study, and
exclaimed
I
care nothing for the Faculty or the Board of
TrusteesI will stamp them under my feet!
Some may think the acting described thus far must have
injured the actor himself. But, gentle reader, it was done
to the very life! Clarence said, he should have been
deceived
himself, had he not discerned the hoofs and the tail.
Had the performer confined himself to his rehearsed parts,
and not ventured on a certain extemporaneous playing to
be named presently, Harwood and Clarence would have
encountered that day a tempest in the outcries of the
Students
,
which must have immediately driven them from
their officesperchance with bloody noses, black eyes and
cracked pates!
Let a band of generous young men, a little inclined to
the mobocratical tendencies of the New Purchase, fully
believe
all that a venerable and not ill looking clergyman tells
them; let them once think that such a man did kneel to his
junior, and dehort with tears, and at that moment was basely
struck and spit upon by that youth, and there is no act of
violence to which such an excited and indignant company
may not be led or coaxed.
For a while our Professors sat as in a dream! So
curiously
wonderful was that act in the drama of their lives!
Clarence says, he was busy awhile, with a contrast between
the oddity on his knees before them, and gentlemen and
men like Witherspoon, and Ludlow, and Day, and Nott,
and Smith, and Carnahan, and Green! Harwood, the hard
hearted rascal! he sat with such a lip and nose of
Kentucky
scorn!but soon, as was his habit, when having
nothing to do, he began strapping a round-ended blade of
an old pocket knife on his bootsaid boot tastefully
reposing
on the knee of the other leg!
Readerthat very knife cut the thread of our Actor's
intended
speech? Happily it was fit for that kind of cutting,
but for no other: even if heated it would barely have cut
butter! That blade was springless! pointless! edgeless!
I have handled it an hundred times. Oh! Bloduplex! had
it been a dirk! a Spanish blade! a Mississippi tooth-pick!
what grandeur in that attitude! that look of horror! that
piercing thrill of thy outcry! when starting from thy sobs
and tears, on catching sight of that funny old knife through
thy parted fingers, thou didst thus exclaim and appeal to the
Students:
Young gentlemen!take noticethere is a knife open
at my left side!and I know not for what purpose!
Doctor Bloduplex!cried Clarenceno harm is
threatenedI know that knifeit is entirely worthless
and that is Harwood's habitI have seen him do it in
church!
Here
something
sticking in the Government's throat, he
ejected from his mouth a
gob
right at Clarence's feet, and
then went on:
I have reason, my children, to fear Mr. Harwood; and
to protect myself, I asked some of you to guard me to day!
It was natural, then, I should dread a
knife
so near me;
but I did
not
mean to insinuate he had it out for a bad
purpose
(!)I only meant to teach him how
impolite
[45]
[45]
Spitting at a Professor's feet is what?In this case Satan
correcting
Sin.
it is to
be thus playing with his knife. (!!)
Affairs were now a little disordered: although to the
Professors it was plain this thrust
at
the knife had hurt the
Government more than the worst thrust
from
it could ever
have done. Clarence then rose to make his defence
before
the Court of Appeals.
Young gentlemen, dixit ille, we have witnessed a
scene both amazing and surprising; hence I shall be easily
credited in saying I have no preparation for it
The President interruptedIf Mr. Clarence means to
insinuate that
I
had made any preparation, he shall not
speak
Sirrejoined the otherI
will
speak; and I will
repeat
that I have no preparation. Further, let the Students
notice that surprised and amazed I am, but not in a passion:
nay that I am calm and, therefore, competent to make a
statement of all facts which, directly and indirectly, the
President of the Faculty has seen fit to bring and lay
before
this school. But why he wishes to involve me is
wonderful
,
as I have already resigned my office, and am only to
remain, by contract, for a few months. Accordingly, and
spite of re-repeated and brutal interruptions from the
Government
,
Clarence made his statements and ceased, and
then arose Harwood, and commenced as follows:
Gentlemen, Professor Clarence has said
he
is not
angry
;
but it would be wrong in me
not
to be angry and
indignant
too. Doctor Constant Bloduplex, with all the
authority
of his clerical and official station, has openly and
publicly accused me of a design to assassinate him! and
seeks thus, as far as he can, to destroy my moral
character
I did
not
accuse you, sir!said the President.
Not in so many words, Doctor, but you did insinuate,
and you intended by your whole manner and your words to
insinuate as much.
I did
not
.
You
did
, sir;you
did!
And now, as you have put
several things to the vote of the Students to-day, I insist on
putting this matter to vote; and if the Students acquit you
of evil intention I will yield the point.
Agreed, instantly replied the Doctor. Alas! did he
not see the tears of the Students had dried away? Or
dared he
not refuse?
Harwood, then, very distinctly stated the question,
thus:
Vol. II.14
All the Students who believe that Doctor Bloduplex
did
not
insinuate that I had out my knife to stab him, affirm
that belief by sayingyes.
Not
a voice
responded!
All the Students who believe that Doctor Bloduplex
did
insinuate that I had out my knife to stab him, affirm
that
belief by sayingyes.
Yesyesyes!from twenty voices; and from one
louder than the restYes! I'll be d if he didn't!
There, sir!said now Harwood to the delinquent
GovernmentYou well know you meant your remark for
an insinuation; and sir, it was a
base
insinuation!
To this the President vouchsafed no reply. And he
stopped all further preceedings by running down from the
Rostrum and retreating to the far side of the Hall, where
he declared himself now afraid of Harwood, and said he
wished to be surrounded by the Students! And then,
after
abusing the Professors, he cried out let all the
Students
who are in my favour follow me to my house; when
he hurried forth, followed by a few.
Had now our two Professors gone home! But evil
communications corrupt good manners; and so imitating
the Parental System, they, forsooth, must have a little talk
with the Students!many of whom remained. They did
not say much, indeed; yet Harwood was imprudent
enough to say there Bloduplex is a Liar! Nay! the
same impertinent language
both
Professors used afterwards,
the same day, to the citizens of the village! And for this
frightful and outrageous insolence Harwood was shortly
after
excommunicated from the Communion of the Church!
True, Harwood had a dreadful provocation;but what
right had he to twist and squirm about when a
Holy
and
Reverend
Man stamped upon him? Why did he not, like
an humble worm, crawl back wounded into his hole? True,
Harwood offered to bring Clarence, and twenty Students,
to prove the truth of the libel; but
no
, said Bishop
Bloduplex
,
who himself presided, and advocated, and judged
on the trial, in the inferior courtno; the greater the
truth the greater the libel: and let him thus be taught not
to slander and abuse a clergyman!
Ay, and true it was, that Professor Clarence was
summoned
before our Grand Jury, and on solemn oath declared,
that to the best of his knowledge and belief there was not
the slightest ground for believing that Mr. Harwood
intended
on that Saturday to assassinate Doctor Constant
Bloduplex! But what right had a mere layman to a
character
?
What right to defend himself, by saying
indignantly
that the accusation of Doctor B. was malicious and
false?What
Well, but Mr. Carlton, did not the higher ecclesiastical
court take up the case against Bloduplex on
Fama
Clamosa
?
did
not the officers and members of his own
parish
lay the matter before a bench of Bishops?
No! dear reader, no: but consider, he was the only
Doctor of Divinity in the whole Purchase! He was too
enormous a Big-Bugand the sting of such is sometimes
fatal!
Mr. Carlton, what did the President with the Students
that went with him?
Well, several of his body-guard told the author, and gave
Mr. Clarence written certificates to the same purport, that
early on Saturday morning the President had sent for and
told them expressly he was afraid of Harwood, and wished
them to protect him from violence;that they then
believed
him, and, indeed, until the knife scene was
presented
;that
afterwards they went back with the Doctor,
but only to hear what else he would say;that at his
house the President treated them with cakes and wine;
that he then read Clarence's confidential letters, and spent
a full hour in ridiculing and burlesquing
his
character, and
pronounced him in all respects incompetent to the office of
Professor of Languages, &c.
Any more questions, reader?
No, indeed, we have heard enough.
So I had begun to think. Here, then, let us end our
celebrated Saturdaya day memorable enough, also, to be
the Last of our Seventh Year.
CONCLUDING SIX MONTHS.
CHAPTER LXV.
That such a slave as this should wear a sword!
Ha! I see the light of a Clearing! a little further,
and we are through this Romance of the Forest!
Beautiful the fresh green of our opening spring!
Glorious
the wild flowers and blossoms, exhaling their odours
to the air! Grand as ever the dark, solemn, boundless
forest! Full of awe, yon swollen water! bearing through
the desert wood, on its raging bosom, an hundred
branching
trees, and, here and there, the shattered fragments of a
rude cabin!
Hark!ah! it is the piteous cooing of our wood doves!
And hark!there!yes, scamper away, you little grey
gaffer, and peep from the dense foliage of that lofty
sugar-top
!
I knew it was you squealing your cunning song.
Fear not! shady-tailmy rifle is at homeI have no
heart to shoot you now! There! cracks the brush!I
see youleap not away! bounding, timid deer! Stay
and graze the early buds and tender twigs of yon thicket
I am no more your foe!
Yes! there is a clearing ahead! A short moment more
and I leave you, oh! deep and dark ravine, where I have
been so often buried in solitude!and you, oh! beetling
cliff, with dizzy brow, frowning over the secret waters so
many hundred feet below! And am I so soon to leave you
alland, for ever? Ah! if I revisit the Purchase, you,
enchanting trees, will be prostrate!you, merry squirrel,
and timid deer, will have fled!you, solemn ravine, will
be desecrated with wide and beaten roads! Alas! the
secret waters will lie open then to the public gaze!the
tall cliff be stripped of its grove!and the solitary cabin
there of Ned Stanley, be supplanted by the odious,
pretending
,
and smirking house of brick and mortar!alas!
Mr. Carlton!Mr. Carlton!!Mr. Carlton!!!
Sir!Sir!!
We shall never get out of the woods at this rate.
Thank you, dear reader! I forgot myselfI was away
in the spirit amid the apparitions of innocent joys long dead.
Let us return, then, to history.
Before resuming literary topics, we must say a word of
what happened some weeks ago to the firm of Glenville
and Carlton: and which dissolved our partnership, and
sent Glenville to the Farther West, and Carlton  alas!
whither?
My partner, in early days, had put his name to paper;
a security, as he supposed, but making himself liable as a
partner. Notes were given to pay for
produce:
and this
was loaded and floated to Orleans, and there sold at a fair
profit. But, by a singular negligence, the gentleman
entrusted
with the boats, and pork, corn, lard, tallow, and
hoop-poles, never came back with the money! And hence
the merchants failing, the holders of their notes got nothing
for their paper! For many long years, this paper lay
quiet and slumberingtill a lawyer suddenly appeared in
the woodsand the repose of the notes was broken. And
so was that of Glenville! The holders were now taught
for a consideration, how to come upon the security
especially as he, after a long and doubtful struggle, had
got above the waves, and was swimming in comparative
comfort.
The security was, therefore, advised very unexpectedly
of his insecurity: and, in the next moment, stripped of all
his hard earned possessions, he was soused naked into that
very figurative and deeply poetical seaa Sea of
Troubles
!
Now, folks intimately connected with others, rarely
take that metaphorical plunge, without ducking their
associates
:
hence, down went Mr. Carlton into the deep
waters
,
from which emerging for a sniff of air, he saw most of
his external good things swept away by the torrent!
Mr. Carlton's work, therefore, for the six months under
consideration, was that most vexatious and profitless kind of
twisting called winding-up. Suppose me, then, hard at
work, turning the windlass or some other figured crank of
the Wind-up-business, while we go on to wind-up also the
story of the College: and then Clarence, and the rest of
us, like other phantasms of our drama, disappearperhaps,
for ever!
After
the
Saturday, our Literati continued their labours,
the Government minding the discipline,the Professors,
the teaching. Except some official intercourse, all other
was at an end: for the Professors were for keeping out of
harm's way, and not only avoided all sayings and doings
in company of the President, but even looking at or to
wards him out of the tail of an eye.
Generally, the students remained neutral: but the young
gentlemen belonging to the governmental party, did very
good service as partisans. Among other things, they, one
dark night, girdled all Clarence's flourishing and
ornamental
trees set out by him years before, around little College;
they cut off his beautiful woodbines, twining up frames
around his doors and windowsand at other times, they
destroyed his garden fence, and admitted or turned a herd
of swine into the too exuberant fruits and vegetablesnot
to name other civilized feats unknown before to Hoosier
young men.
Harwood did not share these complimentsnot because
less respectedbut more feared. Kind and gentle as a
great mastiff, still he was not all patience: and, once
aroused, he would not have scrupled to shake well in his
staunch jaws, the sneaking whelps and genteel curs, so
annoying to his clerical neighbour. Well, indeed, might
Bloduplex have been in awe of that Kentucky spirit, had it
ever dreamed of doing him harm! True, Bloduplex
always
,
now, went armedhis sword sheathed in a cane!
maliciously pretending that Harwood intended to
whip
him!poor defence! had the Professor once seriously
undertaken to give him, what he so richly deserveda
hiding!
And yet, accidentally, these belligerents once met, and
Harwood was upset. First, however, be it remembered,
our side-walk, for a mile, was paved with wood, not
chemically
,
but mechanically: a line of hewed logs ran from the
Colleges to the centre of Woodville. This pave was used
in miry timesuntil anybody received two severe falls,
after which he
stuck
to the mud-way of the vulgar road.
Now, it was the custom, when two peaceful Christians
were about to meet, for the more active to hasten to the
end of his log, and, stepping aside to an adjacent block or
stone, there remain till the superior, or lady, had passed.
Well, one Sabbath morning, Harwood was going full
tilt up town, to visit a sick relative, and, being on the
log-way
,
he discerned advancing from the opposite direction,
Doctor Bloduplex. Accordingly, he hurried on to reach,
by the laws of our etiquette, the step-out placebut, alas!
as he stepped aside, the Doctor
accidentally
quickening
his pace, suddenly presented his shoulder, and, with all his
weight of person and character, tumbled the Professor off
his feet, and had the honour of making his new hat fly
ten feet away into the mud!
That is Harwood's tale. Here, however, is the
Governmental
version triumphantly given to our Board of
Trustees
,
I being present:
I had been, Mr. Chairman, said he to Doctor
Sylvan
,
our President,I had been up town, to visit a
sick parishioner, on Sabbath morning, and was on my
return, in order to prepare for the sacred duties of the
pulpit, when I saw coming to meet me, in a threatening
attitude, Mr. Harwood. At a glance, I saw he was
determined
not to yield me the log: and I then resolved so to
chastise his want of respect for my age, character, and
station, as for ever to make him remember the lesson. I
have been accused of
fearing
that young man; but, Mr.
Chairman, independent of this cane, in which I carry a
sword
,(and, at the word, this
Christian
Doctor did, in
presence of our whole Board,
draw
that sword, and, with
a real Falstaff gravity and swell)independent, I say, of
this
sword
,(driven back with inimitable grandeur,)I
well knew, in case of a rencontre, I should easily
knock
him off the log!
because, the day before, I had been
weighed in Mr. Retail's patent scales, and my weight was
exactly One Hundred and Ninety Pounds! and, of course,
when we came together,
he
found himself and his hat
where he informs you!!
Is
that
true
, Mr. Carlton!?
Yes, reader, it
is:
and I'll take my affidavy on it.
What meeting of your Board, was this?
A called meeting, called by the Government, with a
view to have his rebellious Professors instantly expelled.
It was held about the middle of our final six months: but
it would make too long a book to do more than run over a
few outlines.
After the exchange of papers, notes, and other
diplomatics
,
the Board, the Government, and Faculty, convened;
when Bloduplex begancontinueday, and held on even
ahead, for two long summer days, from rise of morn to
set of sun; and then ended, because fully blown out!
But after that, for other speech or reply there was no time,
and, happily, no necessity.
As usual, the President read his certificatesgave his
religious experience, and miraculous conversion from
infidelity
told
of his
sainted
mother looking down on him
and sobbed, and finally roared right out, like a bull-calf
foreibly held back from the cow! From this recovering,
he told us how Harwood and Clarence had even ridiculed
that experience! and expressed suspicion about those
tears, when he had indiscreetly given them the same
history
in private! He then went over his own whole life and
characterdid the same for Harwood, and ditto for
Clarence
:
in all which he showed the pre-eminence of his
mnemonic-system, by detailing to us every word, joke,
pleasantry, tea-drinking, walk in the woods, rash-saying,
silly-word, indignant-exclamation, &c. &c.and even
very many improper things that should have been said
and done by our Professors,but which
never
had been!
He tried his hand at irony and sarcasm, comparing
himself
to Dr. Johnson, and Clarence to Boswell! He
ridiculed
Clarence for being a charity scholar: because, at
Princeton, he had paid nothing for his Theological
education
!
He then acted the bottle storywhich, however,
cannot be fully represented without a diagram: but he
used one hand for a bottle, and the fore-finger of the other
as corkscrew; and then, holding the bottle-and-corked-fist
under an Honourable Trustee's nose, he suddenly, with
corkscrew-finger jerked out the cork, and let out the whole
essence, in that remarkable sentence, Billy! you're a
mighty little man! And this, added the facetious
Governmentthis is what I did for the students at my
house on the Saturday named, and to illustrate Professor
Clarence's character; as I did not choose to employ a
sledge-hammer to kill a fly!
It was now the Government, and with great
complacency
,
spoke and
acted
the celebrated
a posteriori
mentioned
in this work, and so often afterwards repeated by
him. But, at length, this Great Engine ceased its
emissions
of steam; and we aroused to hear Clarence's reply,
and yet with looks of peevishness, as dreading another
long, abusive, windy tempest of words. Oh! the delicious
refreshing of his more than laconic replythus:
Mr. Chairman, and Gentlemen of the Board,I have
very much I
could
saybut I shall make
no
reply!
This answer will be better appreciated from the
following
dialogue between Dr. Sylvan and Mr. Clarence, directly
after our adjournment:
Dr. S. Never, sir, did you do a happier thing: you
effected more for yourself than by a thousand speeches.
Mr. C. You saw me, Dr. Sylvan, for six hours the
first day, taking notes, that I might reply to the
innumerable
slanders and falsehoods with which I was assailed:
but, then occurred this thought, amid that torrent of
ribaldry
,
viz:`If these Trustees are
gentlemen
, they need
not my reply;if they are
not
gentlemen, I need not
make a reply.' And then, sir, you saw me crumble up my
notes, and put them into my pocket: and I shall hand them
over to Robert Carlton.
Our called meeting, however, utterly declined
expelling
the Professors; and that, notwithstanding the President
repeatedly said in his oration, that
he
would resign if Mr.
Harwood was permitted to remain! We recommended,
indeed, if, possible, an
amicable
private adjustment, and
referred
the whole matter to the new Board of Trustees, that
were to meet in the Fall: a very cowardly behaviour, since
we all privately felt and acknowledged that President
Bloduplex
certainly deserved to be dismissed, whatever the
Professors
may have merited.
To Clarence, that resolution was nothing: he had
resigned
;
and, for weeks past, had been preparing, as all the
town knew, to leave the Purchase! The attack on him
now, was to have the existing contract annulled; which
would deprive him, it was supposed, of the residue of his
salary; cripple his resources; blacken his character; and
render his probable story of events less impressive! But
Bloduplex overlooked Mr. Clarence's old crony, Robert
Carlton, Esq.: and he saw not then and there a chiel
takin notes!
Beside, for ever to prevent any evil surmises in regard
to Professor Clarence, our Board, (and at the instance of
Mr. Carlton,) not only unanimously voted the full and
entire
acquittal of Clarence, but each and every one of them
did personally and individually over and above the official
signatures, add his own name to my friend's honourable
and laudatory dismissal! Ay, and this man, after all that
ingenuity and malice (and of
practised
cunning,) could
invent
,
and colour, and say of him, in a speech of two
summer
days!and after making no defence, nor an appeal to
passion or prejudice, was acquitted!and, not only
acquitted
,
but thanked and praised!and by his very Judges!!
What do you think of
that
, Master Ford?
Harwood now stood alone: and Polyphemus having a
sorter devoured one victim, took additional steps to eat the
other. Several of our Board had, indeed, agreed with me
in thinking and saying that Doctor Bloduplex had
behaved
badly and even shamefully; yet I warned Harwood
that the New Board in the Fall, who knew not Joseph
and his brethren, would go, not according to
justice and
truth
, but according to their ideas of
interest and policy:
because, too, some Trustees had told me that they feared
to dismiss Bloduplex, lest his influence might injure
Woodville
!
that
after such a quarrel, it would be difficult to
obtain
immediately another Presidentand that the College
must not be destitute of such, Mr. Clarence, the maker of
the Institution, being gone too!
It was now, Bloduplex, Lord Bishop of the parish
church, summoned Harwood before his little ecclesiastical
star-chamber, and had him excommunicated, for calling his
Reverence a Liar: intending said excommunication to act
like an interdict on a kingdom, and prejudice his
antagonist's
cause before the New Board of Trustees to meet in
the Fall! At this ecclesiastical Inquisition, Bloduplex
himself sat as chief Inquisitor!he made the charges!
he excluded the defensive testimony and all pleas of
mitigation
all
entreaties to carry the whole at once to a higher
courthe directed the officialspronounced the sentence
inflicted the torture!
As Nero to the primitive Christians, so did Bloduplex to
Harwoodhe dressed him in a wild beast's skin, and then
hissed dogs on him! Ay, he was cruelly hunted like a
brute! And after in vain spending his hard earned dollars
in seeking redress, he in an excusable moment of bitter
indignation
left at last that, upon the whole, Best of Religious
Denominations! But let that Harwood, if he yet live, know
there is One Bold enough to raise a voice against the vile
Injustice of the Pastone that knowsand says Harwood
was always badly, and sometimes basely and wickedly
used! And let him know, too, that under better auspices,
and but for some mere accidents, the Immense Majority of
the Denomination he has left would have done him justice
on his Cruel and Unrelenting Foe!
Reader! here falls the curtain! And we stand before
it, not to announce a new Dramabut our Farewell:We
bid you adieu in the next andlast chapter.
CHAPTER LXVI.
Nay then farewell!
I have touch'd the highest point of all my greatness:
And from that full meridian of my glory
I haste now to my setting: I shall fall
Like a bright exhalation in the evening,
And no man see me more.
About
the middle of October, a small Christian chapel
was, one night, filled to overflowing; and deeply
impressive
was the sadness and solemn hush of the congregation!
They were listening to the farewell address of Charles
Clarence! while the voice of the wind moaning in the dying
woods around, came upon our hearing in fitful gusts like
passionate gushings of lamentation for the fading away of
their glories! Our injured and persecuted friend
concluded
thus:
EXTRACT.
But I must cease, and that with no
expectation
that I shall ever more preach to you; or you ever again
listen to me. This is sufficiently solemn and mournful; yet
other things exist here to deepen now
my
sorrows. For
some years this has been my homenay, why conceal it?
I had once cherished the hope it was to be my home for
years to come! It was in my heart to live and die with
you! I came to be a Western Manbut God forbade it.
I have shared your prosperity and adversity; and in your
hopes and fears, your joys and griefs. We have
interchanged
visits of mutual good-will; we have worshipped in
the same temples; we have solaced each other in
afflictions
!
We have met at the same house of feasting,alas!
oftener at the same house of mourning! Yes!my
children
lie together, in
their
little graves, amidst the graves of
your
childrenthat moaning wind is stirring now the
leaves over them!dust of mine is mingling with yours!
* * * Can these and other ties be so unexpectedly
sundered without pain?without emotion? But the hour
is comewe part! Come, fellow citizens and Christian
friends, let us mutually forgive one another. If I have
aught against the misled I have forgiven it; if any have
aught against me, I pray such forgive me! Kindly do I
thank many for past kindness, and more especially for the
healing of their balm-like sympathy: and now let us say,
not in indifference, much less in anger, but in manly, hearty
good-willFarewell!
In the morning his house was tenantless;Clarence had
gone very early away with his familyand Woodville
with its pleasures and pains was to him as all other dreams
of this lifepast!
Soon after, the fragments of my shattered fortunes being
collected, we too were ready to bid adieu to our home:
home! did I say? Yes; had we not
graves
there? Alas!
we had them elsewhere too!
It was a rainy morning; but, notwithstanding, our little
wagon and horses were at the door. All had been arranged
and prepared for this morning, and all farewells, as we
thought, had been spoken; and why should rain delay those
that had endured so many storms? Emily Glenville was
to go and share our fortunesbut Aunt Kittypoor Aunt
Kitty was to stay; for we were wandering forth we knew
not whither, and she in her old age must remain till we
found a resting-place.
Home
we expected to find no more
(nor
have
we ever)and we had then the desolate hearts
of pilgrimsas now and often since!
Farewell!
dearest
Aunt Kitty!ah! break not our
hearts by that convulsive sobbing!Farewell! * * * *
and then we were all in our wagonbut just as we moved,
a well-known, a rough, yet softened voice in a tone of
melancholy reproach sounded at our side:
Bust my rifle! Mr. Carltin, you ain't a puttin off
without
biddin me and Domore good bye!?
My honest old friends! no, never!but I could not
find you yesterday when we went round bidding all the
citizens good bye
Well, we was out arter deer, for, says I to Domore,
Domore, says I, lets git a leg or two for Mrs. Carltin afore
they goesand we've fetch'd 'em along in this here bag
if you kin find room for 'em in this here waggin.
Thank you, my kind friends, with all our very hearts!
I do wish we could make you some returnwe should
be so glad to be remembered when we are away
Bust my rifleif I ever forgit youand Domore wont
nither
No, indeed, Mr. Carltinand if you chance to come our
way like, Domore's cabin will be open as in old times
Yes!Mr. Carltinand me and Domore and you'll
have some more shots with the riflegood bye, Mr. Carltin
God bless yougood bye!
Good bye, my friends!I have
no
home nowbut
cabin or brick house, wherever you find usI say to you
and all other frank-hearted honest woodsmen, as the old
General said to you`you will never find the string
pulled in!'
Here I started my horses; and then the last we ever
heard of Woodville was something very like:Poor
Carltin
!God
bless himpoor feller!he's most powerful
sorryand don't like to go back to the big-bugs! And
then through the uproar of the increasing storm came the
voice of the two hunters united in a loud, cordial, solemn,
last Farewell!
Many years after this, on the pinnacle of the Great Cove
Mountain of the Alleghanies, and leaning against a tree,
stood a solitary traveller, who, after contemplating for some
minutes the setting sun, thus broke forth into a soliloquy:
Yes! O Sun! thou art unchanged!melting away to
rest amid the same gorgeous clouds, piled on those distant
mountains! I remember thee rising in the brilliancy of
that Spring morning! Here Clarence stood and looked
towards
the Elysium of that Far Westand
she
was in his
thoughts! There is the rock where Brown, and Wilmar,
and Smith rested a moment!  Sad remembrances!
bitter emotions! O! Sun! as glorious thou as ever!
those sumptuous curtains of woven cloud around thy
pavilion
as matchless!
I
am changedalas!
how
changed!
Far West!that name has power to heave the bosom
with sighsbut it can call up no more forever the illusions
of the dreamy days! I
know
what is in thee, land of the
setting Sun!
A world of shadows is coming over yon vallies
darker ones are on my soul! That Spring Morning!
The comrades of that daywhere? The scenes!the
sufferings!the disappointments!in that far away forest
land! Graves of my dead!why need I care to weep,
where there are none to mock. * * * * * *
World of Spirits!around and near me! No dreams
no shadows there! Sun, farewell!thy last rays are
falling across those graves in that leaf-covered resting place!
But they shall see thee fall, to rise and set no more!
Home!I have none now:but there
is
a home!
Awake! from this dreamy life! True, perfect,
uninterrupted
happiness is neither in the far East, nor in the
far West:it is in God, in Christ, in Heaven!
Reader!
dear
reader! the lesson in that soliloquy is for
thee! Ponder it; live according to it; and thou wilt not
have read this work in vain!Miss E. A. Smythe
,
A knowledge of your character, derived from mutual
friends, from the opinion of all your acquaintances, and also
from a somewhat intimate personal acquaintance, induces
me to believe that such a lady would fill the vacancy in my
domestic establishment most perfectly and delightfully:
although I am not vain enough to suppose Miss Smythe
will necessarily feel herself flattered by such a preference
on the part of the writer. As, however, Miss S. on better
acquaintance, might become interested in himmore so at
least than he fears she is at presenthe very respectfully,
yet
most carnestly
, craves permission to pay his addresses
in person.
Very truly, your humble servant,
But great admirer,
John Glenville
.My dear sir,
In a playful conversation on a subject so common when
unmarried persons meet, your daughter, Miss Brown, in a
jesting manner, remarked, that she always referred
gentlemen
to her fatheras
his
choice would always be
hers
.
What was jest with her, with me would have become very
solemn earnest, had I had then to offer any thing beyond
my hand and my heart, to induce
such
a girl to leave
such
a home. Happily, circumstances are now favourably
altered
;
and willingly now would I ask that father for his
daughter could I flatter myself the daughter could be
induced
to gladden and adorn a hearth, which, however
warm in one sense, must be yet cold and cheerless without
the love of a bosom friend. And such a friend would Miss
Brown prove:and, dear sir, if
you
think such a match
suitable for your lovely daughter, I sincerely entreat the
communication of your favourable opinion to her in my
behalf
hoping
that the daughter's choice then may be as the
father's.
I have, sir, the honour to be
Your obedient servant,
J. Glenville
.COMPOSITION ON HUNTING.
The other morning I went out a hunting with father's
duck-gun what he brung out from Kentucky; but as I
had no luck, I allowed I might as well put off for home;
and so I turn about and goes towards home. As I come to
the edge of our clearin, what should I see away off on the
top of a dead walnut, but a black crow! And so I makes
up my mind to try and hit him. The critter was more nor
three hundred yards from me; but I insinuates myself along
as near as two hundred yards to the feller; when he begins
a showing signs of flittin: and so I trees where I was in a
minute. Well, I determines to try him there, although
'twas near as good as desperut to try a black crow that
distance with a shot-gun; although father's duck-gun's
the most powerful shot-gun in the Purchis.
Howsomdever
,
I wanted the load out; and I thought I might as
well fire that a way as any otherand so up I draws the
piece very careful, and begins a takin aim, thinking all the
while I
shouldn't
hit him: still I tuk the most exactest aim,
as if I
should;
when just then he hops about two foot
nearer my way, as if to get a look round my tree, where he
smelt powderand then, thinking all the time, as I said, I
shouldn't
hit
him, as the distance was so most powerful
fur, I blazed away!and sure enough, as I'm aliveI
didn't
hit him!John Glenville, Esq
,
Dear Sir
* * * * * * and the inclosed
from my daughter, to whom was handed your late
communication
,
contains, I presume, the most satisfactory answer,
* * * * and * * *
Yours, very respectfully, &c.
Redman Green Brown
.Sir
:
I honour you for honesty, as I am satisfied you assign
true reasons for not taking one to share your home; although
the reasons themselves can never seem satisfactory where
one was willing to share another's
heart
. For, like most
girls in their days of romance, that one cared to find
only
a
heart when she married. As my own home is sufficiently
comfortable, there can be no inducement to wish another,
however comfortable, in the New Purchase; and where its
owner seems to think `altered circumstances' are important
in winning a woman's love. But to show that kindness is
estimated that would spare my delicacy, by leading my dear
father to think
all
our conversation had been sportive, I do
hereby most cordially(here John looked! oh! I tell you
what!)invite you to our Christmas festivities, when the
writer changes her name from Mary Brown to Mary
Burleigh
.
There, Carlton! I
told
you soI said it would be
no! And yet secretly did I wish,ay! I do wish it now
that the answer could beyes! I am glad the girl has
her revenge; but still I have known too many
hard-ships
not to feel happy in the reflection, that one I did love
a little, and could now love a great deal, has never been
called to share them.